U.S.  COAST  GUARD  BUDGET  AND  OVERSIGHT 

S.  HRG.  110–1204 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, 

FISHERIES, AND COAST GUARD 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

APRIL  18,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

79–550 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  OCEANS,  ATMOSPHERE,  FISHERIES,  AND  COAST 

GUARD 

MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine,  Ranking 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 18, 2007  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 

Allen,  Admiral  Thad  W.,  Commandant,  Department  of  Homeland  Security, 
U.S. Coast Guard  .................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

APPENDIX 

Caldwell, Stephen L., Acting Director, Homeland Security and Justice Issues, 
U.S. Government Accountability Office (GAO), prepared statement  ...............
Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Reserve Officers Association of the United States, prepared statement  .............
Response to written questions submitted to Admiral Thad W. Allen by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. John F. Kerry 
..........................................................................................
Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg  ...............................................................................
Hon. Trent Lott  .................................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
18 
19 
26 
3 
5 

6 
10 

49 
49 
69 

77 
72 
85 
85 
93 
89 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

U.S.  COAST  GUARD  BUDGET  AND  OVERSIGHT 

WEDNESDAY,  APRIL  18,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, FISHERIES, 
AND COAST GUARD, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met  at  2:30  p.m.,  in  room  SR–253,  Russell 
Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Maria  Cantwell,  Chairman  of  the 
Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  This  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce, 
Science,  and  Transportation,  Subcommittee  on  Oceans,  Atmos-
phere,  Fisheries,  and  Coast  Guard  will  come  to  order.  This  after-
noon we are having a hearing on the U.S Coast Guard budget and 
oversight of the budget proposal. 

We welcome Admiral Thad Allen, Commandant of the U.S. Coast 
Guard, to be before the Committee today. I will point out to my col-
leagues and staff that we also have written testimony submitted by 
Steven  Caldwell  from  the  GAO  and  we’ll  have  that  available  and 
obviously the hearing, like all hearings, we’ll make the record open 
for  two  weeks  post  the  hearing  for  additional  questions  that  we 
might  propose  to  Commandant  Allen  and  to  Mr.  Caldwell.  Before 
we  get  to  you  Admiral,  if  I  could  make  some  remarks  and  then  I 
am  sure  my  colleague,  Senator  Snowe,  if  she  arrives  in  time,  will 
want  to  make  some  comments  and  then  we’ll  turn  it  over  to  you. 
I’d  like  to  thank  everyone  for  joining  us  here  today  because  I  do 
believe that this important hearing on the Coast Guard and its Fis-
cal Year 2008 budget request is critically important. 

Admiral Allen, I think you have been now before this Committee 
numerous  times  even  though  your  tenure  as  Commandant  has 
been brief. 

But as you know from those time periods in your previous service 
that  America  expects  a  lot  out  of  the  Coast  Guard.  You  are  con-
stantly  being  asked  to  balance  the  increased  demands  of  an  evolv-
ing  homeland  security  mission  while  ensuring  that  the  traditional 
missions are not cast aside. 

When  confronting  the  challenges  facing  the  Coast  Guard  and  as 
we look at your budget, we must keep in mind that enormous chal-
lenge of mission balance and the fact that security is a critical com-
ponent of that and probably no place knows that better than Wash-
ington  State  where  we  have  one  of  the  busiest  and  most  complex 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

2 

waterways  in  the  world—that  is  combined  with  Seattle  and  Ta-
coma,  we’re  the  nation’s  third  busiest  port.  Last  year  more  than  4 
million  cargo  containers  moved  through  our  ports.  Seattle  is  also 
one  of  our  busiest  ports  as  we  move  almost  26  million  people  and 
11  million  vehicles  annually  on  our  ferry  system  around  Puget 
Sound. 

So  when  we  talk  about  securing  our  borders  and  screening  our 
communities,  it  isn’t  an  afterthought,  it’s  a  critical  component  of 
the  day-to-day  lives  and  business  operations  in  the  Northwest  as 
it is in many ports around the country. 

So  we  need  to  be  sure  that  the  Coast  Guard  has  adequate  re-
sources  to  protect  our  ports  and  commerce  from  the  threat  of  at-
tack. While we depend on the Coast Guard for security, we also de-
pend heavily on the Coast Guard to meet its traditional safety and 
stewardship missions. 

In Washington State, our crowded waterways make the threat of 
an oil spill particularly high. The Coast Guard plays a critical role 
in  preventing  and  responding  to  oil  spills,  and  I’m  obviously  con-
cerned  that  we  need  to  do  more  in  this  area  to  increase  our  safety 
net. 

I  want  to  make  sure  that  when  we  get  to  the  Q&A  that  we  talk 
about the Oil Pollution Act of 1990 and ways that we need to make 
sure that the increased salvage and oil spill response equipment is 
there for our Nation’s coastline. 

Admiral  no  organization,  as  I  said  earlier  does  more  with  fewer 
resources than the United States Coast Guard, and I want to com-
mend  you  for  those  efforts.  Having  said  that  though,  I  am  con-
cerned  that  the  funding  request  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year 
2008  budget—whether  it  is  sufficient  to  meet  all  of  the  needs  that 
we have outlined. 

Our  request  of  $8.7  billion  is  a  flat  line  increase,  only  $100  mil-
lion  over  the  Fiscal  Year  2007  enacted  levels  and  with  those  re-
sources,  we  will  want  to  be  very  detailed  about  exactly  how  mis-
sions, critical missions, of the Coast Guard are going to be met. 

In  particular,  there  are  a  number  of  areas  in  this  year’s  budget 
request  that  concern  me  and  I  hope  that  you  will  be  able  to  shed 
some light on these in your testimony. 

First of all, Deepwater and Rescue 21. Of course the single most, 
largest  acquisition  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  $8.7  billion  2008  request, 
is  the  $836  million  request  for  the  Deepwater  Program.  This  Sub-
committee  has  already  had  one  hearing,  where  my  colleagues  and 
I  have  voiced  grave  concerns  about  Deepwater,  its  oversight  and 
the  impact  to  the  U.S.  taxpayer.  I  know  Senator  Snowe  will  have 
her own comments and thoughts on that, but she has co-sponsored 
S.  924  to  reform  the  Deepwater  Program  because  I  believe  that  it 
is absolutely essential that we ensure the greatest competition and 
transparency  in  the  Deepwater  Program  and  the  Coast  Guard  has 
the  personnel  and  tools  to  manage  a  contract  of  this  size.  The 
Coast  Guard  needs  to  complete  its  mission  safely  and  effectively 
and the taxpayers need to get what they are paying for. 

Additionally, we need to apply a similar dose of transparency and 
oversight  to  Rescue  21.  This  critical  upgrade  of  the  Coast  Guard’s 
communication  system  is  vital  to  locating  and  rescuing  stranded 
mariners.  Unfortunately  though,  the  program  has  suffered  from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

3 

cost  overruns  and  program  delays.  It  is  now  scheduled  for  comple-
tion in 2011 instead of 2006. The Coast Guard cost estimate is now 
$730  million  above  the  original  plan.  In  addition,  I  hear  that  the 
outstanding  contract  negotiations  may  cause  the  cost  of  Rescue  21 
to climb even higher. 

I’m also concerned and disappointed to see that once again, there 
is not a request for the funding of the Polar Icebreaker Fleet. I see 
the  Coast  Guard  plans  to  rely  on  the  National  Science  Foundation 
for  reimbursement  of  the  operation  and  maintenance  cost  of  these 
vessels  even  though  the  Memorandum  of  Agreement  that  ensures 
this  reimbursement  might  not  even  be  signed  this  year.  We  con-
sider  this  a  huge  problem  and  I  think  that  is  why  we  wrote  into 
language  in  Maritime  Transportation  Act  of  2006,  a  requirement 
that the Coast Guard provide to Congress with a long-term recapi-
talization plan for those Polar Icebreakers. 

The  SAFE  Port  Act  required  the  Coast  Guard  to  establish  inter-
agency operation command centers at our highest risk ports within 
3  years.  I  see  little  to  no  progress  in  this  year’s  budget  to  attempt 
to meet this goal and this concerns me greatly. 

Finally,  the  Coast  Guard’s  2008  budget  recommends  realigning 
its  five  deployable  Special  Forces  units  into  a  Deployable  Oper-
ations Group requiring a base reallocation under the Coast Guard’s 
operating budget. Well, I can see that the reorganization may help 
streamline  operations.  I  also  want  to  make  sure  that  there  are  no 
unintended  or  negative  consequences  to  this  redeployment.  I  am 
looking  forward  to  hearing  your  reasoning  for  this  reorganization 
and how we monitor its effectiveness and the potential hurdles that 
we may face. 

Before  I  turn  things  over  to  Senator  Snowe,  let  me  close  by  just 
thanking Senator Snowe for attending today and Admiral, for your 
presence here at today’s hearing. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  a  critical  resource  issue  for  our  Nation  and 
it’s  imperative  that  the  budget  of  the  Coast  Guard  and  the  Coast 
Guard  itself  deliver  on  these  priorities  for  our  Nation.  We  must 
provide  both  the  oversight  to  prevent  costly  and  dangerous  delays 
in  the  procurement  of  assets  but  also  ensuring  that  the  American 
taxpayer  gets  the  resources  it  needs  for  the  mission  of  the  Coast 
Guard. 

With that, I will turn it over to my colleague Senator Snowe. 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you  very  much,  Madam  Chair  and  I  ap-
preciate the fact that you’ve called for this oversight hearing on the 
Coast Guard budget request for Fiscal Year 2008. Obviously this is 
a  very  important  hearing  to  address  the  funding  requirements  for 
the  Coast  Guard,  and  I  look  forward  to  that  critical  review  here 
today with the Commandant. 

Let  me  also  say  it’s  difficult  if  not  impossible,  under  current  cir-
cumstances, to deliberate on a blueprint for spending for the Coast 
Guard  without  recalling  the  flaws  in  the  Deepwater  Acquisition 
Program. Back in February, we met in this room to discuss the im-
mense  challenges  the  Coast  Guard  confronts  in  effectively  exe-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

cuting what I still believe to be one of the Nation’s most vital mod-
ernization efforts. 

4 

So  today  provides  us  with  an  additional  critical  opportunity  to 
ensure  that  we  as  a  Committee  leave  no  stone  unturned  in  ensur-
ing the mismanagement of the past is addressed for the future. 

We  also  recognize  the  significance  of  a  properly  executed  Deep-
water  Program  for  the  continued  viability  of  the  Coast  Guard. 
There is no question that we must move from point A, which is the 
Coast Guard with woefully outdated, outmoded assets to a point B, 
with the outstanding men and women of the service have the ships 
and helicopters and equipment commensurate with not only the in-
creased  duties  but  also  with  their  admirable  skill  and  profes-
sionalism. 

As  we  meet  here  today,  clearly  the  Coast  Guard  still  finds  itself 
in  desperate  need  of  those  assets.  The  fact  remains  that  the  men 
and  women  of  your  service,  Commandant,  continue  to  serve  our 
Nation  aboard  ships  that  comprise  the  third  oldest  naval  fleet  in 
the world. We’ve already invested more than $2.3 billion in this re-
capitalization effort. 

As  you  stated  yesterday,  Admiral  Allen,  the  Coast  Guard  must 
redefine  its  responsibilities,  its  industry  relationships  and  frankly, 
its performance in managing this monumental program. 

I appreciate the fact that as Commandant, you have accepted re-
sponsibility even though all the decisions that resulted in the seri-
ous  flaws  in  the  Deepwater  Program—all  of  the  deficiencies—pre-
date  your  tenure  as  Commandant.  I  am  aware  of  the  recent  steps 
that you’ve taken to place Deepwater back on track. 

Your announcement yesterday that the Coast Guard will assume 
the  lead  systems  integrator  role  is  an  appropriate,  if  long  overdue 
step  toward  ridding  the  Coast  Guard  and  the  government  of  the 
self-serving practices of the contractors. 

But  this  is  just  the  beginning  of  the  process  and  if  there  is  con-
tinued vigorous scrutiny and skepticism from this Ranking Member 
and  the  Chair  of  this  Committee,  I  hope  you  understand  it’s  with 
good reason. 

I  know  you  respect  the  spirit  in  which  I  say  that  until  I  see 
proud  new  and  fully  functional  ships  displaying  the  Coast  Guard’s 
racing  stripe  as  they  patrol  our  shores,  I  will  do  everything  in  my 
power  not  just  to  watch  your  service  pursue  these  assets  but  to 
guide your hands. 

To bolster your efforts to gain control of Deepwater, as the Chair 
indicated, she and I have introduced legislation that will eliminate 
the  contractors’  ability  to  certify  their  own  work,  mandate  inde-
pendent  third  party  assessments  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  decisions, 
and  provide  regular  reports  to  Congress  specifically  outlining  how 
Deepwater  funds  are  being  spent,  when  assets  will  be  delivered, 
and how those assets will facilitate completion of the Coast Guard’s 
missions. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  requested  over  $836  million  to  extend  the 
Deepwater  Program  into  the  Fiscal  Year  2008.  This  funding  must 
be  accompanied  by  legislation  that  we  have  introduced  that  en-
sures the Coast Guard will adhere to the highest standards of over-
sight without deviation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

5 

Today  we  also  must  increase  the  scope  of  our  discussion  to  re-
view  the  ongoing  challenges  and  budget  needs  facing  the  military 
service as a whole. As we all well know, the Coast Guard is tasked 
with protecting our shores from threats, natural and manmade, in-
tentional  and  accidental,  foreign  and  domestic.  This  military  serv-
ice is the cornerstone of our national security and we would be re-
miss if we failed to provide the Coast Guard with the adequate as-
sets  and  resources  to  carry  out  the  multitude  of  missions  we  have 
assigned  to  it  and  that  it  has  accomplished  so  admirably  over  the 
years. 

The  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  request  contains  other  items  that 
raise considerable concern as well. For the third year in a row, the 
Administration  request  reduces  funding  for  domestic  fisheries  en-
forcement,  this  year  by  more  than  $50  million.  For  the  third  con-
secutive  year  as  well,  the  observed  rate  of  compliance  with  fishery 
regulations  during  at-sea  boardings  was  below  the  Coast  Guard’s 
goal of 97 percent. 

I would suggest that this is no coincidence. To improve stock sta-
tus, help prevent overfishing and maintain a level playing field for 
fishermen,  we  must  ensure  enforcement  teams  have  the  funding 
they require. I do not see that taking place under the current budg-
et  structure  and  we  cannot  reasonably  expect  the  Coast  Guard  to 
continue  to  do  more  while  we  perpetually  provide  them  with  less. 
Our  Committee  must  ensure  the  Coast  Guard  is  well  positioned 
and  prepared  to  meet  our  future  maritime  challenges  and  threats 
head  on  and  to  successfully  fulfill  its  diverse  yet  critical  missions. 
While  the  Coast  Guard  desperately  requires  additional  resources, 
the job of this oversight Committee is to maintain a proper balance 
between  equipping  the  service  in  a  way  that  it  can  carry  out  its 
vital missions while protecting the investment of the American tax-
payer. 

At  today’s  hearing,  I  expect  to  learn  how  best  to  facilitate  that 
goal. Again, Admiral Allen, I’d like to thank you for testifying here 
today.  I  have  been  impressed  by  your  leadership,  your  increased 
focus  on  transparency  and  your  candid  and  forthright  assessment 
of  the  issues  confronting  the  Coast  Guard  and  I  look  forward  to 
hearing  your  testimony  on  the  roles  and  missions  of  this  critical 
service  and  your  plans  to  better  align  the  Coast  Guard’s  disparate 
missions and assets under a streamlined command structure. 

I  want  to  thank  the  Chair  as  well,  for  her  leadership  on  this 
issue  and  of  course,  on  the  legislation  that  she  introduced  and  I 
joined  that  will  help  to  streamline  the  approach  and  address  the 
fundamental issues with Deepwater for now and for the future. 

Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Senator Snowe. 
Senator  Stevens,  would  you  like  to  make  an  opening  statement? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Yes,  thank  you,  Madam  Chairman.  As  many 
of you know, Alaska has half the coastline in the United States and 
the  Coast  Guard  has  a  very  daunting  role  of  patrolling  that  area 
and particularly taking it out to the 200 mile limit—over three and 
a half million square miles. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

6 

Whether it is rescuing fisherman in the icy waters of the Bering 
Sea  or  flying  Medivac  missions  in  the  Southeast,  the  Coast  Guard 
has played a critical role in saving many lives in Alaska. As a mat-
ter  of  fact,  we  used  to  call  them  midwives  of  Alaska  because  they 
delivered  so  many  babies  there  for  a  while.  The  Coast  Guard  Sta-
tion  at  Kodiak,  the  old  former  navy  base,  is  the  largest  Coast 
Guard station in the United States now. 

On  February  8,  just  2  months  before  this  hearing,  the  Coast 
Guard  decommissioned  its  oldest  ship,  the  Coast  Guard  Cutter 
STORIS,  which  I  had  the  honor  of  traveling  on  for  a  while.  It  was 
home  ported  in  Kodiak,  Alaska  and  it  was  over  64  years  of  age.  It 
was a wonderful vessel. 

Taking  its  place  now  as  the 

‘‘queen  of  the  fleet’’  is  the 
ACUSHNET. The ACUSHNET which is home ported in Ketchikan 
celebrated  its  63rd birthday  on  February  5.  We  look  forward  to  the 
day  when  the  ACUSHNET  will  be  replaced  by  one  of  the  state-of- 
the-art  National  Security  Cutters  that  have  been  developed  under 
the Deepwater Program. 

But I am concerned about the recent reports of cost overruns and 
delays  in  that  program.  Many  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  existing  fleet 
of vessels and aircraft are nearing or have reached the end of their 
useful  service  lives.  Modernizing  the  Coast  Guard  and  replacing 
these vessels and particularly the aircraft should remain a top pri-
ority. 

Admiral Allen, I think it’s critical to get the program back on the 
right track and I look forward to trying to work with you to do so. 
Thank you very much for appearing today, sir. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Senator  Stevens.  Admiral  Allen, 
again welcome. We’re glad that you are here this afternoon to give 
testimony about the budget and I think you’ve heard my colleague’s 
concerns specifically about Deepwater, which I am sure will be part 
of your testimony but welcome and thank you for attending today’s 
hearing. 

STATEMENT OF ADMIRAL THAD W. ALLEN, COMMANDANT, 
DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY, U.S. COAST GUARD 
Admiral ALLEN. Thank you, Madam Chairman, Ranking Member 
Snowe and Senator Stevens. I have a statement for the record and 
I’ll make a short oral statement to open with if that’s OK. 

I  was  telling  my  staff  before  I  got  here  today,  I  didn’t  know  if 
I  should  prepare  an  opening  statement  for  an  authorization  hear-
ing,  a  budget  hearing,  or  a  Deepwater  hearing  and  I  think  you’ve 
told  me  we  need  to  talk  about  everything  and  I  think  that’s  very 
appropriate,  given  the  external  environment,  what’s  going  on  with 
the Coast Guard right now. 

I’d  like  to  start  with  a  little  context  piece  if  I  could,  about  what 
we  are  trying  to  do  in  the  Coast  Guard  right  now  because  it  not 
only  involves  Deepwater,  it  involves  mission  balance,  the  budget 
and all the issues you’ve raised in your opening statements. 

When  I  became  the  Commandant  less  than  a  year  ago,  there 
were  five  things  I  thought  I  needed  to  do  to  position  the  Coast 
Guard  to  be  successful  moving  forward  in  a  very,  very  challenging 
environment  with  increased  mission  emphasis  following  9/11  and 
following  Katrina  and  the  all  hazards  threat  environment  that  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

live in. I thought it was most important to focus on mission execu-
tion. 

7 

After Katrina and the enormous pride that the Nation had in the 
Coast  Guard,  I  thought  it  was  very,  very  important  that  we  not 
take  our  eye  off  the  ball  and  that  we  have  an  organization  out 
there  that  could  keep  up  with  the  expectations  of  the  American 
public  and  our  own  expectations  of  what  we  expect  of  ourselves  as 
a  service.  But  in  order  do  that,  we  need  the  right  force  structure, 
we need to be able to effectively command and control those forces, 
we  need  to  have  a  mission  support  organization  that  makes  sure 
that  those  assets  are  ready  when  you  need  them  in  the  hands  of 
the  people  and  properly  trained.  We  also  have  to  have  them  sup-
ported by business processes that make sense. 

In  a  lot  of  those  areas,  over  the  last  few  years  in  the  Coast 
Guard, while we have made progress, there are areas where we are 
not as well positioned to move forward as we should have been. In 
February,  in  my  State  of  the  Coast  Guard  speech,  I  told  our  men 
and  women  the  external  environment  is  changing  and  the  Coast 
Guard  has  to  change.  In  fact,  a  number  of  changes  were  initiated 
right  after  I  took  command  last  May  that  impact  what  is  going  on 
with Deepwater, mission balance, and so forth and I will make that 
point in just a second. 

The  bottom  line  from  where  I  sit  as  the  Commandant  of  Coast 
Guard is to make sure that we have a competent organization from 
top to bottom that is organized correctly in terms of force structure 
and  how  we  do  things  to  be  able  to  sustain  the  mission  execution 
the American public expects of us. 

To  start  with,  we  need  to  know  where  we’re  going  in  the  Coast 
Guard  and  I  remember  at  a  hearing  almost  a  year  ago,  we  talked 
about  strategy  and  whether  or  not  incremental  changes  after  9/11 
or after Katrina are the right way to manage the maritime environ-
ment, a maritime security regime for this country. We recently put 
out  a  maritime  strategy  that  is  intended  to  be  the  capstone  docu-
ment  during  my  tenure  as  Commandant  about  what  is  important 
for safety, stewardship and security. They all have to be in balance. 
They are three legs of a stool. One cannot predominate and I agree 
with  you,  mission  balance  is  very  important.  We  can’t  focus  on  se-
curity at the exclusion of our other missions. 

Once  we  have  the  strategy  set,  we  need  a  source  to  the  strategy 
and that means budget, rulemaking, international agendas at IMO, 
legislation  that  needs  to  be  focused  on  what  it  is  we  are  trying  to 
accomplish  in  terms  of  buying  down  risk,  increasing  safety  and  to 
be more effective stewards. 

So  what  I  have  tried  to  do  in  my  first  year  as  Commandant  is 
take a pause, if you will and take a look, get the strategy right and 
then see how those pieces come together. 

When you do that, you need to make sure that legislation is cued 
up,  that  it  will  be  able  to  result  in  rulemaking  that  we’ll  be  able 
to buy down risk in ports but that the budget that you are submit-
ting  supports  that  also.  If  you  are  successful  legislatively  but  you 
don’t have the resources, you’re not going to be effective. 

So  what  I’ve  tried  to  do  is  put  all  that  together  in  a  comprehen-
sive  plan.  That  was  not  possible  walking  in  the  door,  so  what  you 
have  before  you  today  is  a  current  services  budget.  I  will  make  no 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

8 

argument  against  that.  That  budget  was  almost  in  place  when  I 
took  over.  I  didn’t  think  it  was  appropriate  to  try  and  jam  a  lot  of 
things into the budget without having given it proper thought. 

So  Fiscal  Year  2008  is  somewhat  of  a  contemplative  reorganiza-
tion  focus  year  for  the  Coast  Guard,  get  the  strategy  right,  come 
to  you  all,  have  the  policy  discussions  that  we  need  to  and  then 
move  forward  having  legislation,  rulemaking  and  budget  proposals 
linked  together.  There  are  places  where  there  are  no  funds  re-
quested this year. We surely expect in future years to be requesting 
budgets, especially for command centers and things like that. 

There  had  been  several  comments  made  about  Deepwater.  Yes-
terday,  I  held  a  press  conference  and  made  an  announcement  re-
garding six strategic decisions that I had made in consultation with 
the CEO’s of Northrop Grumman and Lockheed Martin. 

I  have  met  and  communicated  frequently  with  Bob  Stevens  and 
Ron Sugar and these are decisions that we collectively came to be-
cause  there  is  an  essential  part  of  Deepwater  that  needs  to  be  un-
derstood  as  we  move  ahead  with  the  conversation  and  that’s  that 
there  was  work  in  progress  that  if  stopped,  would  cause  cost  and 
schedule implications that would not allow us to have assets online 
when  some  of  these  older  ships  start  getting  to  the  point  where 
they  cannot  be  operated  and  we  may  face  a  gap  in  coverage  even 
more  significant  than  we  have  right  now.  To  that  end,  we  all 
agreed that the Coast Guard had to play the major role in leading 
systems integrations. 

The  reason  we  had  to  do  that  is  that  while  ostensibly  when  the 
contract  was  awarded,  the  Integrated  Coast  Guard  System  will  be 
systems  integrator  for  the  systems  of  systems  related  to  cutters, 
aircraft and sensors. 

There is a larger Coast Guard out there. We have command cen-
ters, we have small boats, we have polar icebreakers, we have buoy 
tenders and the issue of who integrates the Deepwater System into 
the larger Coast Guard System with a capital S, was always silent. 
I  think  for  the  reasons  listed  in  the  reports  from  the  oversight 
groups,  from  you  all  as  we’ve  had  this  discussion  and  in  addition 
to the fact that we need to integrate Deepwater into the rest of the 
Coast Guard, nobody can do that except the Coast Guard. 

We will move forward as the systems integrator. We will use the 
contractor  where  it  is  appropriate  but  the  Coast  Guard  will  have 
the  lead  in  making  those  decisions.  Second,  logistics  support.  An 
assumption  was  made  going  in  that  we  would  consider  integrated 
logistic  support  provided  through  Integrated  Coast  Guard  Systems 
as a logistics provider. 

Again,  understanding 

to  be 
transitioned  into  a  larger  Coast  Guard  maintenance  and  logistics 
system,  the  Coast  Guard  must  be  the  lead  logistics  integrator,  the 
second point we agreed to. 

these  platforms  have 

Third  point,  external  verification  of  construction  and  work.  You 
mentioned  this  earlier  in  your  statements.  We  are  moving  forward 
with a Fast Response Cutter B solicitation next month in May. We 
will  class  that  by  American  Bureau  shipping  as  needed.  We  will 
have an external certification as we move forward. 

Fourth,  the  National  Security  Cutter.  We  hope  to  have  the  final 
design  details  for  the  structural  changes  that  needed  to  exceed— 

that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

9 

to meet the fatigue life standards that we need to operate that cut-
ter for 30 years done next month. Once we get the third NSC base-
line  on  what  changes  are  needed,  we  then  can  go  back  and  see 
what  changes  need  to  be  made  to  the  first  and  second  hulls.  We 
are prepared to move forward as fast as we can. We have the com-
mitment to resolve these issues with our industry partners. 

Fifth,  for  all  assets  that  are  in  production  right  now,  we  have 
agreed  at  some  point  when  we  demonstrated  first  article  perform-
ance—in  other  words,  the  asset  is  performing  as  it  was  intended 
to  specification.  We  need  to  question  then  whether  or  not  there  is 
added  value  to  execute  that  contract  through  Integrated  Coast 
Guard  Systems  and  maybe  it  should  be  placed  directly  with  the 
original  equipment  manufacturer.  In  other  words,  we  are  moving 
ICGS  as  the  middleman  with  the  additional  layer  and  the  cost  as-
sociated with that. 

So  we  will  look  at  every  platform  that’s  in  production  and  see 
whether  or  not  that  needs  to  be  placed  directly  with  the  manufac-
turer  at  a  certain  point  in  production.  But  we  need  to  get  through 
the  first  initial  items  and  make  sure  we  have  performance  dem-
onstrated with each one of those assets. 

Finally,  we  cannot  be  effective  moving  forward,  meeting  the  re-
sponsibilities  that  I  have  in  the  Coast  Guard,  the  responsibilities 
we  have  to  you,  the  oversight  committees,  the  Inspector  General, 
the  Goverment  Accountability  Office,  unless  I  am  personally  in-
volved  in  this.  I  have  the  commitment  of  both  CEOs  of  Lockheed 
Martin  and  Northrop  Grumman  moving  forward  as  long  as  we 
have a contractual relationship that we will meet at least quarterly 
as a Senior Executive Group and provide personal oversight to how 
we move forward on this. 

The challenges associated with Deepwater, the challenges associ-
ated with strategy and authorization and the challenges associated 
with  the  budget  all  come  against  the  backdrop  of  what  I  call  the 
tyranny of the present in Washington. That is the day-to-day lead-
ership and management of the Coast Guard and this first year has 
not been without its challenges. 

We were devastated by the loss of our shipmates on the HEALY. 
You’ve held an oversight hearing on that. We are tackling the prob-
lems  associated  with  that.  We  lost  a  crewman  of  our  MSST  in  Se-
attle.  There  was  a  deploy  to  Seattle  not  long  ago—we  need  to  look 
into that. 

We need to understand where we have vulnerabilities inside the 
organization  because  maybe  we  have  grown  fast  and  maybe  we 
have  young  people  out  there  operating  in  environments  they’ve 
never operated before and it’s my responsibility as Commandant to 
keep them safe. 

We  just  finished  the  top  to  bottom  review  of  the  Coast  Guard 
Academy, where we laid out a comprehensive plan to move forward 
and  redirect  some  of  the  energy  that  has  been  expended  to  the 
Academy  more  to  character  development  and  getting  all  assets  of 
the Academy—the athletic programs, the faculty and the cadet bar-
racks  involved  and  everybody  understanding  what  it  takes  to 
produce an officer. 

We  have  over  100  line  items  that  came  out  of  that  study.  We 
have  placed  that  study  online  and  it  is  open  to  the  American  pub-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

10 

lic.  We  are  being  completely  transparent  about  it.  I’ve  charged  the 
Board  of  Trustees  of  the  Coast  Guard  Academy  to  move  out  and 
give  us  an  execution  plan  on  how  to  tackle  the  recommendations 
that were made. 

I would have one request of the Committee. There is a legislative 
requirement  for  a  Board  of  Congressional  Visitors  at  the  Coast 
Guard  Academy  and  I  would  like  to  work  with  your  staff  to  see  if 
we  can’t  re-energize  that  and  get  that  back  up  and  operating.  I 
think  that  it  is  very,  very  important  that  the  Congressional  Board 
of  Visitors  play  an  active  role  moving  forward  with  the  Coast 
Guard Academy. 

So  against  that  backdrop,  thank  you  for  having  me  here  today. 

I’d be glad to answer any questions you may have of me. 

[The prepared statement of Admiral Allen follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ADMIRAL THAD W. ALLEN, COMMANDANT, DEPARTMENT OF 

HOMELAND SECURITY, U.S. COAST GUARD 

Introduction 

Madam  Chairman  and  distinguished  members  of  the  subcommittee:  Good  morn-
ing,  I  am  pleased  to  appear  before  the  Subcommittee  today  to  discuss  the  Presi-
dent’s Fiscal Year 2008 budget request for the Coast Guard. 

Before  I  begin,  I  would  like  to  take  this  opportunity  to  explain  how  I  view  the 
roles and missions of the Coast Guard, as well as the direction in which I am taking 
the Service. 
Roles and Missions 

The  Coast  Guard  is  the  principal  Federal  service  charged  with  maritime  safety, 
security,  and  stewardship.  The  Coast  Guard  protects  the  Nation’s  vital  interests— 
the safety and security of the Nation’s citizenry, its natural and economic resources, 
and  the  territorial  integrity  of  its  maritime  borders;  it  operates  wherever  those  in-
terests  may  be  at  risk—the  navigable  waters  of  the  United  States,  along  the  Na-
tion’s coasts, and in international waters. These roles and missions have accrued to 
the  Coast  Guard  over  two  centuries  of  service  because  they  serve  a  collective  good 
and,  significantly,  a  single  Federal  maritime  force  can  most  efficiently  and  effec-
tively accomplish them. More importantly, these roles and missions are converging. 
The Nation’s response to increasing pressures on the Nation’s waterways and mari-
time resources and expanding external security threats is having a profound impact 
on the development of new management regimes for the U.S. maritime domain and 
borders.  In  this  time  of  dynamic  change,  the  Coast  Guard’s  multi-mission  nature, 
which  has  always  been  a  strong  value  proposition  to  the  Nation,  is  taking  on  new 
dimensions and significance. For example: 

layered defense of the Nation. 

new initiatives and standards for, vessel and facility security. 

• The Coast Guard’s work in marine safety is closely coupled with, and reinforces 
• Its  waterways  management  capacity  and  expertise  are  essential  to  maritime 
preparedness  and  port  resilience  (i.e.,  the  ability  to  restore  rapidly  commerce 
and economic stability after massive damage, intentional or natural). 
• Its  Combating  Maritime  Terrorism  missions  and  operations  contribute  to  the 
• The  mission  to  protect  marine  environment  and  resources  complements  the 
safety  and  security  missions  and  ensures  that  uses  of  the  Nation’s  waters  and 
resources are balanced and sustainable. 
• The sovereignty enforced by the Coast Guard secures the Nation’s maritime bor-
ders  from  drug  and  alien  smuggling,  contraband,  illegal  migrants,  and  robbery 
of the Nation’s natural resources. 
• All  Coast  Guard  forces  can  respond  to  natural  disasters  and  emergencies,  scal-
ing up to a Katrina-level response when communities are in danger, regardless 
of the cause. 

In  addition  to  these  well  known  missions,  in  moments  of  international  crisis,  the 
Coast Guard can flow non-redundant and unique war fighting capabilities to the De-
partment of Defense. During Operation Iraqi Freedom, the Coast Guard, along with 
U.S.  Navy  and  coalition  naval  forces,  participated  in  maritime  interception  oper-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

11 

ations,  port  security  and  defense  operations,  coastal  security  patrols.  As  well,  the 
Coast  Guard  enforced  U.N.  sanctions  prior  to  hostilities  and  prevented  the  move-
ment  of  Iraqi  military  forces  during  and  following  hostilities.  Since  the  cessation  of 
major combat operations, Coast Guard forces, along with coalition allies, have main-
tained  the  integrity  of  Iraqi  territorial  seas  from  foreign  encroachment,  have  pro-
vided  security  of  vital  Iraqi  maritime  infrastructure  from  insurgent  threats,  and 
have  conducted  training  of  Iraqi  maritime  security  forces  while  ensuring  the  unin-
terrupted  flow  of  the  sea  line  of  communications  to  coalition  forces  deployed  in  the 
Central Commands area of operations. 

The  maritime  border  is  unique  and  complex.  It  is  a  system  that  is  at  once  an 
international  border,  an  international  highway,  a  coastal  beltway,  a  playground  for 
boating, and a site for a variety of economic enterprises. It requires that the Nation 
understand that its national maritime interests cannot be pursued in isolation from 
one  another.  As  such,  there  are  eleven  specific  statutorily-mandated  Coast  Guard 
mission-programs.1 Each directly supports the roles of safety, security, and steward-
ship.  Table  1  shows  the  primary  alignment  of  Coast  Guard  mission-programs  to 
these roles. 

Saving lives & Protecting 

Safety 

Property 

Security 

Establishing & Maintaining a 
secure maritime system while 

facilitating its use for the national 

good 

Stewardship 

Managing the sustainable & 

effective use of its inland, coastal 
and ocean waters & resources for 

the future 

Search and Rescue 
Marine Safety 

Drug Interdiction 
Migrant Interdiction 
Ports, Waterways & Coastal 
Security 
Other Law Enforcement 
Defense readiness 

Marine Environmental Protection 
Aids to Navigation 
Living Marine Resources 

Ice Operations 

Table 1 

‘‘Strategic Trident’’—Coast Guard Force Structure 

An  important  first  step  in  aligning  Coast  Guard  operational  forces  involves  the 
development  of  a  layered  security  posture  in  the  maritime  domain  to  meet  all  haz-
ards and all threats. 

Multi-mission  Shore  Based  Forces.  The  Coast  Guard  has  aligned  its  shore-based 
operations  in  the  establishment  of  interagency-enabled  Sectors,  unifying  operations 
in the Nation’s ports. This consolidation of these shore-based forces at the port level 
into  Sector  commands  provides  a  single  point  of  accountability  for  operations,  uni-
fies  resource  allocation,  and  enables  risk-based  decisionmaking  tools,  thus  focusing 
Coast Guard capabilities and competencies to identify and mitigate threats. 

Maritime Patrol and Interdiction Forces. The centerpiece of the Coast Guard’s fu-
ture  capabilities  is  the  Integrated  Deepwater  System,  revised  to  reflect  post-9/11 
mission  requirements  such  as  enhanced  intelligence  gathering  and  handling  capa-
bilities.  The  Integrated  Deepwater  System  concept  was  designed  to  secure  the  Na-
tion’s  maritime  borders.  This  acquisition  will  integrate  the  Coast  Guard  maritime 
presence and patrol capability, especially with respect to extended offshore security 
operations,  thereby  allowing  the  Coast  Guard  to  meet  and  defeat  threats  at  the 
greatest distance from the Nation’s shores. 

Deployable  Specialized  Forces.  The  final  piece  to  the  Coast  Guard  force  structure 
is the effective employment of deployable forces. Deployable units will face increased 
threat  levels,  respond  to  incidents  of  national  significance,  and  form  into  adaptive 
force  packages  within  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security.  The  Coast  Guard  has 
long  maintained  teams  and  detachments  that  are  deployable,  but  ‘‘stovepiped’’ 
among  different  mission  areas.  In  the  future,  these  teams  will  be  placed  under  one 
command, a force structure designed to integrate with the Department of Homeland 
Security  and  other  Federal  and  state  agencies,  to  create  a  more  agile,  flexible  force 
that  can  deploy  in  advance  of  or  after  an  event  to  mitigate  any  threats  or  hazards. 
This new force structure will be a more efficient and effective means of deployment 
in  a  post-Katrina  environment.  Additionally,  it  will  offer  the  much  needed  oppor-
tunity to develop departmental doctrine to support adaptive force packaging for inci-
dent response or surge operations. 

1 The term ‘‘mission-program’’ is used by the Coast Guard to identify one of its 11 statutorily 
mandated  missions  that  guide  Coast  Guard  budget  presentations  as  well  as  strategic  planning, 
programming and performance. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

Organizational Alignment 

12 

Past  events  have  revealed  the  critical  role  the  Coast  Guard  plays  in  providing 
safety,  security,  and  stewardship  of  national  maritime  interests.  The  sinking  of  the 
TITANIC laid the foundation for the Coast Guard’s premier role in maritime safety. 
The EXXON VALDEZ oil spill was the catalyst to the Coast Guard’s much improved 
and  highly  visible  maritime  stewardship  responsibilities.  The  response  to  the  ter-
rorist attacks of September 11th and subsequent participation in the Global War on 
Terrorism have clearly showcased the Coast Guard’s key role in providing vital mar-
itime security. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  transfer  to  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  was  a  sig-
nificant  step  forward  in  providing  for  a  capability  that  can  respond  to  the  evolving 
demand  to  protect  the  homeland.  Thus,  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  adapt  continu-
ously in order to sustain and enhance its overall mission execution is of paramount 
importance. As a result, the Coast Guard is undertaking an organization-wide effort 
to  restructure  and  realign  command-and-control  and  mission-support  (including  or-
ganizational structures, human resources, maintenance, logistics, financial manage-
ment,  acquisition  oversight,  and  information  systems)  to  ensure  more  effective  and 
efficient  mission  execution.  Efforts  currently  underway  include  the  consolidation  of 
all acquisitions management functions to ensure the optimal balance of contract and 
administrative  personnel  between  each  major  acquisition.  Additionally,  alignment 
between the command and control structure within Coast Guard Headquarters and 
field  unit  organization  is  being  imposed  to  obtain  proper  oversight  of  Coast  Guard 
functions and ensure optimal mission balance. 

This  alignment  will  result  in  purposeful,  service-wide  transformation  and  en-
hancement  designed  to  better  enable  the  Coast  Guard  to  meet  the  current  and  fu-
ture needs of the Nation. The Coast Guard will become a more agile, adaptive, and 
responsive organization capable of working effectively with its interagency partners. 
Furthermore,  overall  Coast  Guard  mission  execution  will  be  enhanced;  it  will  be 
even  better  prepared  to  fulfill  its  duty  to  the  Nation.  This  new  operational  frame-
work will facilitate the timely and accurate flow of information and direction among 
the  strategic,  operational  and  tactical  levels  of  mission  execution.  A  new  command 
and  control  system  will  evolve  and,  like  the  Coast  Guard  itself,  will  be  more  agile, 
adaptive, and responsive. 
The Coast Guard’s Strategy 

The Coast Guard Strategy for maritime safety, security, and stewardship describes 
how the Coast Guard will work to safeguard the Nation against all threats, hazards, 
and  challenges  in  the  maritime  domain,  today  and  in  the  future.  It  discusses  the 
Coast  Guard’s  enduring  roles,  future  challenges  and  threats,  as  well  as  a  systems 
approach for improving maritime governance. From these foundations, the Strategy 
presents  strategic  priorities  that  build  on  the  Coast  Guard’s  strengths  and  best 
focus its capabilities to serve the Department of Homeland Security and the Nation. 
This Strategy is shaped by the laws, executive orders, international conventions and 
agreements, and other guidance that determine U.S. maritime policy (Figure 1). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

13 

The Strategy takes significant shape from the National Strategy for Maritime Se-
curity  (NSMS),  the  President’s  Ocean  Action  Plan  (OAP),  National  and  Homeland 
Security  Presidential  Directives  (NSPD/HSPD),  and  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security goals and priorities. Additionally, it is the product of the Coast Guard’s Ev-
ergreen  Project,  which  looks  across  alternative  futures  to  determine  robust  strate-
gies that best position the Coast Guard and the Nation for a changing world. 

Challenges to maintaining America’s maritime sovereignty and security are loom-
ing, and the key strategic actions that the Nation must take lie in three areas: im-
proving operational capability, building maritime awareness, and strengthening and 
integrating  existing  domestic  and  international  maritime  regimes  to  protect  the 
United States and other coastal nations against growing transnational threats. 

Regimes  are  the  system  of  ‘‘rules’’  that  shape  acceptable  activities.  Maritime  Do-
main  Awareness  (MDA)  allows  for  the  detection  and  monitoring  of  activities  occur-
ring  within  the  maritime  domain.  Together,  regimes  and  MDA  inform  decision-
makers  and  allow  them  to  identify  trends,  anomalies,  and  activities  that  threaten 
or  endanger  U.S.  interests.  Operational  capabilities  deter,  respond  to,  verify,  and 
counter  threats.  They  also  ensure  the  safe  and  sustainable  day-to-day  use  of  the 
maritime  domain  and  speed  recovery  from  natural  or  man-made  impacts  in  times 
of crisis. 

These activities are not the sole province of the Coast Guard; they are ineffective 
without  state,  local,  private  and  international  participation.  Similarly,  they  are  not 
solely  domestic;  they  span  the  globe  and  take  place  on  all  waters.  Finally,  this 
framework  provides  a  common  approach  to  safety,  security,  and  stewardship,  often 
serving all three objectives through common frameworks and activities. 

Viewing maritime initiatives and policies as part of a larger system enables a bet-
ter understanding of their inter-relationships and effectiveness. A well designed sys-
tem  of  regimes,  awareness,  and  operational  capabilities  creates  overlapping  domes-
tic and international safety nets, layers of security, and effective stewardship. Taken 
together,  they  provide  a  comprehensive  system  of  maritime  governance  for  the  Na-
tion. 

One of the fundamental building blocks of this system is Law of the Sea Conven-
tion.  Although  we  have  signed  this  important  Convention,  we  are  not  yet  a  party. 
Joining the Convention with the declaration and understandings reflected in Execu-
tive  Report  108–10  (Senate  Foreign  Relations  Committee)  is  an  important  step  in 
ensuring that we can exercise the necessary leadership to make this happen. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
N
E
L
L
A
8
1
4

Update of Deepwater Program 
Six Principles of Strategic Intent 

14 

I  met  with  the  Lockheed  Martin  CEO  Robert  Stevens  and  Northrop  Grumman 
CEO Ronald Sugar in January to determine near and long-term objectives and goals 
for  the  Deepwater  program.  Since  then,  we’ve  spoken  frequently  as  both  the  Coast 
Guard and our industry partners have taken a number of steps to improve the man-
agement,  oversight  and  performance  of  the  Deepwater  program.  More  recently,  we 
reached agreement on six fundamental principles that we have begun implementing 
to  ensure  that  the  government’s  interests  are  fully  and  fairly  achieved  in  acquiring 
and  fielding  assets  and  capabilities  being  developed  and  produced  under  the  Inte-
grated Deepwater System. 

These principles will guide us as we seek to obtain the best value for the govern-
ment  through  robust  competition  and  vigilant  contract  oversight  and  management. 
Working together with industry, the Coast Guard will make the following six fun-

damental changes in the management of our Deepwater program: 

1. The Coast Guard will assume the lead role as systems integrator for all Coast 
Guard  acquisitions;  including  all  Deepwater  assets  (while  continuing  to  employ 
ICGS, as appropriate, to perform specific management, engineering and system 
integration  functions  for  which  the  Coast  Guard  determines  they  are  best  suit-
ed). 
2.  The  Coast  Guard  will  take  full  responsibility  for  leading  the  management  of 
all  life  cycle  logistics  functions  within  the  Deepwater  program  (under  an  im-
proved  logistics  architecture  established  with  the  new  Mission  Support  organi-
zation). 
3.  The  Coast  Guard  will  expand  the  role  of  the  American  Bureau  of  Shipping 
(or  other  third-parties  as  appropriate)  for  Deepwater  vessels  to  increase  assur-
ances  that  Deepwater  assets  are  properly  designed  and  constructed  in  accord-
ance with established standards. 
4.  The  Coast  Guard  will  work  collaboratively  with  ICGS  to  identify  and  imple-
ment an expeditious resolution to all outstanding issues regarding the first two 
National Security Cutters (we are close to final resolution on NSCs #1 and #2). 
5. The Coast Guard will consider placing contract responsibilities for continued 
production  of  an  asset  class  (on  a  case-by-case  basis)  directly  with  the  prime 
vendor,  consistent  with  competition  requirements,  if:  (1)  deemed  to  be  in  the 
best interest of the government, and (2) only after the Coast Guard verifies lead 
asset performance within established mission requirements. 
6. Finally, I will meet no less than quarterly with my counterparts from indus-
try  until  any  and  all  Deepwater  program  issues  are  fully  adjudicated  and  re-
solved. 

These  changes  in  program  management  and  oversight  going  forward  will  change 

the course of Deepwater. 

By redefining our roles and responsibilities, redefining our relationships with our 
industry partners, and redefining how we assess the success of government and in-
dustry  management  and  performance,  the  Deepwater  program  of  tomorrow  will  be 
fundamentally better than the Deepwater program of today. 
123-Foot Patrol Boat Decommissioning 

A  significant  step  in  changing  the  course  of  Deepwater  is  resolving  outstanding 
issues  within  the  program;  I  have  made  the  determination  to  permanently  decom-
mission the eight 123-foot patrol boats converted under the Deepwater program. 

As most of you know, a variety of structural failures occurred on the 123-foot pa-

trol boats between September 2004 and November 2006. 

Despite two structural modifications, the cutters were forced to operate under in-
creasingly  prohibitive  operational  restrictions  in  an  attempt  to  limit  further  struc-
tural damage. 

On  November  30,  2006,  I  directed  that  all  eight  cutters  be  temporarily  removed 
from  service  due  to  the  heavy  repair  burden  on  the  crews  along  with  the  need  for 
increased  restrictions  which  would  have  rendered  the  cutters  operationally  ineffec-
tive. 

All  eight  cutters  were  relocated  from  Key  West,  FL  to  the  Coast  Guard  Yard  in 
Baltimore  in  January  2007,  where  they  have  been  in  a  special,  inactive  status  as 
we considered our options going forward. 

Multiple extensive studies and analyses by both Coast Guard engineers and third- 
party  naval  architects  and  marine  engineers  over  many  months  have  described  the 
failures in these vessels. They have been unable to determine a definitive root cause 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

15 

for  the  123-foot  patrol  boat  structural  problem;  although  several  design  deficiencies 
were identified that are consistent with the observed failures. 

We believe the design of 123-foot patrol boat cut down on the structural cross sec-
tion  necessary  to  support  the  added  weight  distribution  following  the  conversion. 
Our analysis has been complicated, however, by the fact that we’ve observed perma-
nent deformations of each hull in slightly different ways. 

Based  on  this  analysis,  any  strategy  to  permanently  repair  these  cutters  would 
require  an  iterative,  phased  approach  over  a  long  period  of  time  (years  vs.  months) 
with uncertain costs. 

We  estimate  the  total  cost  for  repairing  and  modernizing  these  eight  cutters,  in-
cluding  a  Mission  Effectiveness  Project  (MEP),  would  be  well  over  $50  million.  The 
residual  value  from  decommissioning  these  cutters  is  about  $50  million,  including 
Deepwater  funded  equipment  materials  and  operating  expenses  that  can  be  reused 
or redirected to other programs. 

The  excessive  cost  and  time  associated  with  continuing  to  pursue  an  uncertain 
resolution  to  these  structural  problems  has  convinced  me  that  permanently  remov-
ing  these  cutters  from  service  while  recouping  any  residual  value  and  redirecting 
funds to other programs is in the best interest of the government. 
Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Request 

The  Coast  Guard  will  head  into  FY  2008  making  notable  progress  with  imple-
menting  a  number  of  specific  initiatives  supported  by  Congress.  These  include  $10 
million  appropriated  in  FY  2006  for  Area  Maritime  Security  Exercises  as  well  as 
$15  million  appropriated  in  FY  2007  for  foreign  port  assessments,  spot  checks  of 
Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act  (MTSA)  regulated  facilities,  and  domestic 
threat/vulnerability  assessments.  These  initiatives,  coupled  with  requirements  in 
the SAFE Port Act such as the establishment of port security training and exercise 
programs,  facility  exercise  requirements  and  interagency  operational  centers  to 
name a few, all work in concert with the initiatives shown below toward improving 
maritime security. 

The  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2008  Budget  Request  maintains  a  mission-focused 
Coast Guard that remains capable of answering the Nation’s call by improving oper-
ational capability, building maritime awareness and creating comprehensive regimes. 
Some of these specific initiatives within the Fiscal Year 2008 budget addressing ca-
pability and awareness include: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
N
E
L
L
A
8
1
4

Improving Operational Capability 

16 

Integrated  Deepwater  System  (IDS)  $836.9  Million  (AC&I):  The  IDS  is  a  25-year, 
performance-based,  ‘‘system  of  systems’’  acquisition  to  replace  or  modernize  major 
Coast  Guard  cutters,  offshore  patrol  boats,  fixed-wing  aircraft,  multi-mission  heli-
copters and the communications equipment, sensors, and logistics systems required 
to  maintain  and  operate  them.  As  an  integrated,  interoperable  network-centric  sys-
tem,  when  complete,  IDS  will  maximize  operational  capability  while  minimizing 
total ownership costs by leveraging current and future technologies to achieve mari-
time  awareness  in  all  maritime  regimes  in  which  Coast  Guard  operates.  This  re-
quest funds the sixth year of implementation after award and, among other things, 
will  fund  four  additional  Maritime  Patrol  Aircraft  (MPA),  long  lead  time  material 
for the National Security Cutter (NSC) #5 and complete funding for NSCs #1–4, ini-
tiate production of the Replacement Patrol Boat (FRC–B), and complete funding for 
Airborne Use of Force (AUF) outfitting for the 95 HH–65s and 42 HH–60s. 

The  IDS  procurement  is  the  largest  and  most  complex  acquisition  ever  under-
taken  by  the  Coast  Guard,  and  the  acquisition  strategy  allows  flexibility  to  accom-
modate  the  continuously  changing  nature  of  this  evolutionary  procurement  action, 
enabling  rapid  response  to  changes  in  technology,  funding,  and  operational  mission 
requirements. The Coast Guard is also taking important steps to improve the man-
agement of the program by evaluating the current acquisition strategy and reassess-
ment of the acquisitions management structure. 

Deployable Operations Group (DOG) $132.7 Million base re-allocation (OE): In the 
same way that Sector Commands improved unity of effort and command among the 
Coast Guard’s shore-based forces in the Nation’s ports and coastal regions, the DOG 
will  be  a  new  force  structure  that  aligns  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deployable,  Specialized 
Forces  (DSF)  under  a  single  unified  command.  Coordination  of  existing  maritime 
safety  and  security  missions  will  improve  and  the  capabilities  of  each  unit  can  be 
better  exploited  and  used.  Once  the  DOG  is  fully  operational,  it  will  focus  on  im-
proving contingency planning, developing adaptive force packages to address a wide 
spectrum  of  national  contingencies  and  leading  efforts  to  train  for  an  ‘‘all 
hazards . . . all threats’’ response. 

Movement  of  Personnel  from  Acquisition,  Construction  &  Improvements  (AC&I) 
into  the  Operating  Expenses  (OE)  Appropriation  $80.5  Million  base  re-allocation: 
This funding transfer will significantly improve the Coast Guard’s ability to success-
fully  manage,  oversee  and  administer  Coast  Guard  Acquisition,  Construction  and 
Improvement  (AC&I)  contracts.  Consolidating  all  AC&I  personnel  funding  into  the 
OE  appropriation  will  allow  the  Coast  Guard  to  maximize  efficiencies  and  leverage 
potential synergies in acquisition activities and management, as well as increase the 
Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  surge  personnel  to  AC&I-related  positions  as  appropriated 
project funding levels fluctuate. 

Integrated  Deepwater  System  Surface  and  Air  asset  follow-on  $55.5  Million  (OE): 
• National  Security  Cutter  (NSC)  751—Provides  personnel,  and  funding  to  oper-
ate  the  2nd  National  Security  Cutter.  The  NSC  is  the  largest  of  the  new  Inte-
grated  Deepwater  Systems  surface  assets  (418′)  with  vastly  improved  capabili-
ties over legacy 378′ High Endurance Cutters. The NSC will be the most sophis-
ticated  and  capable  cutter  the  Coast  Guard  has  ever  operated.  It  will  have  a 
range of 12,000 nautical miles and an underway endurance of 60 days. The cut-
ter  will  be  capable  of  patrolling  singly  or  with  multiple  Coast  Guard  vessels, 
U.S.  Navy  vessels,  or  vessels  from  other  nations’  navies  or  coast  guards.  The 
NSC  will  conduct  proactive  and  reactive  patrols  within  its  assigned  operating 
areas  and  will  provide  a  robust  Command  and  Control  capability  for  the  Task 
Unit Commander or the On-Scene Commander. It will be capable of performing 
all  maritime  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  missions,  non-General 
Defense  Operations  and  General  Defense  Operations  with  the  Navy  such  as 
Ports,  Waterways  and  Coastal  Security  as  well  as  Maritime  Intercept  Oper-
ations, Port Operations, Security and Defense, and Peacetime Military Engage-
ments. 
• C–130J—The  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  request  provides  operation  and  mainte-
nance  funding  for  800  annual  flight  hours  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  HC–130J  air-
craft.  These  800  flight  hours,  combined  with  the  3,200  flight  hours  already  ap-
propriated, will enable the Coast Guard to meet its full operating capability re-
quirement  of  4,000  flight  hours  for  five  HC–130J  operational  aircraft.  The  C– 
130J  is  the  Coast  Guard’s  long-range  surveillance  aircraft.  This  four-engine, 
turbo-prop aircraft is used extensively throughout the United States, the Pacific 
Ocean  and  the  Caribbean  Sea  in  support  of  search  and  rescue,  homeland  secu-
rity, pollution prevention, logistics, personnel transport and ice patrol missions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

17 

• Atlantic  Area  Deployment  Center—This  newly  established  deployment  center 
will  replace  the  Coast  Guard’s  Helicopter  Interdiction  Squadron  (HITRON), 
complete  with  Airborne  Use  of  Force  (AUF)-capable  aircraft  and  crews.  The 
HITRON  initiative  to  lease  eight  MH–68  helicopters  was  developed  as  a  bridg-
ing strategy to bolster the Coast Guard’s illegal drug interdiction capability and 
support  Port,  Waterways  and  Costal  Security  missions  until  the  service  could 
arm  its  organic  helicopter  fleet.  On  February  1,  2008,  the  Coast  Guard  plans 
to  complete  this  strategic  plan  by  terminating  HITRON  and  activating  the  At-
lantic  Area  Deployment  Center.  More  specifically,  this  action  will  replace  the 
eight  leased  HITRON  MH–68  helicopters  with  ten  Coast  Guard  Airborne  Use 
of  Force  (AUF)  equipped,  re-engined  MH–65C  helicopters  at  the  Jacksonville, 
Florida facility. 

Special  Purpose  Craft-Law  Enforcement  Boat  (SPC–LE)  follow-on  $3.3  Million 
(OE):  This  request  provides  funds  to  operate  and  maintain  the  SPC–LE  boats  ac-
quired  with  funding  provided  in  Fiscal  Year  2007.  These  increased  boat  allowances 
will support Certain Dangerous Cargo (CDC) and high-capacity passenger vessel se-
curity, migrant and drug interdiction, shoreside and waterborne patrols, and boards 
of High Interest Vessels (HIV). 

Rescue Swimmer Training Facility $13.3 Million (AC&I): This project will recapi-
talize the existing Rescue Swimmer Training Facility at Aviation Technical Training 
Center,  Elizabeth  City,  NC.  As  witnessed  during  Hurricane  Katrina,  Aviation  Sur-
vival  Technicians  are  a  vital  component  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Search  and  Rescue 
mission.  The  existing  facility  was  built  in  1948  and  was  initially  used  as  a  rec-
reational  pool.  It  must  be  closed  when  winds  exceed  40  mph  due  to  the  poor  roof 
structure and roof trusses. Funds requested will allow for the construction of a new 
building  containing  a  50x25  meter,  12  foot  deep  training  pool;  Modular  Egress 
Training Simulator; classrooms; and a dunker tank. 

Maritime  Security  Response  Team  (MSRT)  Shoothouse  $1.8  Million  (AC&I)  and 
$644K (OE): Funding will allow the Coast Guard to construct a shoothouse training 
facility  at  Camp  Lejeune,  NC,  for  the  Special  Mission  Training  Center  to  train 
deployable  forces.  This  facility  would  be  unique  in  that  it  will  provide  the  oppor-
tunity to train in a shipboard like environment; in addition, due to its proximity to 
the  water,  students  would  be  able  to  train  in  the  shoothouse  in  the  morning  and 
on  the  water  in  the  afternoon.  These  specialized  forces  rely  on  interagency  support 
to  train  their  members  to  ensure  standardization  and  integration  with  Department 
of  Defense  (DOD)  forces.  Request  also  includes  funding  to  complete  equipment  and 
training requirements of the MSRT’s third Direct Action Section (DAS) and CBRNE 
Section funded in Fiscal Year 2007. 

Rescue 21 $80.8M (AC&I) and $8.2 Million (OE): The FY 2008 budget request pro-
vides  for  maintenance  and  recapitalization  of  the  aging  National  Distress  System 
in  the  Northeastern  areas  of  the  United  States,  West  Coast  and  Alaska.  Rescue  21 
will  replace  the  existing  National  Distress  and  Response  System  and  enhance  the 
Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  execute  all  of  its  missions  through  improved  communica-
tions, command and control capabilities in the coastal zone. It is the foundation for 
coastal  Search  and  Rescue,  and  is  a  critical  enabler  of  efficient  and  effective  com-
mand and control of all missions in the coastal zone. 
Building Awareness 

National Capital Region Air Defense $11.5 Million (AC&I) and $4.3 Million (OE): 
This project represents the second of a two-year project to increase the Coast Guard 
HH–65C  fleet  by  seven  HH–65C  helicopters  and  related  support  facility  improve-
ments.  These  seven  helicopters  are  required  to  support  the  newly-assigned  mission 
providing  air  intercept  to  protect  the  National  Capital  Region.  Primary  responsi-
bility  for  air  defense  of  the  National  Capitol  Region  Air  Defense  rests  with  DOD 
under  OPERATION  NOBLE  EAGLE.  Within  DOD,  the  North  American  Aerospace 
Defense Command (NORAD) is responsible for execution of the air defense mission. 
The  Coast  Guard  is  the  responsible  service  within  DHS  to  execute  rotary  wing  air 
intercept operations to protect the National Capital Region and has been performing 
this mission since September 2006. 

Integrated  Deepwater  Systems  Engineering  and  Integration  $35.1  Million  (AC&I): 
The Integrated Deepwater Systems (IDS) solution is designed to incorporate off-the- 
shelf  systems  components  where  possible.  Systems  Engineering  and  Integration  is 
essential  to  ensuring  interoperability  at  the  unit,  system  and  organizational  levels, 
both  internal  to  the  Coast  Guard  and  with  other  DHS  and  DOD  assets.  Effective 
systems  integration—bringing  things  technically  and  operationally  together  so  they 
operate  as  a  whole—will  minimize  the  cost  of  asset  acquisition,  operations  and 
maintenance,  maximize  the  assets’  abilities  to  interoperate  internally  and  exter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

18 

nally,  and  minimize  the  risk  inherent  in  a  comprehensive  and  complex  engineering 
project of Deepwater’s scope and magnitude. 

Nationwide Automatic Identification System (NAIS) $12 Million (AC&I): Funds re-
quested  will  continue  implementation  of  NAIS  to  achieve  Initial  Operating  Capa-
bility  (IOC)  for  receive  and  transmit  capability  of  AIS  messages  nationwide.  Fund-
ing also covers costs associated with systems currently operational. 

Integrated  Deepwater  Systems  C4ISR  $89.6  Million  (AC&I):  Funds  requested  will 
be  used  for  design  work  for  the  upgrade  of  the  Multi-mission  Cutter  Helicopter 
(MCH) and the long-range surveillance aircraft to increase maritime domain aware-
ness capabilities. 
Conclusion 

The  Coast  Guard  has  already  taken  important  measures  in  many  areas  that  will 
reduce  security  risk  in  the  maritime  domain.  Since  September  11th  the  Service  ac-
celerated  efforts  to  improve  the  Nation’s  maritime  regimes,  awareness  and  oper-
ational capabilities. Efforts are also underway to integrate initiatives, build collabo-
ration, and increase unity of effort—as called for by the National Strategy for Mari-
time Security. But much work remains to be done. Gaps in safety, security, and stew-
ardship  are  broadly  recognized,  and  the  Coast  Guard  and  DHS  will  work  with  the 
Executive  Branch,  Congress  and  other  Federal,  state,  local,  private,  and  inter-
national partners to make needed changes. 

Events,  such  as  the  September  11th  terrorist  attacks  and  Hurricane  Katrina, 
have  demonstrated  the  importance  of  preparing  for  complex  threat  situations  and 
highlight  America’s  growing  vulnerability.  Although  the  U.S.  capacity  to  save  lives 
in  the  aftermath  of  these  tragedies  proved  unparalleled,  more  can  be  done  to  pre-
pare for and respond to the next major disaster. 

No one can predict the next catastrophic event, nonetheless, history tells us it will 
come.  When  it  does,  it  will  be  vital  to  have  an  ‘‘all  threats,  all  hazards’’  Coast 
Guard—Semper  Paratus.  The  character  of  Coast  Guard  men  and  women  has  been 
tested from the rooftops of New Orleans to the oil platforms of the Persian Gulf and 
throughout  the  Nation’s  history  there  remains  one  constant:  if  Coast  Guard  men 
and  women  are  provided  the  training  and  equipment  to  do  the  job,  they  won’t  let 
us down. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today.  I  will  be  happy  to  an-

swer any questions you may have. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Admiral  Allen  and  for  my  col-
leagues,  we  will  start  with  five  minute  rounds  and  hopefully  we’ll 
have  time  for  a  couple  rounds  of  questioning.  Senator  Lautenberg, 
would you like to make an opening statement? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I’ll  just  take  2  minutes  to  say  I’m  sorry 
that  I  arrived  a  little  bit  late  and  that  I  can’t  stay.  I  want  to  say, 
Admiral Allen, that we’re proud of you and the entire Coast Guard 
Corp. There is never a time when the Coast Guard is asked to take 
on a task, that they don’t do it fully even with resources slimming 
down,  even  with  budgets  being  retarded  from  where  they  should 
be. So, I want to say, my hat’s off to the Coast Guard and I thank 
all  of  them,  all  the  Coast  Guard  service  people  for  the  work  that 
they do, for the heroics that they perform when called upon. 

They  are  a  wonderful  branch  of  the  service,  of  our  government 
and I don’t understand why here we are, fortunate enough to have 
a Corp like the Coast Guard and when we think about the size and 
Madam  Chairman,  I  would  ask  that  the  full  statement  be  placed 
in the record. 

Senator CANTWELL. Without objection. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  But  I  just  want  to  say  that  for  the  total 
act of duty for what’s barely larger than New York City’s police de-
partment,  the  Coast  Guard  is  being  asked  to  patrol  nearly  93,000 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

19 

miles of coastline with evermore assignments being dished out and 
having  too  few  dollars  and  too  little  support  from  what  I  think  it 
should be. 

You  know,  I  offered  an  amendment  in  2004  to  add  $100  million 
to  the  Coast  Guard  budget  Fiscal  Year  2005  and  the  GAO  agreed 
that  this  money  would  be  necessary  in  times  of  high  operating 
tempo  and  after  my  amendment  was  voted  down,  guess  what  hap-
pened?  The  Administration  came  back  to  Congress  for  an  addi-
tional $112 million in supplemental funding and each one of us sit-
ting here has a coast that needs your attention but you don’t have 
to  be  a  costal  state  to  love  the  Coast  Guard,  I  can  tell  you  that. 
They are called upon for many other things. 

So,  Madam  Chair,  if  I  can  submit  my  questions  in  writing,  I 
would  appreciate  that  and  I  will  take  no  more  of  the  Committee’s 
time. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Madam  Chair,  thank  you  for  holding  today’s  hearing  where—once  again—it  ap-
pears the Coast Guard is being given too few resources to effectively accomplish its 
missions. 

With a total active-duty force barely larger than the New York City Police Depart-
ment,  the  Coast  Guard  is  being  asked  to  patrol  nearly  93  thousand  miles  of  U.S. 
coastline. And since 9/11, the Coast Guard has taken on a host of homeland security 
duties,  including  security  patrols  in  the  waters  off  Iraq  and  security  duties  at  our 
ports here at home. 

But despite these homeland security missions, the Bush Administration continues 
to cut resources for the Coast Guard’s traditional missions, such as search and res-
cue, boating safety, and protecting our environment and commercial fisheries. So for 
Fiscal Year 2005, I tried to get the Coast Guard the resources they needed and de-
served.  I  offered  an  amendment  to  add  an  additional  $100  million  to  the  Coast 
Guard’s  annual  operating  budget.  The  GAO  agreed  that  this  money  would  be  nec-
essary in times of high operating tempo. And after my amendment was voted down, 
guess what happened? The Administration came back to Congress for an additional 
$112 million in supplemental funding. 

We need a budget that honestly reflects the demands we are placing on the Coast 
Guard.  And  with  one  of  the  oldest  fleets  in  the  world,  we  need  a  budget  that  pro-
vides  the  men  and  women  of  the  Coast  Guard  the  tools  they  need  to  do  their  jobs. 
This means new ships, planes and communications gear. To purchase those vehicles 
and  equipment,  the  Administration  has  relied  on  its  Deepwater  program  which— 
to put it mildly—is a mess. 

I  support  funding  for  Deepwater.  But  I  do  not  support  the  Administration’s  com-
placency  when  it  comes  to  its  contracting.  I  am  encouraged  by  Admiral  Allen’s  re-
cent announcements to take back Federal control and oversight of this vital procure-
ment program from the contractors. 

I look forward to hearing from our witnesses. 
Thank you Madam Chair. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Senator.  Admiral  Allen,  thank 
you for your testimony and thank you for your comment specifically 
about  the  Deepwater  Program,  because  as  you  know,  it  is  the  sin-
gle largest acquisition project in the budget that is being submitted 
and I know that yesterday—well, let me just step back for a second 
and  say  thank  you  for  mentioning  your  process  of  strategic  review 
of Coast Guard assets and presenting those to a future Committee 
hearing. 

We’ll look forward to that. Thank you for mentioning the integra-
tion  issue  on  an  international  basis.  I  believe  you  are  correct,  that 
the  more  that  we  can  work  together  on  an  international  basis  on 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

20 

security regimes, the more that we will both lower our cost and in-
crease  our  security,  so  I  applaud  you  for  stepping  back  and  taking 
a strategic review of that on behalf of the U.S. taxpayers. 

On  the  other  side  of  the  equation,  your  testimony  also  included 
working  together  with  the  contractor,  the  systems  integrator  and 
comments  about  not  wanting  to  miss  deadlines  on  the  delivery  of 
assets.  I  can  assure  you  that  most  Committee  members  do  not 
want  you  to  miss  deadlines  either  but  we  also  want  to  make  sure 
that we are getting the assets that we are paying for and not run-
ning  into  further  problems  and  predicaments  in  the  specs  and  de-
signs and the actual effectiveness of those assets. 

So  with  that,  I  want  to  turn  to  your  statements  yesterday  be-
cause  I  believe  that  you  gave  a  review  of  some  of  the  changes  in 
a speech yesterday, about the Deepwater Program and the fact that 
the  Coast  Guard,  you  believe,  should  take  on  more  roles  and  re-
sponsibilities as the lead systems integrator. 

As Senator Snowe said, she and I have been working together on 
legislation,  S.  924,  which  is  very  specific  about  what  we  think 
needs to be done to make sure that we don’t run into the same sit-
uation  again  with  a  major  procurement  project  that  the  Coast 
Guard  is  undertaking.  So  if  I  could  ask  you  a  few  questions  about 
yesterday’s  comments  and  concepts  that  are  similar  to  the  legisla-
tion that we have introduced. 

First  of  all,  one  of  the  biggest  problems,  I  believe,  in  the  Deep-
water Program was our decision to get rid of the major Systems Ac-
quisition  Manual.  So,  basically  in  an  attempt  to  expedite  and  en-
courage integration, which is not a bad concept—integration is not 
a  bad  concept—we  basically  threw  out  the  SAM.  Do  you  intend  to 
reinstitute  the  Systems  Acquisition  Manual  and  the  rules  that  ob-
viously it implies? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Madam  Chair,  we  didn’t  throw  out  the  Systems 
Acquisition  Manual,  we  just  didn’t  follow  it.  We  have  one.  It  is  a 
viable  document.  It  probably  needs  some  updating  to  reflect  what 
we  need  to  do  for  Deepwater.  As  a  Commander,  I  was  part  of  the 
project  team  that  extended  the  service  life  of  the  378  foot  cutters 
that  they  are  needing  now  that  require  replacement.  The  Systems 
Acquisition  Manual  is  a  solid  way  to  go.  Every  acquisition  the 
Coast  Guard  needs  to  be  managed  under  that  and  a  project  man-
agement regime that is standard across the organization. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, if you’re not using it, then in my sense, 

it has been out—— 

Admiral  ALLEN.  For  the  Deepwater  project,  there  was  an  exclu-
sion  for  the  Systems  Acquisition  Manual,  for  the  other  projects  it 
applies. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  now  you  are  reinstituting  that  in  any 

acquisition—— 

Admiral ALLEN. We will integrate all doctrine related to acquisi-
tion in a Systems Acquisition Manual that will apply to all acquisi-
tions. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  In  language  in  any  contracts  moving  for-
ward,  are  you  committing  to  language  of  ending  self-certification? 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Are  you  committing  to  requiring  a  com-

prehensive analysis of alternatives? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

21 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes. Business case analysis. 
Senator CANTWELL. Are you adhering to other reporting require-

ments similar to what DOD provides to Congress, like the SAR? 

Admiral ALLEN. I’m not sure I—if I were to be given an example, 
we could compare and contrast current reporting requirements and 
give you a status on that ma’am. We’d be happy to do it. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  think  that  obviously,  there  are  many  proc-
esses  and  procedures  that  have  been  good  safety  nets  and  particu-
larly,  I  think,  for  our  Committee  in  notification  of  cost  overruns 
and  problems  so  that  we  don’t  build  up  to  a  point  where  we  did 
where the Committee was without information until a point in time 
that was pretty far down the road in the contract. 

Now,  if  I  could  get  that  information  from  our  staff,  I’ll  be  happy 
to,  in  the  next  round.  Provide—ask  some  additional  questions  on 
that point. 

As  it  relates  to  your  Engineering  and  Logistics  Center,  will  they 
be  the  lead  organization  and  final  decision  on  design  and  perform-
ance standards? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  They  will.  In  fact,  their  responsibilities  will  ex-
pand.  As  I  said  earlier,  it’s  hard  to  disaggregate  some  of  the  busi-
ness  changes  that  I  am  proposing  for  what  we  need  to  do  with 
Deepwater because I came into the job knowing we had to fix some 
things  about  Deepwater  in  terms  of  the  acquisition,  organization 
and the logistics and the maintenance organization. The Engineer-
ing  Logistics  Center  at  Curtis  Bay,  Maryland  will  evolve  into  a  lo-
gistics  center  that  will  support  all  surface  assets  of  the  Coast 
Guard in a similar way that the Aircraft Repair and Supply Center 
in Elizabeth City is the single logistics point for all aviation assets. 
We, in the past, when I came in the Coast Guard, individual dis-
tricts  did  their  own  engineering  of  ships  and  you  can  imagine,  it 
was pretty uneven across the Coast Guard. In 1986, we established 
maintenance  and  logistics  commands  on  both  coasts.  That  left  us 
with two maintenance and logistics commands and the Engineering 
Logistics Center. We need to go to one unified logistics center that 
provides life cycle management of these assets though product lines 
and they are the single technical authority. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. Senator Snowe? 
Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you  very  much,  Madam  Chair.  Admiral 
Allen, getting back to this ICGS management of Deepwater assets, 
there  has  been  a  real  question  as  to  why  the  Coast  Guard  is  even 
extending  the  43-month  contract  with  the  ICGS.  I  mean,  why  do 
that  at  all?  I  know  you’re  in  the  process  of  renegotiating  that  con-
tract, as I understand it, at least indicated by the news reports. 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes ma’am, happy to explain. Based on the eval-
uation  of  the  first  award  term,  which  was  completed  last  May  be-
fore  I  took  office  as  a  Commandant,  we  are  contractually  allowed 
to  issue  a  contract  for  43  months.  The  ICGS  sets  the  next  award 
term. 

Now,  within  that  contract,  we  issue  task  orders.  Our  intention 
right  now  is  to  sustain  the  contractual  relationship  with  the  Inte-
grated  Coast  Guard  System  because  there  are  certain  things  that 
are  going  on  right  now—were  we  to  stop  would  cause  severe  dis-
ruption  and  there  are  things  that  are  not  visible  because  they  are 
not related to a specific asset. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

22 

One  of  them  is  the  development  of  an  Integrated  Logistics  Man-
agement  Information  System,  which  work  needs  to  continue  be-
cause it’s part of our ability to transition to a mission support orga-
nization  that  I  have  talked  about.  Our  goal  right  now  is  to  transi-
tion into the new contract period with task orders only for work in 
progress and limit those task orders to somewhere between and 18 
to  24  months  and  issue  no  task  orders  unless  they  meet  the  re-
quirements  that  Senator  Cantwell  mentioned  earlier  and  that  we 
issue  no  task  orders  unless  we  have  competition,  third  party  vali-
dation  and  making  sure  we  are  achieving  the  best  value  for  the 
government. 

But  we  do  need  to  have  the  ongoing  contractual  relationship  be-
cause  I  believe  I’ll  get  a  question  pretty  quick,  if  you  haven’t  al-
ready  asked  it,  about  well,  if  you’re  going  to  become  the  systems 
integrator, how are you going to do that? The question is, you have 
to  have  a  transition  period  so  there  are  some  contractual  relation-
ships  we  need  to  maintain  with  ICGS  while  we  are  transitioning 
and putting that competency and that organizational structure into 
the Coast Guard. 

For  instance,  we  have  a  Systems  Integration  Program  office  in 
Roslyn  that  is  an  ICGS  facility.  Ultimately,  we  need  to  close  that 
down and take that function and put in to the new mission support 
organization  in  the  Coast  Guard.  You  can’t  do  that  overnight  so  I 
need  the  continuity  of  continuing  the  work  in  progress  under  the 
current contract. 

Senator SNOWE. I see and it would be specifically for those ships, 

for example, that are under production now? 

Admiral ALLEN. Correct. In other words, we would issue no task 
order—there would be no task order for pricing in the new contract 
period,  for  instance,  for  the  Offshore  Patrol  Cutter.  We  need  to  be 
convinced we have the right design and the right value for the gov-
ernment there. 

Senator SNOWE. Well, I just happened to notice yesterday that an 
ICGS  spokeswoman  said  she  did  not  believe  that  your  announce-
ment represented significant change in the Coast Guard contractor 
relationship. I’d like to have your comment on that. I mean, I think 
that that is sort of interesting, if not an illustration of the problem 
that  we  are  facing.  They  don’t  accept  that  there  should  be  a  fun-
damentally  altered  relationship  and  they  did  not  acknowledge  the 
problems that existed and manifested themselves under their lead-
ership.  So  how  would  you  characterize  this  announcement  yester-
day?  Is  it  major  change  or  is  it  not—because  I  hope  it  is  a  major 
change—and why is there a fundamentally different interpretation 
of that relationship? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  There  is  a  fundamental  change  in  how  we  are 
doing  business  and  the  roles  the  Coast  Guard  will  assume.  I  have 
personally  discussed  this  and  negotiated  it  with  Bob  Stevens  and 
Ron Sugar, the two CEO’s. I think what they are referring to is the 
continuity of the contracting vehicle that I just discussed. 

Senator SNOWE. I hope so. I hope that is clear—— 
Admiral ALLEN. I know what I intend, Senator. 
Senator  SNOWE.  OK.  Well,  that’s  fine  and  we’ll  obviously  be  en-
gaged  in  that  oversight  in  the  months  to  come  because  I  think  it 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

23 

is  absolutely  imperative.  How  are  we  going  to  get  this  back  on 
track  but  still  engaging  in  the  oversight—it’s  going  to  be  so  vital. 
To that point, I noticed that you are in the process or haven’t de-
termined yet, how much the government will recover from the con-
tractors,  for  all  these  deficiencies  and  the  back  scheduling.  The 
issues  that  happened  with  the  Fast  Response  Cutter  that  you’ve 
now  really  had  to  jettison  and  the  National  Security  Cutter.  How 
are  we  going  to  modify  these  deficiencies?  How  is  that  process 
going  to  come  about?  And  does  the  contractor  accept  any  responsi-
bility or are we going to have to negotiate endlessly? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Well,  I  think  we  have  two  distinct  issues  with 
the  123  foot  cutters  and  National  Security  Cutter,  if  I  can  talk 
about each for just a second. 
There  is  no  doubt  in  our  minds  that  the  123′  cutters  and  on  in-
spection,  when  you  see  basically  deformed  rails  on  our  ships  and 
I  think  I  have  a  picture  of  one  in  the  handouts  we  provided  you. 
It’s  visual  evidence  that  we  are  not  getting  performance  out  of 
these  hulls  that  were  intended  and  the  fact  that  we  can’t  retain 
them  in  service  means  that  the  Government  needs  to  have  the 
value  for  the  money  that  is  invested.  I  have  talked  with  the  DHS 
IG, whether it is contractual, legal—whatever recourse we have, we 
will  make  sure  that  the  government’s  interests  are  protected  here. 
In  response  to  a  question  at  the  news  conference  yesterday,  I 
made the statement that we are providing all materials associated 
with  this,  with  the  DHS  Inspector  General,  work  very  closely  with 
him  to  ascertain  whether  there  may  be  any  accountability  and  re-
covery required and we will vigorously pursue that. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  how  would  you  characterize  this?  I  think 
this is a travesty, frankly, but how would you characterize the Fast 
Response Cutter in terms of its deficiency to the point—— 

Admiral ALLEN. I think in general—I’m sorry, ma’am. 
Senator SNOWE. Go ahead. 
Admiral ALLEN. In general and I’m not a naval engineer, I think 
there  was  a  mis-estimation  of  the  amount  of  structure  that  could 
be applied to these ships that had already been operated for a good 
number of years and whether or not they were strengthened, what 
they  call  the  hull  girder,  the  inside  interior  of  the  ship,  to  accom-
modate  new  weight  on  the  end  and  then  the  buckling  and  the 
forces  that  the  hull  is  subjected  to  in  the  sea  states  that  were  en-
countered. 

We have gone back and taken a look at whether or not the right 
computer  models  that  calculated  what  we  would  call  the  section 
modulus  or  the  strength  of  the  width  of  the  ship  was  correct  to 
begin  with  and  my  guess  is,  if  we’re  going  to—we  may  not  get 
down to a single root cause. I think we’re going to find that played 
a major, major role. 

Senator SNOWE. Did you find it shocking? 
Admiral  ALLEN.  Absolutely.  I  visited  the  ships  myself.  I  went  to 
the shipyards. They pulled the starboard shaft out of the VASHON 
at a shipyard in Savannah that I visited and when they pulled the 
shaft out, the actual stern section came one inch off the blocks they 
were  resting  on,  which  meant  the  shaft  was  keeping  the  hull  in 
alignment. Ships aren’t supposed to work like that, Senator. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

24 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  can’t  imagine  the  contractor  not  taking 

responsibility for that. 

Admiral  ALLEN.  We  are  proceeding  at  this  point—the  decision 

was just taken to—that is the question, yes, ma’am. 

Senator  SNOWE.  I  know.  It  really  is  unfathomable.  They  are  the 
ones  that  are  supposed  to  design  and  build  the  ships  and  if  they 
come  out  this  way,  I  mean,  that’s  a  travesty  to  the  Coast  Guard 
and  to  the  American  taxpayer,  frankly.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. Senator Stevens? 
Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much.  Let  me  first  congratu-
late  you  for  that  tremendous  thing  that  took  place  with  the 
SELANDANG  AYU,  the  vessel  up  by  the  Aleutian  Chain  and  the 
grand  movie,  The  Guardian,  I  think  that  really  did  the  service  a 
great deal of good. 

I’ve been told that you have about a $150 million transfer at the 
Department  of  Homeland  Security  and  in  the  Department  of  De-
fense.  Does  that  offset  the  costs  of  your  involvement  of  the  Coast 
Guard  in  the  activities  that  are  involved  with  homeland  security 
and defense? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Sir,  are  you  talking  about  whether  or  not  a 

transfer of money within the allocations—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  You’ve  got  basically  money  for  equipment.  I 
don’t see any money for operations in terms of interceptions around 
Iraq,  in  terms  of  the  activities  of  the  homeland  security.  Are  you 
getting fully funded from them? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  sir,  we  are.  I’m  sorry  I  didn’t  understand 
the  question.  For  the  activities  in  Iraq,  we’re  fully  funded  through 
the Supplementals, yes sir. It’s included in the Defense request for 
funding, sir. 

Senator STEVENS. If we get the Supplemental, yes, that’s true. 
Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  sir.  We  can  give  you  a  detailed  breakdown 

on the cost, sir. 

[The information referrd to follows:] 
Based upon the Fiscal Year 2007 Operating Iraqi Freedom budget request, the fol-

lowing is a detailed breakdown of operational/reconstitution costs: 

Category 

Military Pay and Allowances 

Temporary Duty (TDY) and Temporary Additional Duty 

Clothing and Other Personnel Equipment and Supplies 

Medical Support and Health Services 

Reserve Component Activation and Deactivation 

Other Personnel Support 

Training 

Operational Tempo 

Other Supplies 

Facilities/Base Support 

Reconstitution 

Command and Control 

Airlift 

Sealift 

Total 

Funding Request 

$42,080,000 

18,020,000 

1,070,000 

3,180,000 

2,040,000 

11,500,000 

3,730,000 

45,445,000 

5,510,000 

7,600,000 

54,658,000 

6,730,000 

5,230,000 

3,500,000 

$210,293,000 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

25 

Senator STEVENS. What about the GPS? We’re told the GPS looks 
like it may become unreliable and yet we asked for a report on the 
LORAN  in  the  bill  last  year.  To  my  knowledge,  the  Coast  Guard 
hasn’t  prepared  that  LORAN  report.  Are  you  still  going  to  close 
down LORAN before we know what the future of GPS is? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  sir.  A  couple  of  comments  related  to  that. 
Number  one,  the  big  issue  before  us  right  now—we  are  aware  of 
the  fact  that  GPS  can  be  jammed.  There  is  an  interagency  group 
that has been looking at this for quite a while. We are in the final 
decision  stages  right  now  between  Homeland  Security  and  the  De-
partment of Transportation on how to move forward and there are 
three options facing us at this point. 

One is phasing out LORAN–C. The other one is maintaining sta-
tus  quo  and  repair  the  equipment  we  have  in  place.  The  third  op-
tion  will  be,  go  to  what  they  call  E–LORAN,  which  operates  very 
much  like  DGPS,  that  would  be  an  Enhanced  LORAN  that  could 
be considered as a backup to GPS. We’re very close to a final deci-
sion with the interagency group and we should be able to give you 
an answer shortly. 

We  are  in  the  final  stages  of  those  determinations.  That’s  the 

reason the information hasn’t been provided, sir. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I’ve been on several small vessels up my 
way  where  they  still  have  LORAN  and  they  really  can’t  use  GPS 
in the areas they are in. Are you familiar with that? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  If  you  give  me  the  exact  area,  sir,  I’d  be  happy 
to  comment  on  it.  I  understand  there  are  reports  where  there  are 
coverage problems up there, sir. 

Senator STEVENS. Yes, they are out of Russell Bay and north, ba-
sically  but  I  understand  there  is  a  similar  problem  on  the  North-
east  Coast  and  we  tried  to  get  LORAN  preserved  at  least  for  Se-
attle north and for I think it was Massachusetts north. Have there 
been  similar  complaints  about  the  southern  part  of  the  country?  I 
know  there  are  complaints  in  the  northern  part.  Is  LORAN–C 
being  abandoned  easily  in  the  southeast,  southwest  and  on  to  the 
Gulf Coast? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Sir,  in  general,  most  of  the  concerns  I’ve  heard 
expressed  have  to  do  largely  with  the  commercial  fishing  commu-
nity because of the repeatability of LORAN’s signal and the ability 
to return to where their fixed gear or pots are at. 

Of  the  three  options  that  I  laid  out  before  you,  Enhanced 
LORAN, which has an augmented signal very similar to DGPS will 
continue  service  to  that  community  if  that  is  the  outcome  that  is 
chosen, sir. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Another  subject—I’m  told  now  within  5  years, 
we’ll  have  at  least  40  percent  of  our  natural  gas  come  in  the  form 
of  LNG.  Will  that  change  your  activities  with  regard  to  coastline 
protection? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  sir.  You’ve  raised  a  very,  very  significant 
point.  There  are  a  number  of  permits  being  sought  right  now  for 
liquid natural gas facilities around the country, in almost all parts 
of the country because of the economic viability of transporting gas 
in a liquefied form. 

There  are  significant  issues  related  to  the  impact  on  waterways. 
The  Coast  Guard  works  with  the  Department  of  the  Interior 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

26 

through  Minerals  Management  Service  for  the  Continental  Shelf 
LNG  facilities  and  with  FERC  for  LNG  facilities  that  are  within 
harbors and we do a waterway suitability assessment and then we 
issue a waterways suitability report as part of the permitting proc-
ess  for  every  LNG  facility  that  lays  out  what  the  Coast  Guard 
thinks are the adequate precautions or controls that need to be put 
in  place  to  adequately,  safely  and  securely  transfer  LNG  at  those 
facilities  and  they  vary  with  where  the  facilities  are  proposed  but 
we are extensively involved in that, sir. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you.  I’ll  have  some  other  questions 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Senator  Stevens.  Senator  Nel-

later, Madam Chair. 

son? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Your  Miami  Coast  Guard  and  all  that  area  of 
Florida,  the  Florida  Straits,  they  do  a  good  job  and  they  are  quite 
busy  down  there,  as  you  know.  The  fact  that  you’ve  had  this  dif-
ficulty  with  these  123-foot  boats,  how  do  you  expect  that  the  100- 
foot boats are going to mitigate the decommissioned boats? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  sir.  We  have  two  strategies.  Obviously,  we 
need to replace these boats as fast as we can and that’s an acquisi-
tion plan which we will have a request for proposals released next 
month to the industry and the Coast Guard will do that acquisition 
ourselves. 

In  the  meantime,  we  have  taken  the  eight  crews  of  the  123-foot 
patrol  boats  that  have  now  been  laid  up  and  we  are  pairing  them 
with  110-foot  patrol  boats,  both  in  Miami  and  St.  Pete  and  we  are 
double-crewing those boats so we’re able to recoup about 50 percent 
of the hours we would have had out of the 123-foot cutters. 

In  addition  to  that,  we  are  using  other  cutters  to  cover  and  we 
are also using more aviation patrols to cut down on the amount of 
time that boats are out there doing patrol and make them more ef-
fective by using air assets to vector them in. In addition, I’ve nego-
tiated  with  the  Chief  of  Naval  Operations  to  retain  three  179-foot 
patrol craft that we were scheduled to give back at the end of Fis-
cal  Year  2008.  We’ve  got  those  through  Fiscal  Year  2011  and  the 
combination  of  all  of  those  is  allowing  us  to  bridge  the  gap  but  we 
need to move at best speed and replace these cutters, sir. 

Senator NELSON. In the Key West sector, how many Coast Guard 

ships are currently on patrol? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  I’d  have  to  check  our  morning  brief  to  give  you 
that  answer,  sir  and  I  can  give  you  the  answer  for  today.  I  would 
tell you that a lot of the assets that are in the Key West sector are 
not  from  Key  West.  Our  large  cutters,  which  are  stationed  around 
the  coastline  routinely  deploy  down  there  so  we  might  have  a  cut-
ter from the mid-Atlantic homeport area down in Key West at any 
particular  time.  We’d  be  happy  to  give  you  the  force  lay  down  for 
this morning, sir. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  can  you  give  me  an  approximation  right 

Admiral ALLEN. We—as a rule, we keep two large cutters in and 
around  the  Straits  of  Florida.  We  usually  keep  a  cutter  down  in 

now? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

27 

Windward  Pass  and  another  large  cutter  in  Mona  Pass,  between 
the  Dominican  Republic  and  Puerto  Rico.  In  addition,  we  have  pa-
trol  boats  that  operate  at  a  lower  level  because  they  are  faster. 
They  go  out  and  they  can  actually  intercept  the  targets  of  interest 
and  we  also  have  a  significant  aviation  lay  down.  I  would  rather 
not  get  into  the  exact  number  for  some  obvious  reasons.  I’d  be 
happy to provide it to you off the record, sir. 

Senator  NELSON.  OK.  That’s  two,  three  big  boats  and  then  a 
bunch of smaller boats and then aircraft and of course, you all are 
doing  a  lot  down  there.  You’re  doing  search  and  rescue,  you’ve  got 
the  largest  concentration  of  recreational  vessels  in  the  country 
down there. You’re interdicting drugs. You’re interdicting migrants. 
It’s  quite  busy  and  you’re  doing  that  with  three  boats  plus  a  few 
little boats. 

Admiral  ALLEN.  No,  sir.  Within  the  approaches  to  the  Southeast 
United States at any one particular time, approximately five major 
cutters—there  will  probably  be  anywhere  from,  I  would  say,  four 
to six patrol boats and as you know, we have the 33-foot fast inter-
ceptors  and  a  lot  of  other  boats  down  there.  In  addition,  further 
south,  there  are  a  large  number  of  vessels  that  are  working  for  a 
Joint Interagency Task Force South as the second layer down there 
and  we  move  those  boats  back  and  forth  from  what  we  would  call 
the  tactical  command  of  the  Joint  Task  Force  South,  back  to  the 
7th  District  if  we  think  we  need  them,  if  there  was  a  spike  from 
either  Cuba,  Haiti  or  the  Dominican  Republic,  more  than  what 
we’re used to seeing, sir. 

Again, what I would propose if I could is to give you a classified 

brief, sir. 

Senator  NELSON.  OK.  Now  you  all,  along  with  the  Navy  and 
other  agencies,  have  a  plan  on  the  shelf  called  Operation  Vigilant 
Sentry. 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  In  case  we  had  a  mass  migration.  So  if  you 
had—well,  first  of  all,  what  would  you  consider  a  mass  migration? 
How many? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Sir,  we  measure  the  migrant  threat  down  there 
in terms of flow. In other words, we interdict migrants today. They 
are  interviewed  for  a  credible  fear  of  persecution,  lacking  rea-
son—— 

Senator NELSON. That’s the present. 
Admiral ALLEN. Right. 
Senator  NELSON.  I’m  talking  about  a  mass  migration.  What 

would you consider a mass migration? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  We  go  through  three  stages  of  readiness.  When 
we  start  getting  up  to  about  300  a  day,  that  gets  us  to  one  level. 
When  we  get  up  to  about  7,000  a  week,  that  gets  us  to  another 
level  and  then  a  higher  threshold  and  at  each  point,  if  we  cannot 
keep up with the flow or the decision is made that we might not— 
we  might  have  to  use  the  facilities  at  Guantomino  Bay.  A  higher- 
level threshold kicks in and the Navy assets are sent to support us. 
Again,  those  cutoff  areas,  I’d  like  to  provide  you  a  separate  brief-
ing,  if  I  could,  sir.  But  the  plan  is  in  place  and  the  Navy  is  pre-
pared to provide the assets, sir. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

28 

Senator NELSON. Right. But for the record now, let’s say that you 
had  a  mass  migration  in  your  second  stage  there,  7,000  a  week. 
How many boats would you deploy to interdict? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Well,  there  are  certain  events,  whether  it  is 
Katrina  or  a  mass  migration  or  the  events  we  had  when  we  had 
President  Aristide  leave  Haiti  and  we  thought  we  were  going  to 
have a mass migration just a couple years ago. That’s an all hands 
on  deck  evolution.  We  would  look  at  all  assets  that  were  available 
in  the  Atlantic  area  and  would  send  a  number  of  cutters  down 
there.  I  think  within  at  least  72  hours—and  we  would  have  warn-
ing on this because we have indications that would tell it was com-
ing—we would have upwards of 19 to 20 cutters there, sir. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  you  could  get  19  to  20  cutters  in  the  Key 
West Straits, in the Florida Straits, you could get that there within 
3 days? 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  What  percentage  of  the  migrants  do  you  think 
would get through with 19 or 20 cutters with your second level mi-
gration of 7,000 per week? 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, sir. Were the plans to kick in, we would ba-
sically  have  two  picket  lines.  One  would  be  sitting  off  the  north 
coast of Cuba and one would be sitting off the Florida Keys because 
you have both the chance of both northbound and southbound traf-
fic.  So  you  have  back-to-back  picket  lines,  if  you  will.  We  under-
stand  there  may  be  leakage,  the  planning  of  factors  that  Admiral 
Kunkle  has  been  using  down  in  the  7th  District  to  do  exercises 
lately.  Even  if  we  interdicted  95  percent  and  you  had  5  percent 
come  ashore,  you  would  be  dealing  with  migrants  ashore,  which  I 
think is the question you’re asking, sir. 

Senator NELSON. So you’re saying that you would have a 95 per-

cent pick-up rate? 

2 of 7,000 per week? 

Admiral ALLEN. We would attempt to do that, yes sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  Well,  what  are  you  expecting  with  your  Level 

Admiral ALLEN. Well, you have to have the flow—you take a look 
at the flow you’re expecting and you put the number of assets and 
you  keep  bringing  assets  in.  If  we  had  to  employ  an  entire  expedi-
tionary  strike  group  from  the  Navy,  that  would  be  done,  sir.  It 
would not be all Coast Guard. 

Senator CANTWELL. Senator Nelson? Your time has expired here. 
Senator NELSON. Well, I’m just getting warmed up. 
Senator CANTWELL. Good. Is that an area, do you think, that we 

should have a separate hearing on as well? 

Senator NELSON. I’ll wait until the second round. 
Senator CANTWELL. OK. I think it’s an important area as we talk 
about  Deepwater  assets  and  the  challenges  with  the  Deepwater 
Program  and  making  improvements  to  it  that  we  also  do  under-
stand our security emergencies that may occur. So I think your line 
of  questioning  is  very  important  and  I—besides  going  to  a  second 
round,  I  hope  that  if  you  believe  we  should  have  further  oversight 
of this that the Committee would consider it. 
Admiral back to a couple of questions—— 
Senator NELSON. Madam Chair, I was under the impression that 
we were concerned about the reduction of these 120-some foot boats 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

29 

and we’ve got a potential crisis that we hope it’s not going to occur 
but there certainly are rumblings and I’d like to know the effect of 
that  from  the  Commandant  with  regard  to  the  Straits  of  Florida 
and the protection of the homeland. 

Senator CANTWELL. A very important question, Senator, very im-
portant. Admiral, I’m back to my question earlier in the first round 
about  DOD.  There  are  two  program  reporting  requirements  that 
Congress  uses  in  other  military  acquisitions.  One  is  the  Selected 
Acquisition  Reports  and  the  other  is  the  Unit  Cost  Reports.  Both 
of these provide different types of information on the schedule and 
cost problems of acquisition and it’s something, obviously, we’d like 
to  see  the  Coast  Guard  use  moving  forward.  I  don’t  know  if  you 
have thoughts on that today or if you can get us an answer in writ-
ing. 

Admiral  ALLEN.  I’m  not  familiar  with  the  specifics  of  the  report 
but  I’d  be  more  than  happy.  If  I  could  just  make  a  comment, 
though,  on  Navy  processes  and  Coast  Guard  processes,  I’ve  had 
several meetings with Secretary Winter, the Secretary of the Navy 
and  I’ve  had  several  meetings  with  Admiral  Mike  Mullins,  the 
Chief  of  Naval  Operations.  In  addition  to  the  announcements  that 
I  made  yesterday,  we  are  going  to  be  meeting  periodically  with 
Deputy Secretary Jackson, Secretary Winter, Admiral Mike Mullin, 
and myself to take a look at how both of our shipbuilding programs 
are going, what we might learn from each other and how we might 
get  more  equal  approach  on  how  we’re  dealing  with  industry.  I’d 
be happy to report back to you on how that moves. Our first meet-
ing is scheduled within the next month. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Admiral  Allen,  another  area,  obviously,  of 
concern  is  the  Rescue  21  program  and  as  we’ve  looked  at  this  pro-
gram  within  the  budget  here,  it  obviously  has  had  its  problems. 
You’ve  done  some  demonstration  but  I’m  troubled  by  the  GAO  re-
ports  that  Rescue  21  may  not  deliver  on  its  capabilities  either. 
Could you make some comment about that and the production sites 
that  have  already  been  underway  and  the  results  of  those  studies 
and analyses? 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, ma’am. I don’t think there is any doubt that 
we  had  a  couple  of  barriers  early  on  in  this  program.  One  of  them 
was,  I  don’t  think  we  realize  in  the  Coast  Guard  that  we  weren’t 
really  buying  a  radio  system,  we  were  buying  a  large  software  ap-
plication  with  radios  attached  to  it.  The  software  code  that  had  to 
be  written  and  the  integration  that  had  to  be  done  to  be  able  to 
manage  this  system,  I  think,  was  underestimated  by  both  parties. 
We  are  over  that  now.  We  have  passed  the  test  and  evaluation 
of  the  software.  We  have  passed  low  rate  production  and  are  mov-
ing  into  full  rate  production  this  year.  We  have  successfully  de-
ployed  these  systems  on  the  East  Coast  in  Atlantic  City  and  the 
eastern  shore  of  Virginia.  We  most  recently  rolled  it  out  in  the 
Tampa  area.  They  were  successful  in  establishing  an  emergency 
site  south  of  New  Orleans  following  Katrina  and  I  think  as  you 
well  know,  most  notably,  recently  we’ve  come  online  in  the  Port 
Angeles area. 

We  think  the  program  is  back  on  track.  We’re  looking  to  go 
ahead  and  finish  the  execution  of  this  program  in  the  next  three 
to 4 years, as was noted in the opening statement. We think it has 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

30 

stabilized. The issue now is to make sure that we control costs, we 
provide  the  proper  oversight  and  we  stay  within  the  acquisition 
baseline. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  what  about  asset  tracking  and  data 
transfer?  Are  those  going  to  be  included  in  the  Rescue  21  system? 
Admiral  ALLEN.  They  may  or  may  not.  Asset  tracking  was  a 
problem earlier on but we may have alternate technologies or alter-
nate ways where we need—we can probably deal with that. 

As  you  know,  in  the  commercial  world  now,  we  have  automated 
identification systems so technology has moved past where we were 
when we solicited that proposal. That was problematic from a tech-
nical  standpoint  early  on  and  we  removed  that  from  the  require-
ments  and  we  may  come  at  that  from  a  different  direction  for  the 
Coast Guard. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, being I think the second largest acqui-
sition  program  within  the  budget  and  having  some  of  the  same 
problems that we’ve seen in Deepwater; that is, project monitoring, 
risk  management,  executive  level  oversight  and  some  of  these 
things  you’re  saying,  you’re  right.  We’re  not  going  to  do  them  now 
because they were challenging the asset tracking. 

That  whole  question  of  the  oversight  and  the  specification  of 
what capabilities are required, what the Coast Guard really wants 
to  see  in  the  delivery  of  these  assets  is  critically  important  and 
critically important who owns them when we’re going to make that 
commitment  and  not  just  because  of  the  complexity  of  the  project, 
come  back  and  change  or  drop  some  of  these  assets.  So  I  am  very 
concerned  about  that  oversight  and  how  we  get  to  a  final  date  for 
delivery that we all feel confident that we’re going to achieve. 

Admiral ALLEN. I think we’re fairly confident in the delivery date 
right  now.  A  lot  of  the  things  that  we  have  just  talked  about  with 
Deepwater—we  actually  went  through  last  summer  and  last  fall 
with  General  Dynamics.  I  personally  met  with  the  CEO.  I  went  to 
Scottsdale and we re-baselined the program. We established a good 
technical  baseline  from  which  to  operate  and  moved  into  4A  pro-
duction.  My  confidence  is  increasing  every  day  that  we  will  come 
in on schedule on Rescue 21. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  But  do  you  think  that  there  is  a  particular 
problem  here  in  how  the  specification  and  designs  are  done  for 
these assets, across the Coast Guard? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Rescue  21  was  dramatically  different  than  our 
other  acquisitions,  as  I  said  early  on.  And  this  is  my  impression. 
I  haven’t  received  a  lot  of  briefs  on  it.  The  amount  of  software  or 
code that had to be written because what we were doing is we were 
taking  analog  signal  and  an  antenna,  digitizing  it  and  going  to 
Voice  over  Internet  Protocol  and  basically  taking  it  to  a  data  net-
work.  So  from  the  minute  that  signal  hits  the  antenna,  we’re  all 
of  a  sudden  dealing  with  a  much  different  technical  solution  that 
we  had  ever  dealt  with  in  the  Coast  Guard  before  that  involved  a 
lot  of  software  integration.  In  my  view,  that  was  the  biggest  tech-
nical issue that we did not understand going into it. 

We  are  past  the  software  test  and  integration  right  now  and 
we’re  into  production  so  I  think  we  are  behind  that  or  past  that. 
Senator CANTWELL. I’ll have more questions on this but my time 

has expired. Senator Snowe? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

31 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you.  Admiral  Allen,  one  other  question 
regarding the Deepwater contract. I notice in the budget, obviously 
with  the  Coast  Guard  taking  over  as  lead  systems  integrator,  that 
there has not been a commensurate request for an increase in staff-
ing,  particularly  for  acquisition  staff  and  personnel.  Obviously 
you’d be shifting certain personnel, from within the budget, within 
your  agency,  but  they  will  not  have  the  acquisition  expertise  that 
is  essential  to  allow  the  Coast  Guard  to  effectively  manage  the 
oversight of the Deepwater Program. How do you explain that con-
tradiction in this budget and why haven’t you requested additional 
resources  to  provide  for  acquisition  personnel  that  have  expertise 
tailored and designed for this oversight responsibility? 

Admiral ALLEN. We’re coming at it from a couple different direc-
tions.  The  desired  end-state  is  a  unified  mission  support  organiza-
tion where acquisition and life cycle maintenance are all contained 
in  the  same  organization  in  the  Coast  Guard  work  for  the  same 
senior manager with single point accountability. 

As we make the transition, we will look at a mix of Coast Guard, 
other  government  employees,  Navy  or  other  people  that  have  that 
expertise  as  needed.  Independent  contractors  not  associated  with 
the  ones  that  do  work  for  us,  subject  to  signing  disclosure  state-
ments, should we use them. We have requested in this year’s budg-
et that we unify our personnel account for the purpose of personnel 
funding.  In  the  past,  each  one  of  our  accounts  has  had  to  source 
their own personnel from that appropriation. Putting all of our per-
sonnel  together  and  all  the  acquisition  organization  together  gives 
you  much  more  flexibility  on  how  to  apply  the  personnel  that  you 
do have. 

Additionally,  some  of  the  funds  that  have  been  allocated  in  the 
past for systems integration and project oversight that would have 
been  executed  through  ICGS  are  going  to  flow  to  the  Coast  Guard 
and  if  you  look  at  the  request  for  Coast  Guard  program  manage-
ment  versus  the  traditional  amount  of  money  that  was  given  to 
ICGS  to  do  that,  it’s  going  to  start  flowing  incrementally  as  we 
make  this  transition  from  the  ICGS  contract  to  the  Coast  Guard. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  in  the  ICGS,  how  many  Coast  Guard  per-

sonnel were assigned to it? 

Admiral ALLEN. Within the Deepwater Program overall, we have 
a  little  over  400  people.  About  a  third  of  those  are  military,  about 
a third are civilian and about a third of them are independent con-
tractors. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Because  one  of  the  original  reasons  for  creating 
the  ICGS  was  the  shortage  of  trained  and  experienced  acquisition 
personnel within the Coast Guard. So obviously, we don’t want this 
to be a weakness that ultimately results in the problems that we’re 
confronting today. 

Admiral ALLEN. Your point is well taken, Senator. Again, getting 
back  to  my  opening  statement,  this  is  an  issue  I  recognized  when 
I  became  the  Commandant  last  year  and  the  reorganization  of  the 
acquisition organization wasn’t in response to the press disclosures 
of  the  IG  report.  We  already  knew  well  over  a  year  ago  that  we 
needed  to  do  this  to  organize  the  Coast  Guard  more  effectively  to 
be able to execute these acquisitions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

32 

Senator SNOWE. The Administration is requesting an $8.7 billion 
budget  and  I  know  you  explained  the  reasons  why  you’re  essen-
tially  focusing  on  strategy  and  reshaping  the  command  structure. 
But it only represents a 1 percent increase from last year. We just 
recently  passed  the  SAFE  Port  Act,  for  example.  That  alone,  I 
think would put inordinate pressures on resources within the Coast 
Guard,  which  is  managing  not  only  that  mission  but  obviously  the 
other  missions  that  have,  I  think,  been  underserved  by  the  Coast 
Guard  recently.  This  is  a  departure,  I  think,  from  the  standard 
that  the  Coast  Guard  has  adhered  to  with  fisheries  enforcement 
onboard  compliance,  with  fishery  regulations  below  the  97  percent 
rate, as I mentioned in my opening statement. 

So  how  are  you  going  to  respond  to  port  security,  for  example, 
given  the  constraints  in  this  budget?  I  do  think  it  is  under-funded 
when  you  think  of  your  multimissions,  your  traditional  missions 
that also are going to be handicapped with this budget as well, the 
way it has been in the recent past. 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Well,  as  you  know,  we’re  working  through  the 
2009  budget  bill  process  inside  the  Administration  right  now  and 
clearly  there  are  issues  that  are  not  in  the  budget  this  year  that 
I am dealing with right now to go ahead and seek funding for that 
although  we  haven’t  finalized  it  so  I’m  not  at  liberty  to  detail  it. 
But  rest  assured,  based  on  my  comments  earlier,  now  that  the 
strategy  is  set  and  we  know  where  we’re  going,  we  have  to  source 
the  strategy  and  whatever  resources  we  are  seeking  need  to  be 
aligned  with  that  and  that  is  my  intention.  What  we  do  need  to 
focus on very shortly here is the Command Center issue and I’ll ex-
plain—for two reasons. Number one, the SAFE Port Act has a time 
limit  associated  with  that  but  in  a  larger  sense,  if  you  take  a  look 
at  what  we  need  to  be  doing  in  it  as  far  as  integrating  things 
across  the  Coast  Guard,  we  have  Rescue  21.  We  have  a  need  to 
configure  and  standardize  our  command  centers  and  be  responsive 
to  the  SAFE  Port  Act.  We  have  automated  identification  systems 
and long range tracking and our need to be interoperable with the 
Navy  where  we  have  fleet  concentrations  and  we  work  with  them. 
All  that  tells  me  that  the  solution  has  got  to  be  coming  forward, 
at  least  next  year,  on  where  we’re  going  with  command  centers, 
ma’am. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Senator CANTWELL. Senator Stevens? 
Senator STEVENS. Just following up on that, we mandated in the 
SAFE  Port  Act  that  we  have  a  long  range  vessel  tracking  system 
by April 1. We don’t have one yet, do we? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Sir,  we  have  access  to  sufficient  locating  data 
right  now.  Our  problem  is,  once  the  data  has  been  gathered,  how 
do  you  display  it  and  share  it  with  everybody.  Access  to  the  data 
is  not  a  problem  with  us  between  unclassified  and  classified  sys-
tems,  we  have  access  to  all  the  locating  data  that  we  need  right 
now,  sir.  The  challenge  is  bringing  that  down  and  putting  it  in  a 
commonly held architecture that everybody has access to, sir. 

Senator  STEVENS.  We  are  trying  to  deal  now  with  the  concept  of 
illegal,  unreported  and  unregulated  fishing  beyond  our  200  mile 
limit.  One  of  the  problems  we  have  is  that—take  the  Gulf  of  Alas-
ka. There are more and more of those vessels that are just outside 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

33 

our  limit  or  outside  even  the  Russian  limit  that  are  literally  vacu-
um cleaning the oceans with new tackle, new techniques. I assume 
you’ve seen the National Geographic article from last month? 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  STEVENS.  That  would  cover  that.  We’re  trying  to  find 
some  way  to  deal  with  that  and  we’ve  been  discussing  the  concept 
of having transponders on every vessel that fishes in the world and 
have those be capable of being tracked by satellite. Is that feasible, 
in your opinion? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  It  is  feasible,  sir.  Under  the  agreements  we  ne-
gotiated  last  year  at  IMO,  there  is  a  requirement  now  for  vessels 
over 300 gross tons and you get to a cutoff of what size fishing ves-
sel  you’re  talking  about.  But  at  least  for  vessels  over  300  gross 
tons,  from  countries  that  are  signatory  to  the  SOLUS  Convention, 
they  will  be  required  to  carry  long  range  tracking  or  transponders 
that  can  be  picked  up  within  a  1,000  miles  of  a  coastal  state  or  if 
they’ve declared their intent to enter a particular port, 2,000 miles, 
sir. 

We  are  negotiating  at  IMO  right  now  the  technical  standards 
and  how  that  is  going  to  be  actually  implemented.  In  our  view,  in 
the long run, that will be the way we need to do that. The question 
is,  will  there  be  vessels  less  than  300  gross  tons  that  we’re  going 
to need and how to treat those? Inside the United States, I’ve been 
directed  by  the  Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act  of  2002  to 
drive  transponder  carriage  requirements  down  to  vessels,  commer-
cial  vessels  65  feet  and  above.  That  would  pretty  much  take  care 
of  the  United  States  so  the  gap  that  would  be  remaining  at  that 
point would be vessels less than 300 gross tons, sir. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  we’re  trying  to  figure  out  where  these 
vessels have been and what they’ve harvested. National Geographic 
is  working  with  us  on  this.  We  thought  we  might  go  to  the  U.N. 
and  ask  them  to  give  us  some  assistance  like  they  did  on  the  drift 
nets. That hasn’t been a complete success yet but it has been a con-
siderable success in eliminating drift nets. 

I  don’t  know  really  how  to  tackle  this  in  terms  of  enforcement. 
You  don’t  have  enough  vessels  in  Alaska  right  now  to  take  care  of 
our  over  3  million  square  miles.  If  we  add  that  Gulf  to  it,  it’s  not 
possible  to  be  dealing  with  it.  We  asked  you  to  try  and  pioneer 
using UAVs. Are you going to continue that experiment? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  I  don’t  think—if  I  could  just  make  a  state-
ment. What we’re really dealing with here is what I would call tyr-
anny  of  distance,  sir  and  it’s  an  issue—in  Alaska,  it’s  an  issue  in 
the  high  seas  drift  net  areas  in  the  Central  Pacific.  It  is  an  issue 
of the new marine sanctuary north of Hawaii and I think we need 
to  take  a  new  technology  look  at  this  and  see  where  we  can  lever-
age technology because it’s impossible to put enough floating assets 
out there to cover all those areas. 

Senator  STEVENS.  It  has  to  be  sort  of  identification  of  who  is 
there  and  then  have  the  capability  to  warn  them  and  where  there 
is persistent violation, to have some kind of law enforcement. 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  STEVENS.  It  has  to  be  in  the  third  level.  What  would  it 
take for you to have that third level capability in the North Pacific? 

Admiral ALLEN. The response capabilities, sir? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

34 

Senator STEVENS. Yes. 
Admiral ALLEN. I think we have to figure out what the standard 
is. Do you want to have somebody, if you sighted a violation on the 
scene,  say  within  24,  48  or  72  hours.  As  you  know,  we  have  some 
of these cases where it takes us 10 or 14 days to get to the sighting 
where a C–130 had actually been over the top. The amount of ves-
sels  it  would  take  to  do  that  would  be  astronomically  high,  sir.  I 
think  you’d  have  to  come  up  with  a  risk-based  situation—what  is 
it  you  want  to  achieve  and  what  is  it  you’re  willing  to  give  up  to 
do  that?  Where  would  you  place  the  vessels  and  how  fast  you’d 
want  them  there,  sir.  I’d  be  glad  to  give  it  some  thought  and  give 
you an answer, sir. 

Senator STEVENS. One last question, if I may, Madam Chairman 
Do you have enough correspondence and communication with your 
foreign  counterparts  in  the  Pacific  to  keep  track  of  what  they  find 
out,  in  terms  of  what  vessels  come  back  to  their  ports  that  may 
have  been  in  our  waters  or  may  have  been  in  those  unregulated 
waters? 

Admiral ALLEN. I wouldn’t say it’s perfect but it is improving, sir. 
We  belong  to  something  called  the  North  Pacific  Coast  Guard 
Forum  and  that’s—there  is  annual  meeting  of  the  Heads  of  Coast 
Guards for the United States, Canada, Russia, South Korea, Japan 
and  China.  We  meet  every  year.  I  was  in  the  Hainan  Island  in 
China last October. We meet in St. Petersburg, Russia this coming 
September. One of the things we are addressing are the illegal fish-
eries out there. Last year, we actually deployed a Coast Guard cut-
ter  with  a  Chinese  ship  rider  who  would  help  us  enforce  when  we 
encountered  those  vessels.  Those  conversations  are  maturing  but 
you’re right. Those are the type of forum we’re going to have to get 
into if we’re going to solve the problem, sir. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  we  wish  you  luck.  I’m  sure  the  state  of 
Washington  has  the  same  interests  in  this.  We  lost  two  complete 
runs.  They  didn’t  even  come  back.  And  we’re  certain  now  that 
something is intercepting them and it’s too large a loss to be attrib-
uted  to  ocean  mammals.  This  has  to  be  a  concerted  attack  on  spe-
cific  species  that  are  very  valuable  now  on  the  world  market.  So 
I’d  like  to  be  able  to  work  with  you  in  the  coming  year  to  see  how 
we  might  find  some  way  to  put  the  fear  of  God  in  those  people  to 
just lay off our fish. Thank you. 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  sir.  And  I  might  add,  we’re  in  the  process 
of standing up a North Atlantic Coast Guard Forum with the coun-
tries that are in the North Atlantic, too. 

Senator CANTWELL. Senator Nelson? 
Senator NELSON. Thank you, Madam Chair. Picking up, you had 
stated  that  you  have  approximately  4  to  6  of  these  cutters  within 
Florida Straits area and I can’t say enough good things about your 
people  because  I  see  them  down  in  the  Miami  Beach  station  and 
I  see  them  down  in  the  St.  Petersburg  station  and  they  are  excel-
lent. 

My  concern  is  trying  to  get  ahead  of  the  power  curve  on  if  we 
were  to  have  a  mass  migration.  Now,  if  you’ve  got  4  to  6  down 
there  and  you  say  that  you  can  surge  to  19  to  20  ships  within  72 
hours, that’s 3 days. You would then have to bring assets from Nor-
folk and New England, would you not? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

35 

Admiral  ALLEN.  It  would  depend  on  which  cutters  were  under-
way at the time, sir. We would bring them from wherever we would 
need  them.  Obviously  from  New  England,  it  wouldn’t  be  there  in 
72  hours.  The  steaming  time  is  a  little  further  than  that  but  we 
have  cutters  in  the  Gulf.  We  have  cutters  in  the  Southeast  that 
could be surged down there, sir. 

Senator  NELSON.  How  many  cutters  in  Norfolk  would  you  have 

available to you? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Well,  we  have  a  certain  number  of  cutters  in 
Norfolk. Some of them are on patrol. Some of them are in a mainte-
nance  period.  I  can  give  you  an  exact  lay  down  of  all  the  cutter 
homeports  and  the  traveling  times  to  the  Straits,  sir,  in  great  de-
tail for the record, if you’d like. 

Senator NELSON. All right, if you would and if you would also in-
clude not from the time that you sail out of the port but the prepa-
ration time for the ship—the loading of the ship, the loading of the 
food  and  equipment,  the  gathering  of  the  crew.  From  the  time  the 
signal  comes  to  how  long  in  addition  to  the  3  days  traveling,  for 
example, that you just said, from Norfolk, is it going to take to get 
people  there  and  if  you  would  also  supply  for  the  record,  your 
greater elucidation on the fact of a 95 percent interdiction rate. 

[The information referred to follows:] 
The ability of various cutters to respond to a mass migration is dependent on nu-
merous  variables  including  number  and  flow  of  migrants,  as  well  as  weather  and 
the number and type of assets underway in the Florida Straits, Caribbean Sea and 
along  the  Eastern  seaboard.  The  Atlantic  Area  Commander  and  Operation  Vigilant 
Sentry  Commander,  in  accordance  with  OPLAN  VIGILANT  SENTRY,  coordinate 
the  deployment  of  all  assets  and  resources  to  South  Florida  in  the  event  of  a  mass 
migration.  The  first  cutters  to  respond  to  a  mass  migration  would  be  those  assets 
in an underway or standby status in the Florida Straits. For example, Coast Guard 
District  Seven  has,  on  average,  10  cutters  underway  or  in  a  standby  status  within 
a 12 hour transit of the Florida Straits that could respond immediately in the event 
of  a  mass  migration.  Subsequently,  the  Coast  Guard  would  then  deploy  other  cut-
ters underway or in standby from other locations. 

For  instance,  patrol  boats  from  the  Gulf  Coast  or  Medium  Endurance  Cutters 
(MEC)  from  the  Caribbean  Sea  can  be  redeployed.  The  last  cutters  to  be  deployed 
in the event of a mass migration would be those assets inport in a dedicated mainte-
nance period. These cutters would likely be unable to get underway on short notice. 
While  OPLAN  VIGILANT  SENTRY  details  how  many  cutters  are  required  to  re-
spond to a mass migration, below lists the 101 cutters that the Atlantic Area Com-
mander has available to respond to a mass migration in the Florida Straits: 

Cutter Class 

Cutter Name 

Homeport 

Underway 
Preparation 
Time (Hrs) 

Transit 
Distance 

(NM) 

Transit time 
to FL Straits 

(Hrs) 

110′ WPB 
270′ WMEC 
270′ WMEC 
87′ CPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
210′ WMEC 
87′ CPB 

CGC Drummond 

Key West, FL 

CGC Mohawk 

CGC Thetis 

CGC Sawfish 

CGC Sitkinak 

CGC Farallon 

Key West, FL 

Key West, FL 

Key West, FL 

Miami Beach, FL 

Miami Beach, FL 

CGC Chandeleur 

Miami Beach, FL 

CGC Nantucket 

Miami Beach, FL 

CGC Valiant 

CGC Dolphin 

Miami Beach, FL 

Miami Beach, FL 

48 

72 

72 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

72 

48 

0 

0 

0 

0 

175 

175 

175 

175 

175 

175 

0 

10 

0 

0 

12 

12 

12 

12 

12 

12 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

Cutter Class 

Cutter Name 

Homeport 

Underway 
Preparation 
Time (Hrs) 

Transit 
Distance 

(NM) 

Transit time 
to FL Straits 

(Hrs) 

36 

87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
175′ WLM 
210′ WMEC 
210′ WMEC 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
210′ WMEC 
210′ WMEC 
87′ CPB 
175′ WLM 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
225′ WLB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
210′ WMEC 
PC–179′ 
PC–179′ 
PC–179′ 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
225′ WLB 
378′ WHEC 
378′ WHEC 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 

CGC Gannet 

CGC Marlin 

Fort Lauderdale, FL 

Fort Meyers, FL 

CGC Key Biscayne 

St. Petersburg, FL 

CGC Knight Island 

St. Petersburg, FL 

CGC Kodiak Island 

St. Petersburg, FL 

CGC Pea Island 

St. Petersburg, FL 

CGC Joshua Appleyby 

St. Petersburg, FL 

CGC Venturous 

St. Petersburg, FL 

CGC Resolute 

St. Petersburg, FL 

CGC Hawk 

St. Petersburg, FL 

CGC Cormorant 

Fort Pierce, FL 

CGC Bluefin 

Fort Pierce, FL 

CGC Confidence 

Cape Canaveral, FL 

CGC Vigilant 

CGC Shrike 

Cape Canaveral, FL 

Cape Canaveral, FL 

CGC Maria Bray 

Jacksonville, FL 

CGC Kingfisher 

Jacksonville, FL 

CGC Seahawk 

CGC Bonito 

CGC Coho 

CGC Cypress 

CGC Stingray 

CGC Cobia 

CGC Decisive 

CGC Tempest 

CGC Tornado 

CGC Shamal 

CGC Razorbill 

CGC Pompano 

CGC Oak 

CGC Dallas 

CGC Gallatin 

Carabelle, FL 

Pensacola, FL 

Panama City, FL 

Mobile, AL 

Mobile, AL 

Mobile, AL 

Pascagoula, MS 

Pascagoula, MS 

Pascagoula, MS 

Pascagoula, MS 

Gulfport, MS 

Gulfport, MS 

Charleston, SC 

Charleston, SC 

Charleston, SC 

CGC Yellowfin 

Charleston, SC 

CGC Tarpon 

Savannah, GA 

CGC Sturgeon 

Grand Isle, LA 

CGC Pelican 

Abbeville, LA 

CGC Block Island 

Atlantic Beach, NC 

CGC Staten Island 

Atlantic Beach, NC 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

72 

72 

48 

48 

48 

72 

72 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

72 

48 

48 

72 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

72 

96 

96 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

204 

250 

286 

286 

286 

286 

286 

286 

286 

286 

300 

300 

320 

320 

320 

470 

470 

506 

506 

520 

544 

544 

544 

558 

558 

558 

558 

558 

558 

579 

579 

579 

579 

584 

600 

600 

668 

668 

14 

17 

19 

19 

19 

19 

19 

19 

19 

19 

20 

20 

21 

21 

21 

31 

31 

34 

34 

35 

36 

36 

36 

37 

37 

37 

37 

37 

37 

39 

39 

39 

39 

39 

40 

40 

45 

45 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

Cutter Class 

Cutter Name 

Homeport 

Underway 
Preparation 
Time (Hrs) 

Transit 
Distance 

(NM) 

Transit time 
to FL Straits 

(Hrs) 

37 

210′ WMEC 
225′ WLB 
87′ CPB 
210′ WMEC 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
270′ WMEC 
270′ WMEC 
270′ WMEC 
270′ WMEC 
270′ WMEC 
270′ WMEC 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
110′ WPB 
210′ WMEC 
210′ WMEC 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
87′ CPB 
225′ WLB 

CGC Diligence 

Wilmington, NC 

CGC Elm 

CGC Heron 

Atlantic Beach, NC 

Sabine, TX 

CGC Dauntless 

Galveston, TX 

CGC Manowar 

CGC Skipjack 

CGC Manta 

Galveston, TX 

Galveston, TX 

Freeport, TX 

CGC Amberjack 

Port Isabel, TX 

CGC Manatee 

Ingleside, TX 

CGC Steelhead 

Port Aransas, TX 

CGC Brant 

CGC Bear 

Corpus Christi, TX 

Portsmouth, VA 

CGC Forward 

Portsmouth, VA 

CGC Harriet Lane 

Portsmouth, VA 

CGC Legare 

Portsmouth, VA 

CGC Northland 

Portsmouth, VA 

CGC Tampa 

Portsmouth, VA 

CGC Albacore 

Little Creek, VA 

CGC Beluga 

CGC Cochito 

Little Creek, VA 

Little Creek, VA 

CGC Shearwater 

Portsouth, VA 

CGC Sea Horse 

Portsmouth, VA 

CGC Ocracoke 

CGC Sapelo 

San Juan, PR 

San Juan, PR 

CGC Matinicus 

San Juan, PR 

CGC Cushing 

San Juan, PR 

CGC Key Largo 

San Juan, PR 

CGC Chincoteague 

San Juan, PR 

CGC Bainbridge Island 

Highlands, NJ 

CGC Dependable 

Cape May, NJ 

CGC Vigorous 

Cape May, NJ 

CGC Sailfish 

CGC Mako 

CGC Finback 

CGC Ibis 

CGC Ridley 

CGC Chinook 

CGC Juniper 

Sandy Hook, NJ 

Cape May, NJ 

Cape May, NJ 

Cape May, NJ 

Montauk, NY 

New London, CT 

Newport, RI 

72 

72 

48 

72 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

72 

72 

72 

72 

72 

72 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

72 

72 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

48 

72 

668 

668 

736 

771 

771 

771 

797 

849 

850 

856 

873 

906 

906 

906 

906 

906 

906 

906 

906 

906 

906 

906 

965 

965 

965 

965 

965 

965 

1,106 

1,106 

1,106 

1,106 

1,106 

1,106 

1,106 

1,150 

1,183 

1,185 

45 

45 

49 

51 

51 

51 

53 

57 

57 

57 

58 

60 

60 

60 

60 

60 

60 

60 

60 

60 

60 

60 

64 

64 

64 

64 

64 

64 

74 

74 

74 

74 

74 

74 

74 

77 

79 

79 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

38 

Cutter Class 

Cutter Name 

Homeport 

225′ WLB 
87′ CPB 
110′ WPB 

110′ WPB 

110′ WPB 

CGC Willow 

Newport, RI 

CGC Tiger Shark 

Newport, RI 

CGC Grand Isle 

Gloucester, MA 

CGC Sanibel 

CGC Tybee 

Woods Hole, MA 

Woods Hole, MA 

270′ WMEC 

CGC Escanaba 

270′ WMEC 

CGC Seneca 

270′ WMEC 

CGC Spencer 

CGC Flyingfish 

87′ CPB 

87′ CPB 

Boston, MA 

Boston, MA 

Boston, MA 

Boston, MA 

CGC Hammerhead 

Woods Hole, MA 

210′ WMEC 

CGC Reliance 

Portsmouth, NH 

110′ WPB 

CGC Jefferson Island 

South Portland, ME 

270′ WMEC 

CGC Campbell 

270′ WMEC 

CGC Tahoma 

Kittery, ME 

Kittery, ME 

Underway 
Preparation 
Time (Hrs) 

Transit 
Distance 

(NM) 

Transit time 
to FL Straits 

(Hrs) 

72 

48 

48 

48 

48 

72 

72 

72 

48 

48 

72 

48 

72 

72 

1,185 

1,185 

1,343 

1,343 

1,343 

1,343 

1,343 

1,343 

1,343 

1,343 

1,360 

1,384 

1,400 

1,400 

79 

79 

90 

90 

90 

90 

90 

90 

90 

90 

91 

92 

93 

93 

87′ CPB 

48 

1,400 

CGC Moray 

Jonesport, ME 

Straits assumes that each cutter transits at a speed of 15 knots. 

93 
• The  time  required  for  a  cutter  to  transit  from  their  homeport  to  the  Florida 
• The amount of time needed for preparing the cutter to get underway and tran-
sit  to  the  Florida  Straits  assumes  that  each  cutter  is  in  a  maintenance  status 
in their homeport with no significant systems (engines, generator, etc.) down for 
maintenance.  Cutters  that  are  underway  or  in  a  readiness  status  will  be  able 
to  be  on  scene  in  the  Florida  Straits  much  sooner  than  the  table  may  indicate. 
At  any  given  time,  two  LANT  WPBs  and  two  LANT  MECs  are  in  drydock  at 
the CG Yard in the Mission Effectiveness Project (MEP). 

• Underway preparation time by cutter class and size: 

—378′ WHEC 96 hrs 
—270′ WMEC 72 hrs 
—225′ WLB 72 hrs 
—210′ WMEC 72 hrs 
—PC–179′ 48 hrs 
—175′ WLM 48 hrs 
—110′ WPB 48 hrs 
—87′ CPB 48 hrs 

Senator NELSON. For example, in the Cuban migrants that came 
in  1994,  you  had  a  surge  as  many  as  3,000  in  the  first  day.  How 
are we going to interdict 3,000 in the first day? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  sir.  A  couple  of  responses  to  that  and  I 
would  also  offer  you  another  classified  brief,  if  I  could,  on  indica-
tions  and  warning  and  what  we  would  know  and  how  we  would 
know it, sir. 

There  are  some  different  conditions  right  now  that  exist  that 
didn’t exist before the 1994–95 mass exodus because they are based 
on  the  migrant  accords  that  we  have  negotiated  with  Cuba  since 
then and that is the ability to repatriate to Cuba. A lot of what we 
may encounter down there is based on policy decisions that will be 
made  at  the  time  and  what  would  be  the  reaction  of  the  Cuban 
government.  As  long  as  we  can  manage  the  flow,  we  can  interdict 
and  repatriate  them  to  Cuba  and  it’s  not  an  issue.  The  issue  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

39 

when  we  don’t  have  enough  hulls  out  there  or  hull  space  for  the 
amount  of  people  we  are  interdicting  and  then  if  the  overflow  is 
Guantomino  Bay,  Cuba  after  that,  that’s  when  we  would  ask  for 
support  from  the  Navy.  Not  when  it  happened  but  well  before  and 
at  that  point,  we  are  capable  of  holding  a  significant  amount  of 
folks on decks out there. The real issue is, how to repatriate them, 
sir. 

Senator NELSON. And of course, what would spark a mass migra-
tion,  you  would  have  to  assume  the  worst,  that  you  couldn’t  repa-
triate  them  to  the  Island  of  Cuba  because  it  would  be  because  of 
the  turmoil  of  the  Cuban  government  that  would  cause  such  a 
mass  migration  that  would  not  be  a  cooperative  government  and 
when  you’re  talking  about  having  lots  of  folks  on  deck,  may  I  ask 
you  also  to  respond  to  us,  you  probably  know  that  there  is  some 
huge  percentage  of  the  Cuban  population  that  has  tuberculosis 
today. 

So you get a whole bunch of migrants on a ship and one of them 
has tuberculosis, how long is it going to take you to clean that ship 
before you can turn it around and use it again? So I would like you 
to  consider  all  of  those  things  and  please  respond  for  the  record. 
Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  sir.  I  would  offer  again,  it  would  be  very 
helpful just to make sure I am responsive to you, if I could arrange 
a classified briefing for you, sir. 

Senator  NELSON.  Absolutely.  I’ll  look  forward  to  that,  at  your 

convenience. 

course. 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, sir. 
Senator NELSON. Thank you. 
Admiral ALLEN. And if I could, it might be a good idea to include 
Admiral  Stavridis  from  the  U.S.  Southern  Command  because  they 
have a play in this, too, sir. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  I’ve  been  in  touch  with  him  as  well.  Of 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you.  Admiral  Allen,  my  colleagues,  I 
have  a  few  questions.  I’m  happy  to  stay  for  a  third  round  of  ques-
tions  if  anybody  has  any  additional  questions  but  Admiral,  if  I 
could,  back  to  the  Deepwater  Program  and  again,  since  it  is  the 
major acquisition part of the budget here, you can imagine our con-
cern,  obviously,  from  what’s  been—what  we  know  to  date  of  the 
Deepwater Program and acquisition. But back to your earlier com-
ment  in  answering  Senator  Snowe  about  moving  forward  with  the 
changes in contracts. 

I  think  you  were  referring  to  the  fact  that  the  new  contracts 
would  reflect  assets  that  were  part  of  the  Deepwater  plan  but  not 
necessarily  part  of  the  original  contract  and  that  you  would  apply 
these  new  standards  to  those  assets  moving  forward.  Is  that  cor-
rect?  You’re  not  going  to  go  back  to  those  assets  that  are  already 
contract and apply standards? 

Admiral ALLEN. If I can give you a two-part answer—— 
Senator CANTWELL. The manual, the—— 
Admiral  ALLEN.  The  entire  program  needs  to  be  brought  under 
an  acquisition  doctrine  that  is  responsive  to  the  way  we  have  ac-
quired  things  in  the  past  and  the  way  we  need  to  do  it  in  the  fu-
ture. That’s work in progress and everything else. The actual struc-
ture of the contract for the next 43 months when awarded, will put 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

40 

new  criteria,  performance  criteria  on  a  contract  that  will  allow  us, 
even under work in progress, to be able to monitor that. And if we 
are  not  satisfied  we’re  getting  the  performance  we  need  out  of  the 
contractor, we do not have to issue the task order against the con-
tract. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Including  the  Acquisition  Manual  Rules  and 

Regulations? 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  OK.  On  a  specific  asset  that  is  under  con-
tract  now  and  obviously  an  expansion  of  that  is  the  CASA  Mari-
time Patrol Aircraft? I’m assuming that you are familiar with that. 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  One  of  the  issues  that  I  want  to  make  sure 
that  we’re  focusing  on  moving  forward  is  transparency  and  obvi-
ously,  I  think  we  want  to  understand  the  decisionmaking  process 
on  the  CASA  Maritime  Patrol  Aircraft.  Was  security  part  of  the 
analysis, safety and security issues? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  I  would  have  to  go  back  and  check  the  evalua-
tion  that  was  done  on  the  proposals  exactly  how  that  manifested 
itself.  I’m  not  sure  I  understand  by  security  what  you  mean, 
ma’am. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, more specifically, safety. 
Admiral  ALLEN.  If  you’re  talking  about  safety  in  regards  to  the 
airframe  itself,  we  are  satisfied  it  has  an  adequate  safety  record. 
We  are  aware  that  there  have  been  incidents  with  CASAs  around 
the world. In fact, I had my staff take a look at it and our analysis 
of that leads us to believe that in most cases, it was pilot error that 
was associated with those mishaps. 

Senator CANTWELL. Nine crashes resulting in 92 fatalities? 
Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  ma’am.  I’ve  actually  got  a  list  and  I  can 

provide it for the record. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

Date 

Location 

Occupants 

Fatalities 

Narrative 

List of CASA 235 Crashes 

25FEB92 

Antarctica 

18OCT92 

Indonesia 

22MAY97 

Indonesia 

19JAN01 

Turkey 

16MAY01 

Turkey 

18MAY01 

Turkey 

11 

31 

6 

3 

34 

4 

0  Crashed in snow. 

31  The CASA was descending from 11,000 ft to 8,000 ft 
when it struck a hill (Puntang Mountain). The ac-
cident happened during a heavy rainstorm. 

6  Lost control while testing the LAPES (Low Altitude 
Parachute  Extraction  System)  to  drop  a  400kg 
load  from  a  height  of  200m.  The  parachute  har-
ness  apparently  detached  during  the  process, 
causing  the  400kg  load  to  remain  on  the  cargo 
door. Control was lost and the aircraft crashed. 

3  Crashed  after  entering  a  spin  from  which  recovery 

was not possible. 

34  Control  was  lost  at  17,000  ft  and  the  aircraft 

crashed. 

4  Crashed  after  reaching  an  altitude  of  just  100  feet. 
The  CN–235  plane  was  one  of  eight  that  was 
being  modified  for  use  by  the  Turkish  Navy,  and 
was on its final test flight. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

41 

List of CASA 235 Crashes—Continued 

Date 

Location 

Occupants 

Fatalities 

Narrative 

29AUG01 

Spain 

47 

17DEC03 

France 

7 

21JUL05 

Indonesia 

23 

4  The flight was cleared for an instrument landing ap-
proach.  After  switching  from  the  Approach  to  the 
Tower  radio  frequency,  a  no.  1  engine  fire  warn-
ing  was  noted  by  the  crew.  The  co-pilot  advised 
Malaga Tower of the emergency ‘‘estamos en corta 
final,  llevamos  fuego  en  un  motor,  declaramos 
emergencia.’’ The co-pilot followed emergency pro-
cedures, during which both engines were switched 
off.  The  plane  descended  and  collided  with  the 
post of the first approach lights, 538 meters short 
of  the  runway  threshold.  It  slid  220  meters,  dur-
ing which it hit five approach light stanchions and 
finally  hit 
the  N–340 
motorway. 

the  embankment  of 

7  The  CASA  departed  Toulouse-Francazal  to  drop 
parachutists  in  the  area  of  Foix.  The  airplane 
crashed in a mountainous area, killing all aboard. 
Reportedly  a  number  of  parachutists  had  already 
left the plane. 

3  Crashed  while  on  final  approach  to  Lhokseumawe’s 
runway  24.  It  has  been  reported  that  an  engine 
failed on finals. 

Note:  Taken  from  Flight  Safety  Foundation  Aviation  Safety  Network.  This  information  is  not  presented  as  the  Flight  Safety  Foun-
dation  or  the  Aviation  Safety  Network’s  opinion  as  to  the  cause  of  the  accident.  It  is  preliminary  and  is  based  on  the  facts  as  they 
were  known  at  the  time. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  if  we  went  back  to  the  Deepwater  Pro-
gram,  would  we  see—you’re  saying  as  far  as  the  specification  and 
design and asset capability, safety would have been—— 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Oh,  air  worthiness  is  always  a  concern.  They 
have  to  be  certified  for  use  in  this  country.  I  would  tell  you  that 
all  three  industry  teams  that  submitted  a  proposal  for  Deepwater 
included  the  CASA—included  Boeing,  who  is  an  aircraft  manufac-
turer. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I’m  more  interested  in  this,  our  process  of 
laying  out  because  I  see  a  trend  here  and  at  least  with  Rescue  21 
and  with  the  Deepwater  Program,  I  want  to  understand  how  the 
Coast  Guard  lays  out  the  specifications  that  it  wants  to  see  in  the 
design and the delivery of the assets and how that then is commu-
nicated.  Obviously  one  of  the  greatest  concerns  about  the  Deep-
water  Program  was  the  concern  about  coming  back  and  then 
changing  the  specifications  of  the  assets  that  were  to  be  delivered. 
So obviously we want to be very clear moving forward what that 
process is, how the specification and design work is done and obvi-
ously,  we  want  the  engineering  logistic  team  in  Baltimore  to  play 
the key role. We want to go back to using the Systems Acquisition 
Manual  so  that  those  processes  are  clear.  We  don’t  want  contrac-
tors coming back and saying—making the ultimate decision nor do 
we want the contractors saying that somehow the process changed 
three  times  and  that’s  why  the  taxpayers  are  going  to  pay  instead 
of  $300  million  for  the  National  Security  Cutter,  closer  to  a  billion 
dollars. So this is a very, to me, a key point about how the process 
works. 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  ma’am.  We’re  in  complete  agreement.  I 
might add that regarding the aviation assets, we do have an estab-
lished technical authority. We have a product manager at the Avia-
tion Recovery and Supply Center in Elizabeth City. They were com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

42 

pletely  involved  in  this  and  in  fact,  the  first  aircraft  that  was  of-
fered by ICGS was rejected by the Coast Guard. It was a CASA 235 
extended  range  that  we  felt  didn’t  meet  the  operation  parameters 
and  there  might  have  been  safety  problems  and  actually  rejected 
the first airframe offered. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  is  the  U.S.  Border  Protection—they  are 

purchasing a different aircraft? 

Admiral ALLEN. They are. They are purchasing the Dash 8. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  That’s  not  an  aircraft  that  the  Coast  Guard 

wanted to purchase? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  It’s  in  the  same  area  regarding  performance. 
There  were  a  couple  of  things  that  the  CASA  gives  us  that  the 
Dash  8  didn’t.  The  CASA  has  a  stern  rear  ramp  that  drops  down. 
It  can  take  up  to  three  military  pallets.  In  fact,  that’s  the  way 
we’re putting the sensor operator system into it and we also intro-
duced  a  very  large  observer  window  because  when  we  fly  these 
things on search and rescue cases, we have to be able to look down 
for  folks  that  are  in  the  water  so  the  configuration  is  slightly  dif-
ferent and the Dash 8 wouldn’t have given us that level of perform-
ance. It is a little faster than our CASA. Customs puts a premium 
on that because they do air intercepts. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  the  $19  million  difference  between  those 

two planes, you’re saying, is that ability to release cargo? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  There  are  a  couple  other  differences.  It  has  to 
do with the avionics and the cockpit configuration but we can give 
you a side by side. 

Senator CANTWELL. Can I get the original, as I said, spec and de-
sign  requirements  that  the  Coast  Guard  was  providing  that,  pro-
vided for the bidding on that aircraft? 

Admiral ALLEN. I’d be happy to do that, ma’am. 
[The information referred to follows:] 
During  Phase  I  of  the  Deepwater  Program  in  March  1999,  Team  Deepwater, 
which  later  became  Integrated  Coast  Guard  Systems  (ICGS)  conducted  an  evalua-
tion of 16 candidate aircraft to consider for selection as the Coast Guard’s Maritime 
Patrol  Aircraft  (MPA).  Both  turboprop  and  jet  aircraft  were  considered.  New  fixed- 
wing  aircraft  alternatives  were  investigated,  all  with  the  potential  to  complement 
or  replace  Legacy  Aviation  assets  in  the  Integrated  Deepwater  System  (IDS).  Can-
didate  alternatives  were  evaluated  to  reduce  operating  costs,  improve  mission  per-
formance, and expand upon Legacy fixed-wing multi-mission capabilities. Most like-
ly candidates were recommended for further analysis. The evaluation included three 
separate CASA products. 

As  part  of  the  Deepwater  Final  Phase  II  Proposal,  submitted  to  the  Coast  Guard 
in  June  2002,  the  Coast  Guard  accepted  ICGS’s  Integrated  Deepwater  Systems  de-
sign that included the CASA CN–325–300M ER. This extended-range version of the 
Commercial  Off  The  Shelf  (COTS)  CN–235–300  included  modifications  to  the  basic 
aircraft in order to meet the performance specifications unique to Coast Guard mis-
sions. 

Coast Guard Aviation officials had concerns about the capabilities of the proposed 
aircraft.  The  main  concern  was  with  the  aircraft’s  growth  margin  because  the  pro-
posed aircraft included airframe modifications, but did not include a modified power-
plant. These concerns over the perception that the CN–235–300M ER could not safe-
ly  carry  a  full  fuel  load  while  operating  in  certain  hot  weather  locations  that  led 
the  Coast  Guard  to  request  that  ICGS  conduct  a  another  MPA  Analysis  of  Alter-
natives (AoA). Aircraft performance, total ownership cost, and capability to perform 
mission were examined. The results of the analysis recommended the change to the 
CN–235–300M from the CH–235–300M ER. 

The results of this analysis were briefed to the Commandant in March 2003. The 
Commandant approved the selection with a decision memo on 10 March 2003, desig-
nating  the  CN–235–300M  as  a  Maritime  Patrol  Aircraft  in  the  IDS  (the  HC–130H/ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

43 

J  is  the  other  MPA).  A  contract  for  the  development  and  demonstration  of  the  first 
two CN–235–300Ms was signed in May 2003. 

A  subsequent  business  case  analysis  was  completed  by  ICGS  in  December  2004. 
This analysis, once again, compared the CN–235–300M, CN–235–300M ER, and C– 
27J.  The  analysis  assessed  the  operational  effectiveness  and  total  ownership  costs 
of switching from the CN–235–300M from the CN–235–300M ER. The analysis con-
firmed  the  CN–235–300M  was  capable  of  performing  all  its  missions  and  exhibited 
better weight growth and climb performance characteristics. 

In  December  2006,  the  first  CN–235–300M  was  delivered  to  the  Coast  Guard  at 
the  CASA  facility  in  Seville,  Spain.  Pilot  and  aircrew  training  were  conducted  on-
site. The aircraft was then flown from Spain to the Coast Guard Aircraft Repair and 
Supply  Center  (ARSC)  in  Elizabeth  City,  North  Carolina,  where  the  mission  pallet 
is  being  integrated  with  the  aircraft.  The  pilot  in  command,  CDR  Douglas  Nash 
from Aviation Training Center Mobile, AL had this to say about the CASA CN–235– 
300M (official military designation HC–144A): 

‘‘It has been a pleasure learning to fly the HC–144 with its docile flight charac-
teristics,  simple  mechanical  systems,  and  a  state-of-the-art  avionics  suite  pro-
viding incredible situational awareness and ease of operation. Its wide array of 
automated safety and surveillance systems and built in mechanical redundancy 
will  help  avert  potential  mishaps,  while  it’s  roomy  cockpit  and  quiet,  com-
fortable  cabin  are  ideal  for  the  7  to  10  hour  surveillance  missions  the  aircraft 
will  be  performing.  Also  impressive  is  the  aircraft’s  low  speed  handling  charac-
teristics,  and  the  outstanding  visibility  from  the  large  cockpit  windows  and 
cabin  bubble  windows,  features  that  will  prove  crucial  in  performing  surveil-
lance and SAR missions.’’ 

It  is  important  to  point  out  that  individual  aviation  assets  are  not  required  to 
meet each requirement and/or fill every function, just as Aviation assets are not in-
tended to meet each and every requirement of the entire System Performance Speci-
fication  (SPS).  Aviation  assets  that  contribute  to  the  overall  IDS  and  the  aviation 
asset mix were selected based on performance and cost. The MPA is one part of the 
Deepwater  Program.  It  provides  a  Medium  Range  Surveillance  capability  that  sup-
ports the 11 Congressionally mandated missions assigned to the Coast Guard. 

March 1999 

June 2002 

November 2002 

March 2003 

May 2003 

December 2004 

CY 2005 

December 2006 

MPA Timetable 

Deepwater Phase I Analysis of Alternatives for Aviation Assets complete. 

Revised  Final  Proposal  from  ICGS  accepted  by  Coast  Guard.  Proposal  in-

cluded CN–235–300M ER as replacement MPA. 

MPA  Platform  Analysis  study  by  ICGS  to  validate  selection  of  CN–235– 

300M ER. 

Analysis  of  Alternatives  on  risk  mitigation  activities  for  MPA  complete. 
Showed  upgrade  to  CN–235–300M  ER  from  CN–235–300M  not  appro-
priate. 

Results  briefed  to  Commandant.  Congressional  language  in  FY03  budget 

directs Coast Guard to acquire replacement MPA. 

Commandant  signed  decision  memo  designating  CN–235–300M  as  MPA 

within IDS. 

Contract  signed  with  ICGS  for  development  and  demonstration  of  MPA  1 

& 2. 

ICGS  conducted  business  case  analysis  on  MPA  selection.  Analysis  con-
firmed performance characteristics a mission performance capabilities of 
CN–235–300M as compared with CN–235–300M ER. 

Design & production of CN–235–300M. 

Delivery  of  first  CN–235–300M  to  Coast  Guard.  Pilot  in  command  gives 
very favorable endorsement to aircraft’s performance & safety character-
istics. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you.  And  we  will  have  other  ques-
tions, I’m sure, that we’ll want you to answer in writing about the 
Deepwater  Program  but  if  I  could,  because  there  are  so  many 
issues  that  the  Committee  is  concerned  with  as  it  relates  to  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

44 

Coast Guard 2008 budget. One of them is the polar icebreakers and 
I mentioned that in my statement earlier. Why does the budget re-
quest again not include funds for the Polar Icebreaker fleet? 

Admiral ALLEN. We are in the process right now of trying to get 
a  policy  determination  on  how  to  move  forward  with  polar 
icebreaking. If I could take you back a few years when we were in 
the  process  of  acquiring  HEALY.  That  was  done  pursuant  to  a 
Presidential determination requiring the need for icebreakers. 

The  National  Academy  of  Science  has  produced  a  study  last  fall 
that basically validated the need for three icebreakers and that we 
should proceed with a plan on how to recapitalize those. We are at-
tempting  to  work  through  the  policy  apparatus  in  the  Administra-
tion  right  now  to  establish  what  the  requirements  are  for  polar 
icebreaking  and  I’ve  laid  out  internally  to  the  Coast  Guard,  there 
are  three  knotty  problems  that  I’ve  got  to  get  my  arms  around 
while I’m Commandant. One of them is the polar icebreakers. 

The  other  one  is  the  inland  Aids  to  Navigation  vessels  and  the 
third  one  is  the  condition  of  our  shore  infrastructure  and  moving 
forward into the 2009 budget and beyond, we’ll be looking to attack 
those problems, ma’am. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  I  know,  Admiral,  that  you  are  just  new 
as Commandant, relatively new but we did include—this is not the 
first time that this Committee has been very direct or the Congress 
has been very direct about this. In fact, in the Maritime Transpor-
tation  Act  of  2006,  we  called  for  the  Coast  Guard  to  submit  such 
a plan. We required that plan and instead what we got is basically 
that  we’re  going  to  continue  to  rely  on  the  National  Science  Foun-
dation. 

So  this  is  of  great  concern  to  many  of  us  on  the  Committee  that 
the  specific  plan  funding,  recapitalization  all  need  to  be  there.  We 
are not going to continue to see this mission undermined by an Ad-
ministration  who  wants  to  contract  out  for  these  kinds  of  services 
through  the  National  Science  Foundation,  leaving  the  critical  re-
sources  that  are  there  with  the—is  it  the  POLAR  STAR  or  the 
POLAR SEA? 

ma’am. 

Admiral  ALLEN.  POLAR  SEA  is  the  one  that  is  operating  now, 

Senator  CANTWELL.  The  POLAR  SEA—we’re  not  going  to  see  a 
budget  play  that  leaves  the  resources  of  the  POLAR  SEA  to  play 
catch up to a contractor that couldn’t deliver to begin with and now 
we have vessels stranded and then the POLAR SEA has to respond 
to  support  them.  So  it  seems  to  us—it’s  very  clear  that  there  is  a 
budget game going on here and the real question is, do these assets 
need  to  be  funded  through  the  Coast  Guard?  My  sense  is  looking 
at scientific information even though we have climate warming, it’s 
only going to lead to more traffic and transportation in these areas 
and a higher need of the delivery of these services, not less. 

So  getting  this  right,  getting  this  clear  that  these  are  resources 
of the Coast Guard and must be budgeted for is a key priority and 
so  as  far  as  we’re  concerned,  that  2006  language  was  specific  and 
we  think  the  Coast  Guard  is  past  due  on  delivering  a  plan  to  us. 
So what is the time-frame for a response for a real plan? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  ma’am.  As  I  said,  we’re  working  that 
through the Administration right now and the baseline we’re work-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

45 

ing from is the report that was issued by the National Academy of 
Sciences last fall and as we move forward, we’d be glad to give you 
an update on our progress on that. We have to have a way forward 
with  the  polar  icebreakers.  I’m  in  total  agreement  with  you  and 
there  are  two  issues.  One  is  the  recapitalization  but  the  other  one 
is  this  situation  right  now  where  we  own  the  ship  and  the  people 
but  the  funding  is  resident  in  the  National  Science  Foundation.  I 
would  rather  have  all  the  money  in  the  Coast  Guard  budget,  even 
if it wasn’t enough. 

And I said at a previous hearing, the current funding process for 
the  annual  appropriations  to  execute  this  mission  is  dysfunctional. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Do  you  believe  that  the  contracting  out  of 
some of these services often time leaves the Coast Guard still play-
ing clean up on the security and mission? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Well,  I’m  not  going  to  comment  on  National 
Science  Foundation’s  prerogatives.  The  problem  is,  all  of  our  ves-
sels,  even  if  they  are  icebreakers,  which  would  seem  to  be  single 
mission vessels, are multimissioned. On the way back from Antarc-
tica  this  year,  the  POLAR  SEA  was  diverted  for  that  Japanese  oil 
processing  ship  that  was  on  fire  between  Antarctica  and  New  Zea-
land, and we just had an Argentinian ship catch fire and burn and 
sink  just  in  the  last  week  down  in  that  area  there.  We  do  other 
things in those regions. 

The National Science Foundation is only bound by appropriations 
law to reimburse us for what is related to the ‘‘billable hours’’ that 
support  the  science  mission  down  there.  You  can  never  get  there 
from here. I think it needs to be unified, ma’am. 

Senator CANTWELL. So we basically are not paying for these serv-

ices—we’re not budgeting for these services. 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Our  operating  budget  for  the  polar  icebreakers 
is  in  the  National  Science  Foundation’s  budget,  ma’am  and  they 
are only—— 

Senator CANTWELL. And they’re not reimbursing you? 
Admiral  ALLEN.  Well,  they  are  reimbursing  us  for  what  has  to 
do with the science missions, not everything we do with those ves-
sels. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, I think just about every member of the 
Committee brought up an issue in which they think that either the 
security  mission  or  the  safety  mission  or  the  resource  allocation  of 
the  Coast  Guard  is  coming  into  question  and  I  think  we  have  to 
have  the  budgeting  for  these  vessels  in  a  program  and  framework 
that  actually  accounts  for  the  cost  of  delivering  those  services  and 
when  you  only  have  that  allocated  through  the  National  Science 
Foundation  for  some  of  the  services,  it  doesn’t  provide  us  an  ade-
quate budget for those needs and I predict that they will be in even 
more demand in the future. 

Admiral ALLEN. I take no objection to your statement, ma’am. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  we  will  have  to  figure  out  an  appro-
priate  action  because  I  think  that  Congress  has  been  clear  about 
this  so  we’ll  have  to  figure  out  exactly  how  we  work  to  get  the— 
as  you  said,  the  recapitalization  and  the  resources  to  make  sure 
that they are adequately budgeted because I would make the point 
that then we’re really stealing from other resources, other security 
missions that the Coast Guard has to meet as well and these secu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

46 

rity  missions  are  serious  responsibilities  of  the  Coast  Guard  as 
well. 

Admiral ALLEN. Yes, ma’am, I would tell you in regards to polar 
icebreakers, a concern that I have. If you look at what’s happening 
with  the  polar  icecap,  the  potential  for  an  unfettered  access  from 
Europe  across  the  top  to  Asia  could  cut  5,000  miles  off  a  trip  that 
would  normally  be  through  the  Panama  Canal.  I  would  tell  you  at 
that  point,  safety,  stewardship  and  security  converge  in  the  Artic 
and  these  become  less  of  a  science  platform  than  a  national  asset 
that we need to seriously think about. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  I  would  assume  that  the  investment  in 
something like the POLAR SEA is not a resource that a lot of other 
vessels have, is that correct? 

Admiral ALLEN. It is a unique resource, yes. 
Senator CANTWELL. OK and just one last question, if I could, Ad-
miral.  Obviously,  our  national  fisheries  are  very  important.  Again, 
it’s part of this challenge of funding within the budget and I know 
that  this  year’s  request—well,  first  of  all,  the  2007  request—the 
2006 to 2007 request was a decrease and this year is an even lower 
trend. Can you explain that? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Yes,  ma’am.  I’m  a  former  budget  officer  in  the 
Coast  Guard  and  I’m  going  to  try  to  explain  this  without  getting 
too, I guess, geeky or something here. There is an anomaly in how 
we  present  budget  figures  and  I’d  be  glad  to  expound  on  it  later 
on if it gets too arcane here. 

The  way  we  distribute  the  money  in  the  budget  as  presented  is 
based  on  a  cost  allocation  model  by  the  number  of  hours  we  allo-
cated to those missions historically. We have the capability through 
what  we  call  a  Mission  Cost  Model  in  the  Coast  Guard  to  take  an 
hour  of  high  endurance  cutter  time  or  an  hour  of  C–130  time  and 
load  that  with  the  cost  of  the  personnel,  the  fuel  and  so  forth.  So 
the  cost  of  operating  a  high  endurance  cutter  is  much  more  than 
the cost of operating a patrol boat. 

We then have every asset in the Coast Guard keep track of their 
employment by hour so for X number of hours for a high endurance 
cutter  for  a  year,  we  can  break  that  down  into  every  mission  set 
that we have performance parameters for and can load the cost. 

The  field  commanders  in  all  the  districts  out  there  apply  re-
sources  to  the  highest  need  or  the  risk  in  their  area  of  responsi-
bility based on the threats that are presented to them and they are 
not the same every year. 

Our  search  and  rescue  numbers  for  Katrina  in  2005  go  com-
pletely  off  the  scope  and  so  what  you’re  seeing  when  we  allocate 
those costs—it’s really not a projection of what we intend to spend 
on  the  program,  it’s  an  historical  allocation  of  cost  as  we  allocated 
the assets in the past projected forward to the budget and if that’s 
not  the  proper  way  to  present  it  then  we  need  to  think  of  another 
way but we’ve been doing it this way. 

I’ve  been  involved  in  this  for  over  20  years,  going  back  to  when 
I  was  a  commander  in  the  Coast  Guard  and  it  has  been  the  way 
we’ve  presented  the  cost  and  it  may  not  be  the  most  meaningful 
way  to  present  them  to  you  but  it  is  not  a  prediction  of  what  we 
are going to spend, it’s a historical allocation of cost to the level of 
effort that we have done in the past. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  you  think  those—then  the  reflection  of 

47 

the 2008 budget, you think will be on target? 

Admiral  ALLEN.  It  rarely  is  the  same  because  what  we’re  doing 
is  we’re  saying  if  the  past  was  perfect  and  we  did  the  same  thing 
next year, that’s what you would get and it never is, ma’am. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, I think for those of us—I mean, just in 
the  reauthorization  of  the  Magnuson-Stevenson  Act  and  fisheries 
management,  it’s  an  important  industry.  It’s  very  important  that 
we  adequately  enforce  the  laws  and  the  Coast  Guard  plays  a  key 
role in that. 

So I think perhaps we ought to take a look at that, the budgeting 
in  this  particular  area  so  that  we  can—I  think  it  becomes  chal-
lenging for each member of this Committee as they look at various 
issues  and  regional  issues  to  understand  whether  the  assets  and 
resources  are  going  to  be  there  and  when  budget  numbers  reflect 
a decrease or as in Senator Nelson’s case, he’s trying to understand 
the  current  Deepwater  proposal  and  resource  allocation  might 
mean for the response time to an emergency situation. 

In the Florida Keys area, I think it is very important that we be 
able  to  give  some  specific  answers.  We  don’t  want  to  continue  to 
be  with  a  Coast  Guard  at  a  second  guessing  point  about  what  the 
budget actually means. 

We ought to be in agreement about the level of funding and what 
that  level  of  funding  will  provide.  We  might  disagree  about  those 
priorities  or  something  but  we  ought  to  be  able  to  agree  that  this 
is  the  resource  level  that  you  will  get  with  this  budget  and  so  if 
you can help the Committee with that, we’d much appreciate it. 

Admiral  ALLEN.  Senator,  going  back  to  my  more  junior  days  as 
a  commander  working  the  budget  here  and  seeing  how  this  has 
evolved, if there was a way to kill this way of presentation, I would 
come  up  with  something  else.  I  think  it  is  probably  time  to  have 
that discussion. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, Admiral, thank you for your testimony 
today. We will keep the record open for two weeks. We hope that— 
we  do  want  to  provide—submit  some  questions  that  we  hope  you 
would answer in writing related to the Deepwater Program but we 
thank  you  for  your  testimony  this  afternoon  and  the  Committee  is 
adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 4:07 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
The  Coast  Guard  has  faced  many  unanticipated  challenges  during  the  past  few 
years,  from  saving  lives  during  natural  disasters  such  as  Hurricanes  Katrina  and 
Rita, to protecting the public from harm by carrying out additional security respon-
sibilities  assigned  to  it  after  9/11  and  through  enactment  of  the  SAFE  Port  Act  of 
2006.  In  addition  to  these  challenging  missions,  the  Coast  Guard  has  had  to  main-
tain  its  traditional  responsibilities.  These  have  not  been  easy  tasks,  and  the  prob-
lems  associated  with  the  Deepwater  procurement  program  very  well  may  hamper 
the  agency’s  ability  to  respond  equally  well  in  the  future.  I  would  like  to  commend 
the  men  and  women  of  the  Coast  Guard  for  their  tireless  efforts,  and  the  Com-
mandant for his commitment to getting Deepwater back on track. 

However,  I  have  just  mentioned  2  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  11  missions.  Congress 
must  ensure  that  the  Coast  Guard  has  the  resources  it  needs  to  carry  out  all  11 
missions,  each  one  vital  to  protecting  the  American  people,  our  natural  resources 
and our way of life. 

I  am  concerned  that  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  request  does  not 
account for all 11 missions. For example, the budget proposes a significant decrease 
in  funding  for  living  marine  resource  missions.  As  you  well  know,  Hawaii  is  the 
home  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  District  14,  which  is  responsible  for  the  protection  and 
enforcement of the largest geographical area in the United States. 

In  addition  to  this,  the  President  recently  declared  the  Northwestern  Hawaiian 
Islands a Marine National Monument, further increasing the Coast Guard’s enforce-
ment  responsibilities  in  this  area.  Given  that  the  Administration’s  budget  proposes 
a  reduction  in  funding  for  enforcement  of  marine  resource  laws,  I  am  interested  to 
hear  how  the  Coast  Guard  plans  to  address  its  enforcement  requirements  for  this 
expanded area of responsibility in the future. 

Another  issue  of  concern  is  the  steady  shifting  of  funding  within  the  total  Coast 
Guard budget between security and non-security missions given that the total budg-
et has remained constant. 

I continue to support priority funding for security responsibilities in the aftermath 
of  the  events  of  9/11,  but  those  added  responsibilities  should  not  be  funded  solely 
at the expense of other responsibilities such as enforcing our natural resource laws, 
our search and rescue programs, and our marine safety regulations. 

I  also  have  questions  regarding  other  issues  such  as  the  status  of  Rescue  21,  the 
Coast Guard’s project to modernize its maritime emergency communications system, 
and  the  proposed  realignment  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deployable  Operation  Groups. 
I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  the  witnesses,  and  working  with  them  to  resolve 

these issues in the future. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEPHEN L. CALDWELL, ACTING DIRECTOR, HOMELAND 
SECURITY AND JUSTICE ISSUES, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE (GAO) 
Madame Chair and Members of the Subcommittee: 
I am pleased to provide this statement for the record about the President’s Fiscal 
Year  2008  budget  request  for  the  Coast  Guard.  As  you  know,  the  Coast  Guard  has 
grown significantly since September 11, 2001, to help meet its responsibility to pro-
tect America’s ports, waterways, and waterside facilities from terrorist attacks while 
maintaining responsibility for many other programs important to the Nation’s inter-
ests,  such  as  helping  stem  the  flow  of  illegal  drugs  and  illegal  immigration,  pro-
tecting  important  fishing  grounds,  and  responding  to  marine  pollution.  While  the 
Coast  Guard  budget  request  continues  to  increase  in  FY  2008,  it  also  shows  shifts 
in  direction.  By  placing  less  emphasis  on  acquiring  new  assets  and  reorganizing 
some  of  its  functional  areas,  the  Coast  Guard  is  attempting  to  rectify  some  of  its 
management concerns of the past while better preparing itself for the challenges of 
the future. 

(49) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

50 

tives; 

formance indicators; 

My statement today provides: 
• an overview of the Coast Guard’s Fiscal Year 2008 budget request and key per-
• a  discussion  of  various  organizational  changes  and  related  management  initia-
• a status update on some current acquisition efforts and challenges; and 
• a look at additional challenges related to traditional legacy missions. 
My  statement  is  based  in  part  on  prior  GAO  work  focusing  on  the  Coast  Guard’s 
programmatic  and  management  initiatives  (a  listing  of  related  reports  is  included 
at  the  end  of  my  statement).  Additionally,  we  conducted  interviews  with  head-
quarters,  Pacific  Area,  and  Sector  San  Francisco  personnel,  and  reviewed  budget, 
performance, and acquisition documents. The scope of our work did not include eval-
uating  whether  the  proposed  funding  levels  are  commensurate  with  the  Coast 
Guard’s stated needs. Our scope was limited due to the short time available between 
the release of the President’s Fiscal Year 2008 budget request and the hearing date 
of  mid-April.  All  work  for  this  statement  was  conducted  in  accordance  with  gen-
erally  accepted  government  auditing  standards  between  February  and  March  2007. 
Summary 

The Coast Guard’s Fiscal Year 2008 budget request is moderately higher than its 
Fiscal  Year  2007  budget,  but  it  increased  at  a  lower  rate,  mainly  reflecting  a  slow-
ing  in  requests  for  funding  acquisition,  construction,  and  improvement  (AC&I) 
projects. The 2008 overall budget request of $8.73 billion is approximately 3 percent 
higher  than  the  2007  enacted  budget,  but  unlike  in  prior  years,  the  AC&I  budget 
decreased by 19 percent. According to Coast Guard officials, this decrease is in part 
due  to  some  recognized  problems  with  ongoing  acquisition  programs  and  the  desire 
to  strengthen  operating  capabilities,  including  contract  and  acquisition  oversight. 
While the AC&I budget request is down, a substantial pool of unspent funds appro-
priated  for  acquisition  projects  in  previous  years  remains  available  to  the  Coast 
Guard.  Current  unobligated  balances  in  these  projects  total  $1.96  billion,  of  which 
$1.63  billion  is  associated  with  Integrated  Deepwater  Systems  acquisitions.  The 
Coast  Guard  expects  to  meet  its  performance  goals  in  6  of  the  11  mission  areas  in 
FY 2006 (as compared to meeting performance goals in 8 of 11 missions in FY 2005). 
Performance  trends  over  the  past  5  years  also  show  that  increased  homeland  secu-
rity  activities  have  not  prevented  the  Coast  Guard  from  meeting  its  non-homeland 
security mission goals. The Coast Guard continues to develop ways to better under-
stand the links between resources it expends and the results it achieves. 

The budget request reflects a continued emphasis on reorganization efforts, all of 
which carry ongoing challenges. These efforts began with the combination of marine 
safety  offices  and  Coast  Guard  groups  into  sectors  in  2006.  While  the  Coast  Guard 
has  completed  its  organizational  changes  to  place  local  units  under  sector  com-
mands, not all of the units have been able to move to a single location, a key ingre-
dient  in  bringing  about  the  improved  integration  expected  from  the  realignment. 
Funding  was  not  provided  in  the  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  to  complete  the  desired 
colocation. A reorganization effort that is to begin this year is designed to bring the 
different mobile deployable units responsible for such actions as pollution response, 
law enforcement, port security, and counterterrorism under a single command rath-
er  reporting  to  three  different  authorities.  The  Coast  Guard  hopes  to  gain  more  ef-
fective  management,  oversight,  and  coordination  of  these  deployable  forces.  Chal-
lenges here include addressing ‘‘buy-in’’ and related issues from units affected by the 
changes,  ensuring  that  mission  performance  of  sectors  that  previously  made  use  of 
these  units  for  everyday  activities  is  not  compromised,  and  effectively  establishing 
and  operating  the  new  centralized  command.  A  third  organizational  effort  to  im-
prove Coast Guard operations—in this case, to improve its troubled acquisition con-
tract  management—is  the  merging  of  the  various  acquisition  management  efforts 
under  a  Chief  Acquisitions  Officer.  One  challenge  in  making  this  move  effective  is 
the need to build a more robust cadre of acquisition management professionals. 

Three  major  Coast  Guard  acquisition  projects  are  making  progress  at  varying 
rates,  but  challenges  remain  for  all  three  in  the  future.  The  record  for  Deepwater 
has been mixed. Seven of 10 asset classes being acquired are on or ahead of sched-
ule. Three classes, however, are behind schedule for various reasons and several fac-
tors  add  to  the  uncertainty  about  the  delivery  schedule  of  other  Deepwater  assets. 
Contract  management  issues,  accountability  of  the  contractor,  and  cost  control 
through  competition  have  been  recurring  challenges  for  the  Coast  Guard.  Separate 
from  Deepwater,  the  National  Automatic  Identification  System  (NAIS),  a  program 
designed to allow the Coast Guard to monitor and track vessels as far as 2,000 nau-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

51 

tical  miles  off  the  U.S.  coast,  is  under  way,  and  infrastructure  for  the  first  phase 
of  the  system  is  currently  being  installed.  The  Coast  Guard  is  considering  whether 
to require more types of vessels to install and operate tracking equipment—an issue 
that affects the extent to which the system will provide information on the location 
of  vessels  of  interest.  The  Coast  Guard’s  timeline  for  achieving  full  operating  capa-
bility for its search and rescue communications system, Rescue 21, was delayed from 
2006 to 2011, and the estimated total acquisition cost increased from 1999 to 2005, 
but according to Coast Guard officials, many of the issues that led to these problems 
are being addressed. Coast Guard acquisition officials said they are providing more 
oversight to the contractor after we reported on contract management shortcomings. 
According  to  Coast  Guard  officials,  the  contracts  that  would  set  specific  schedules 
and  budgets  for  the  last  25  regions  in  which  the  system  will  be  installed  have  yet 
to  be  signed.  Also,  there  has  been  a  reduction  in  promised  improvements  to  limit 
communications  gaps;  originally,  Rescue  21  was  intended  to  limit  communications 
gaps to 2 percent, and that target was reduced to less than 10 percent. 

Some  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  non-homeland  security  missions  are  facing  challenges 
based on competition for resources with homeland security- oriented funding needs. 
Many  domestic  icebreaking  and  Aids-to-  Navigation  vessels  are  also  reaching  the 
end of their designed service lives. While these vessels have been able to meet mis-
sion goals to date, without major rehabilitation or replacement, their ability to carry 
out  their  designated  missions  will  likely  decline  in  the  future.  The  Coast  Guard  is 
currently examining options for addressing this issue. Similarly, the inability to ob-
tain  needed  maintenance  funding  has  led  the  Coast  Guard  to  take  one  Polar-class 
icebreaker out of service to keep its remaining aging Polar-class vessel, the POLAR 
SEA,  operational.  With  only  one  icebreaker  capable  of  keeping  access  to  Antarctica 
open,  there  is  a  greater  possibility  that  mechanical  problems  or  other  maintenance 
issues could affect this mission. 
Background 

The U.S. Coast Guard is a multimission, maritime military service within the De-
partment of Homeland Security (DHS). To accomplish its responsibilities, the Coast 
Guard  is  organized  into  two  major  commands  that  are  responsible  for  overall  mis-
sion  execution—one  in  the  Pacific  area  and  the  other  in  the  Atlantic  area.  These 
commands  are  divided  into  9  districts,  which  in  turn  are  organized  into  35  sectors 
that  unify  command  and  control  of  field  units  and  resources,  such  as  multimission 
stations  and  patrol  boats.  In  Fiscal  Year  2005,  the  Coast  Guard  had  over  46,000 
full-time positions—about 39,000 military and 7,000 civilians. In addition, the agen-
cy had about 8,100 reservists who support the national military strategy or provide 
additional  operational  support  and  surge  capacity  during  times  of  emergency,  such 
as natural disasters. Furthermore, the Coast Guard also had about 31,000 volunteer 
auxiliary  personnel  help  with  a  wide  array  of  activities,  ranging  from  search  and 
rescue  to  boating  safety  education.  The  Coast  Guard  has  responsibilities  that  fall 
under  two  broad  missions—homeland  security  and  non-homeland  security.  The 
Coast  Guard  responsibilities  are  further  divided  into  11  programs,  as  shown  in 
table 1. 

Table 1.—Homeland Security and Non-Homeland Security Programs by Mission Area 

Mission and program 

Activities and functions of each program 

Homeland Security Missions 

Ports,  waterways,  and  coastal  secu-
rity 

Conducting  harbor  patrols,  vulnerability  assessments,  intelligence  gath-
ering  and  analysis,  and  other  activities  to  prevent  terrorist  attacks  and 
minimize the damage from attacks that occur. 

Undocumented migrant interdiction  Deploying  cutters  and  aircraft  to  reduce  the  flow  of  undocumented  mi-

grants entering the United States by maritime routes. 

Defense readiness 

Search and rescue 

Participating  with  the  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  in  global  military 
operations,  deploying  cutters  and  other  boats  in  and  around  harbors  to 
protect DOD force mobilization operations. 

Non-Homeland Security Missions 

Operating  multimission  stations  and  a  national  distress  and  response 
communication  system,  conducting  search  and  rescue  operations  for 
mariners in distress. 

Living marine resources 

Enforcing domestic fishing laws and regulations through inspections and 
fishery patrols. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

52 

Table 1.—Homeland Security and Non-Homeland Security Programs by Mission Area—Continued 

Mission and program 

Activities and functions of each program 

Aids to navigation 

Ice operations 

Marine environmental protection 

Marine safety 

Illegal drug interdiction 

Managing  U.S.  waterways  and  providing  a  safe,  efficient,  and  navigable 
marine transportation system, maintaining the extensive system of navi-
gation  aids,  monitoring  marine  traffic  through  vessel  traffic  service  cen-
ters. 

Conducting  polar  operations  to  facilitate  the  movement  of  critical  goods 
and personnel in support of scientific and national security activity, con-
ducting  domestic  icebreaking  operations  to  facilitate  year-round  com-
merce,  conducting  international  ice  operations  to  track  icebergs  below 
the 48th north latitude. 

Preventing  and  responding  to  marine  oil  and  chemical  spills,  preventing 
the illegal dumping of plastics and garbage in U.S. waters, preventing bi-
ological invasions by aquatic nuisance species. 

Setting standards and conducting vessel inspections to better ensure the 
safety  of  passengers  and  crew  aboard  commercial  vessels,  partnering 
with states and boating safety organizations to reduce recreational boat-
ing deaths. 

Deploying  cutters  and  aircraft  in  high  drug-trafficking  areas  and  gath-
ering  intelligence  to  reduce  the  flow  of  illegal  drugs  through  maritime 
transit routes. 

Other  law  enforcement  (foreign  fish 
enforcement) 

Protecting  U.S.  fishing  grounds  by  ensuring  that  foreign  fishermen  do 
not illegally harvest U.S. fish stocks. 

Source:  Coast  Guard. 
Note:  The  Coast  Guard’s  homeland  security  and  non-homeland  security  missions  are  delineated  in  section  888  of  the  Homeland 
Security  Act  of  2002  (P.  L.  107–296,  116  Stat.  2135,  2249  (2002)).  Starting  with  the  Fiscal  Year  2007  budget,  however,  the  Office  of 
Management  and  Budget  (OMB)  designated  the  Coast  Guard’s  drug  interdiction  and  other  law  enforcement  as  non-homeland  secu-
rity  missions  for  budgetary  purposes. 

For  these  11  programs,  the  Coast  Guard  has  developed  performance  measures  to 
communicate agency performance and provide information for the budgeting process 
to  Congress,  other  policymakers,  and  taxpayers.  The  Coast  Guard’s  performance 
measures  are  published  in  various  documents,  including  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal 
Year Budget-in-Brief. The Coast Guard’s Budget-in-Brief reports performance infor-
mation to assess the effectiveness of the agency’s performance as well as a summary 
of  the  agency’s  most  recent  budget  request.  This,  and  other  documents,  reports  the 
performance  measures  for  each  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  programs,  as  well  as  descrip-
tions of the measures and explanations of performance results. 

To  continue  executing  its  missions,  the  Coast  Guard  has  programs  to  acquire  a 
number  of  assets  such  as  vessels,  aircraft,  and  command,  control,  communications, 
computer, intelligence surveillance, and reconnaissance (C4ISR) systems. The Coast 
Guard’s Deepwater program is a 25-year, $24 billion effort to upgrade or replace ex-
isting vessels and aircraft in order to carry out its missions along our coastlines and 
farther  out  at  sea.  The  program  is  eventually  to  include  10  major  classes  of  new 
or upgraded vessels and aircraft. The Coast Guard also has an acquisition program 
called  the  National  Automatic  Identification  System  to  identify  and  track  vessels 
bound  for  or  within  U.S.  waters.  Another  acquisition  program  is  called  Rescue  21, 
a  program  to  replace  the  Coast  Guard’s  30  year  old  search  and  rescue  communica-
tions systems. Rescue 21 was to be used not only for search and rescue, but to sup-
port other Coast Guard missions, including those involving homeland security. 
Budget  Places  More  Emphasis  on  Operational  Expenses;  Overall 

Performance Trends Remain Positive 

The  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  request  reflects  a  smaller  increase 
than in years past. Requests for new capital spending are down, as the agency slows 
the  pace  of  new  acquisitions  for  Deepwater  and  other  capital  projects.  Instead,  sev-
eral  of  the  budget  initiatives  being  emphasized  reflect  a  reorganization  of  internal 
operations  and  support  command  infrastructure.  Although  the  Coast  Guard  met 
fewer  performance  targets  than  last  year,  overall  performance  trends  for  most  mis-
sion  programs  remain  positive.  That  is,  many  of  the  measures  that  Coast  Guard 
uses to evaluate performance have improved since last year, even though the agency 
did not meet as many of its performance targets in 2006 as in the year before. 
Overall Budget Request Is 3.3 Percent Higher Than Previous Year’s 

The  Coast  Guard’s  budget  request  in  Fiscal  Year  2008  is  $8.73  billion,  approxi-
mately  $275  million,  or  3.3  percent,  more  than  in  Fiscal  Year  2007  (see  fig.  1).1 
About  $5.9  billion,  or  approximately  68  percent,  is  for  operating  expenditures  (OE). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

53 

This  funding  supports  its  11  statutorily  identified  mission  programs;  increases  in 
cost of living, fuel, and maintenance costs; and previous administration and congres-
sional  initiatives.  The  greatest  change  from  the  previous  year  is  in  the  AC&I  re-
quest,  which  at  $949  million  reflects  about  a  19  percent  decrease  from  Fiscal  Year 
2007.  According  to  Coast  Guard  officials,  no  new  appropriations  are  requested  in 
Fiscal  Year  2008  for  several  Deepwater  assets  until  business  case  reviews  can  be 
completed  to  assess  the  viability  of  technology  and  contracting  oversight.  The  re-
maining part of the request consists primarily of funds requested for retiree pay and 
health care fund contributions. If the Coast Guard’s total budget request is granted, 
overall  funding  will  have  increased  by  over  55  percent  since  2002,  an  increase  of 
$3.1 billion. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  budget  request  for  homeland  security  missions  represents  ap-
proximately  35  percent  of  the  overall  budget.2 Figure  2  illustrates  the  percentage 
of  funding  requested  for  homeland  security  versus  non-homeland  security  funding, 
and figure 3 shows the funding levels by each mission program. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.
1
O
A
G
8
1
4

54 

Budget Includes Reallocations to Match Reorganization 

Two key budget initiatives—both reallocations rather than increases—reflect reor-
ganization  efforts.  First,  a  major  budget  reallocation  within  the  operating  expendi-
tures category establishes a single unified command for the agency’s deployable spe-
cialized  forces.  These  are  the  Coast  Guard’s  response  teams  that  can  deploy  wher-
ever needed for natural disasters, terrorism incidents, and other concerns. According 
to senior Coast Guard officials, this initiative entails a one-time, budget-neutral re-
allocation of $132.7 million from the Atlantic and Pacific Area Commands to a new 
deployable operations command, which will be located in Ballston, Virginia. No new 
funds have been requested for this initiative. This initiative is discussed in more de-
tail later in this testimony. The second reallocation involves an $80.5 million trans-
fer  from  AC&I  into  the  operating  expense  appropriation.  The  operational  aspect  of 
this reallocation is associated with creating a new consolidated acquisition function, 
also  discussed  in  further  detail  below.  Coast  Guard  officials  said  this  reallocation 
consolidates all personnel funding into the operating expense appropriation and en-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

3
O
A
G
8
1
4

s
p
e

.
2
O
A
G
8
1
4

55 

ables the Coast Guard to manage one personnel system for the entire agency. They 
said  although  this  reallocation  is  budget  neutral  in  2008,  future  budget  requests 
may include financial incentives that will enable the Coast Guard to develop a more 
robust cadre of acquisition professionals. 
Acquisition Budget Request Declines, but Substantial Unobligated Balances Are Also 

Available 

The  19  percent  decrease  in  Fiscal  Year  2008  for  AC&I  reflects  a  slowing  in  the 
pace  of  acquisition  efforts,  which,  according  to  Coast  Guard  officials,  is  an  attempt 
to  address  technology  issues  and  contracting  oversight  associated  with  Deepwater 
programs such as the Vertical Unmanned Aerial Vehicle and Fast Response Cutter. 
The Coast Guard also recognizes that it is carrying significant unobligated balances 
for  a  number  of  its  acquisition  projects.  These  balances  reflect  money  appropriated 
but  not  yet  spent  for  projects  included  in  previous  years’  budgets.  During  our  work 
for this testimony, we reviewed budget data and Coast Guard documentation show-
ing the current status of the agency’s unobligated balances. We found, for example, 
that  the  current  unobligated  balances  total  $1.96  billion  for  all  acquisition  projects. 
The  Deepwater  acquisition  alone  has  $1.6  billion  in  total  unobligated  balances, 
which  is  nearly  double  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2008  request  for  the  Deep-
water project. Other acquisition programs, such as the Nationwide Automatic Iden-
tification System and Rescue 21, also have unobligated balances, but these are con-
siderably  lower  (see  table  2).  The  unobligated  balance  for  Rescue  21,  for  example, 
is $30.5 million. 

Table 2.—Total Unobligated Balances for Selected Acquisition Projects 

[dollars in millions] 

Acquisition project 

Integrated Deepwater Systems 

Shore Facilities and Aids to Navigation 

Nationwide Automatic Identification System 

Rescue 21 

Vessels and Critical Infrastructure Projects 

Fiscal year 2008 
request 

$836.9 

Unobligated 
balance 

$1,632.6 

37.9 

12.0 

80.8 

9.2 

156.8 

36.0 

30.5 

30.3 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  Coast  Guard  data. 
These  unobligated  balances  have  accumulated  for  a  variety  of  reasons  as  the 
Coast  Guard  has  found  itself  unable  to  spend  previous-year  acquisition  appropria-
tions.  For  example,  we  and  others  have  documented  technical  design  issues  involv-
ing  the  Coast  Guard’s  123-foot  patrol  boat  and  the  Fast  Response  Cutter.  These 
problems  have  led  to  major  delays  in  some  programs  and  outright  cancellations  in 
others. We asked Coast Guard officials about their plans to spend these unobligated 
balances  either  in  Fiscal  Year  2008  or  beyond,  but  at  this  point  they  were  unable 
to  provide  us  with  detailed  plans  for  doing  so.  To  the  agency’s  credit,  steps  have 
been  taken  to  address  the  issue,  including  reporting  quarterly  acquisition  spending 
levels. Since these unobligated balances represent a significant portion of the Coast 
Guard’s  entire  budget,  the  degree  to  which  the  Coast  Guard  spends  these  balances 
in  Fiscal  Year  2008  could  have  a  substantial  impact  on  the  overall  level  of  capital 
spending for the year. 

According to senior Coast Guard officials, each acquisition project is now receiving 
more  scrutiny  and  oversight  of  how  previous  funds  are  spent.  The  Coast  Guard  is 
not  requesting  additional  funds  for  the  Offshore  Patrol  Cutter,  Fast  Response  Cut-
ter,  and  Vertical  Unmanned  Aerial  Vehicle  in  the  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  request 
until  business  case  reviews  are  completed  to  assess  the  viability  of  the  technology 
and contracting oversight. 
Performance  Trends  Generally  Positive  and  Non-Homeland  Security  Measures 

Generally Sound 

Despite  the  fact  that  Coast  Guard  met  fewer  performance  targets  than  last  year, 
overall performance trends for most mission programs remain positive. Performance 
in  7  of  11  Coast  Guard  mission  areas  increased  in  the  last  year,  but  the  Coast 
Guard  also  set  performance  targets  at  a  higher  level  than  it  did  last  year.  Coast 
Guard’s  performance  did  not  improve  sufficiently  for  the  Coast  Guard  to  meet  as 
many  of  its  higher  performance  targets  in  2006  as  it  did  in  2005.  In  Fiscal  Year 
2006, the Coast Guard reported that 5 of its 11 programs met or exceeded program 
performance targets. In addition, agency officials reported that the Coast Guard ex-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

56 

pected  to  meet  the  target  for  1  additional  program  when  results  become  available 
in  August  2007,  potentially  bringing  the  total  met  targets  to  6  out  of  11  (see  fig. 
4). In comparison, last year we reported that in Fiscal Year 2005, Coast Guard met 
8  out  of  11  targets.  In  Fiscal  Year  2006,  the  agency  narrowly  missed  performance 
targets  for  3  programs—Search  and  Rescue,  Living  Marine  Resources,  and  Aids  to 
Navigation.  In  Fiscal  Year  2005,  it  missed  only  1  of  these  3,  Living  Marine  Re-
sources.  The  Coast  Guard  more  widely  missed  performance  targets  for  2  programs, 
Defense  Readiness  and  Marine  Safety.  In  Fiscal  Year  2005,  Coast  Guard  met  its 
Marine  Safety  target,  but  missed  on  Defense  Readiness.  See  appendix  I  for  more 
information on Coast Guard performance results. 

Congressional  committees  have  previously  expressed  concern  that  Coast  Guard’s 
shift in priorities and focus toward homeland security missions following the events 
of  September  11,  2001,  may  have  affected  the  agency’s  ability  to  successfully  per-
form  its  non-homeland  security  missions.  However,  the  Coast  Guard’s  performance 
on its non-homeland security indicators has not changed substantially over the past 
5 years. 

This past year, we also completed an examination of some of the performance in-
dicators themselves.3 We found that while the Coast Guard’s non-homeland security 
measures  are  generally  sound  and  the  data  used  to  collect  them  are  generally  reli-
able,  there  are  challenges  associated  with  using  performance  measures  to  link  re-
sources to results. Such challenges include comprehensiveness (that is, using a sin-
gle  measure  per  mission  area  may  not  convey  complete  information  about  overall 
performance)  and  external  factors  outside  agency  control,  (such  as  weather  condi-
tions,  which  can  affect  the  amount  of  ice  that  needs  to  be  cleared  or  the  number 
of  mariners  who  must  be  rescued).  The  Coast  Guard  continues  to  work  on  these 
measures through such efforts as the following: 

• Standardized  reporting.  The  Coast  Guard  is  currently  developing  a  way  to 
standardize  the  names  and  definitions  for  all  Coast  Guard  activities  across  the 
agency, creating more consistent data collection throughout the agency. 

• Measurement readiness. The Coast Guard is developing a tool to track the agen-
cy’s readiness capabilities with up-to-date information on resource levels at each 
Coast Guard unit as well as the certification and skills of all Coast Guard uni-
formed personnel. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.
4
O
A
G
8
1
4

57 

• Framework  for  analyzing  risk,  readiness,  and  performance.  The  Coast  Guard  is 
developing a model for examining the links among risk, readiness management, 
and agency performance. This model is intended to help the Coast Guard better 
understand  why  events  and  outcomes  occur,  and  how  these  events  and  out-
comes are related to resources. 

While  the  Coast  Guard  appears  to  be  moving  in  the  right  direction  and  is  about 
done  with  some  of  these  efforts,  it  remains  too  soon  to  determine  how  effective  the 
Coast  Guard’s  larger  efforts  will  be  at  clearly  linking  resources  to  performance  re-
sults. These initiatives are not expected to be fully implemented until 2010.4 
Coast  Guard  Continues  to  Make  Organizational  Changes  Designed  to 

Improve Operational Effectiveness and Resource Management 

The  2008  budget  request  reflects  a  multiyear  effort  to  reorganize  the  Coast 
Guard’s  command  and  control  and  mission  support  structures.  Three  efforts  are  of 
note  here—reorganizing  shore-based  forces  into  sector  commands,  placing  all 
deployable specialized forces under a single nationwide command, and consolidating 
acquisitions  management  programs.  Each  of  these  efforts  faces  challenges  that 
merit close attention. 
Further Action Needed to Ensure Operational Benefits from Sector Reorganization 

As we reported for the last 2 years, the Coast Guard has implemented a new field 
command  structure  that  is  designed  to  unify  previously  disparate  Coast  Guard 
units,  such  as  air  stations  and  marine  safety  offices,  into  35  different  integrated 
commands, called sectors. At each of these sectors, the Coast Guard has placed man-
agement and operational control of these units and their associated resources under 
the same commanding officer. Coast Guard officials told us that this change helped 
their  planning  and  resource  allocation  efforts.  For  instance,  Coast  Guard  field  offi-
cials told us the sector command structure has been valuable in helping to meet new 
homeland  security  responsibilities,  and  in  facilitating  their  ability  to  manage  inci-
dents in close coordination with other Federal, state, and local agencies. Our follow- 
up  work  found,  however,  that  work  remains  to  ensure  the  Coast  Guard  is  able  to 
maximize  the  potential  benefits  of  sector  realignment.  In  particular,  Coast  Guard 
officials  reported  that  some  sectors  had  yet  to  colocate  their  vessel  tracking  system 
(VTS) centers with the rest of their operational command centers. According to field 
officials, the lack of colocation has hindered communications between staff that for-
merly were from different parts of the agency. 

According  to  Coast  Guard  officials,  competing  acquisition  priorities  are  limiting 
the progress in obtaining funding needed to colocate these facilities. The Fiscal Year 
2008  budget  does  not  provide  funds  to  colocate  the  VTS  centers  and  command  cen-
ters.  Coast  Guard  headquarters  officials  told  us  they  would  work  to  address  this 
challenge  as  part  of  the  capital  investment  plan  to  build  interagency  operational 
centers  for  port  security,  as  required  under  the  SAFE  Port  Act,  but  they  had  not 
yet developed specific plans, timelines, and cost estimates.5 
Unified Command Structure for Deployable Forces Is Being Developed 

The Coast Guard is planning to reorganize its deployable specialized forces under 
a  single  unified  command,  called  the  Deployable  Operations  Group  (DOG).  This 
change  is  reportedly  budget  neutral  in  the  Fiscal  Year  2008  request,  but  it  bears 
attention  for  operational  effectiveness  reasons.  According  to  Coast  Guard  officials, 
the  agency  is  making  this  change  based  on  lessons  learned  from  the  Federal  re-
sponse  to  Hurricane  Katrina.  They  said  the  response  highlighted  the  need  to  im-
prove effectiveness of day-to-day operations and to enhance flexibility and interoper-
ability  of  forces  responding  to  security  threats  and  natural  disasters.  Currently, 
there are five different types of Coast Guard specialized forces, totaling about 2,500 
personnel.  Their  roles  and  missions  vary  widely,  ranging  from  conducting 
antiterrorism  operations  to  conducting  environmental  response  and  cleanup  oper-
ations (see table 3). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

58 

Table 3.—Coast Guard Deployable Specialized Forces, Mission Area and Primary Operational Activity, and 

Force Size 

Specialized Force 

Mission area and primary operational activi-

ties 

Force size 

National strike force (NSF) 

Marine environmental protection 
• Domestic  and  international  response 

for oil spills 

• Hazardous material cleanup 
• Chemical, biological, and radiological 

response 

3 strike teams/328 personnel 

Tactical law enforcement 

teams (TACLET) 

Law enforcement 
• Maritime interception operations 

2 units/180 personnel 

Port security units (PSU) 

Defense readiness 
• Expeditionary port security 

Maritime safety and security 

teams (MSST) 

Ports, waterways, and coastal security 
• Domestic port security 
• Antiterrorism 

8 units/1,144 personnel 

12 units/924 personnel 

Ports, waterways, and coastal security 
• Counterterrorism 

1 unit/208 personnel 

Maritime security response 

team (MSRT) 
Source:  Coast  Guard. 
The  Coast  Guard’s  existing  structure  divides  operational  control  of  specialized 
forces into three different command authorities—headquarters, Pacific Area, and At-
lantic  Area.  Under  the  planned  realignment,  these  forces  would  be  available  under 
a single operational command, with the expectation of more effective resource man-
agement, oversight, and coordination.6 The Coast Guard plans to establish operating 
capability  for  this  unified  approach  by  July  20,  2007,  with  an  initial  command  cen-
ter located in Ballston, Virginia. Officials told us they were well under way in plan-
ning  for  this  reorganization.  Officials  expect  about  100  staff  will  be  assigned  to  the 
center  when  it  reaches  its  initial  operating  capability,  growing  to  about  150  per-
sonnel once the command structure is completed. According to officials, all adminis-
trative  staff  selected  for  the  center  will  be  drawn  from  headquarters,  district,  and 
area levels. 

We  have  not  studied  this  reorganization,  but  our  prior  work  on  other  aspects  of 
Coast Guard operations suggests that the Coast Guard may face a number of imple-
mentation  challenges.  Some  may  be  similar  to  those  that  Coast  Guard  faced  when 
it  created  its  sector  commands,  such  as  obtaining  buy-in  from  personnel  that  will 
be  affected  by  the  reorganization  or  addressing  realignment  issues  at  the  district 
level. Another challenge is to ensure that the change does not adversely affect mis-
sion  performance  at  the  sector  and  field  unit  levels.  Currently,  for  example,  sector 
commanders  make  use  of  available  local  MSST  units—made  available  by  district 
and area commanders—to help meet shortfalls in resource availability for everyday 
missions, such as conducting high-risk vessel escorts and harbor security patrols. If 
these  units  were  not  available  to  support  mission  needs,  additional  strain  could  be 
put on the performance of these local units. 

These  changes  to  the  command  structure  are  part  of  plans  that  extend  beyond 
Fiscal  Year  2008.  In  his  recent  State  of  the  Coast  Guard  speech,  the  Commandant 
of  the  Coast  Guard  unveiled  a  proposal  to  combine  the  Coast  Guard’s  Atlantic  and 
Pacific  Area  command  functions  into  a  single  Coast  Guard  operations  command  for 
mission  execution.  In  addition,  the  Coast  Guard  plans  to  establish  a  new  mission 
support command, which will have responsibility for nationwide maintenance, logis-
tics, and supply activities. According to Coast Guard officials, the current structure 
is not well suited to responding to post-September 11 transnational threats. For ex-
ample,  Coast  Guard  officials  said  the  current  structure  at  times  works  against  the 
Coast  Guard  in  operations  with  Joint  Interagency  Task  Forces,  whose  operating 
areas  are  not  the  same  as  the  Coast  Guard’s  established  area  boundaries.  Coast 
Guard  officials  told  us  a  working  group  had  developed  a  blueprint  of  the  new  oper-
ational force structure, but the Coast Guard is not ready to release it. Coast Guard 
officials  told  us  they  expected  the  reorganization  would  be  implemented  during  the 
current Commandant’s 4-year term. 
Consolidation  of  Acquisitions  Oversight  Management  Challenged  By  Staffing 

Shortfalls 

The  Coast  Guard  also  plans  to  consolidate  its  acquisitions  management  offices, 
placing  all  major  acquisitions  programs  and  oversight  functions  under  the  control 
of  a  single  acquisitions  officer.  The  goals  of  this  consolidation  are  to  improve  Coast 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

59 

Guard  oversight  of  acquisitions,  better  balance  contracting  officers  and  acquisition 
professionals  among  its  major  acquisition  projects,  and  address  staff  retention  and 
shortage problems associated with the acquisitions management program. However, 
the  Coast  Guard  has  not  adequately  staffed  the  acquisitions  management  program 
to meet its current workload, and maintaining an appropriate staff size will be chal-
lenging,  despite  the  reorganization.  For  example,  a  February  2007  independent 
analysis found that the Coast Guard does not possess a sufficient number of acquisi-
tion personnel or the right level of experience needed to manage the Deepwater pro-
gram.7 Headquarters  officials  told  us  the  reorganization  would  address  retention 
problems  by  creating  a  new  acquisitions  specialty  career  ladder  that  could  attract 
new pools of talent. Still, given its past history of staff shortages and difficulties re-
taining acquisition staff, the Coast Guard will face challenges maintaining an appro-
priately sized acquisition staff, at least in the near term. Coast Guard headquarters 
officials  told  us  the  Deepwater  program  had  pushed  other  important  acquisitions 
priorities  aside,  and  this  new  organization  would  help  the  Coast  Guard  advance 
these  other  priorities,  such  as  boats,  piers,  and  other  shoreside  physical  infrastruc-
ture.  In  our  view,  it  is  unclear  how  the  reorganization  of  the  acquisition  function 
will  improve  the  prospects  for  these  other  programs,  given  Coast  Guard’s  priorities 
and ongoing constraints on funding. 

The reorganized acquisition office is expected to merge the now stand-alone Deep-
water  acquisition  project  with  the  existing  acquisition  directorate  and  research  and 
development  centers.  The  new  office  is  expected  to  be  led  by  a  new  Coast  Guard 
Chief  Acquisition  Officer  who  will  have  responsibility  over  all  procurement  projects 
and by a deputy who will deal largely with Deepwater issues. At the program man-
agement level, Coast Guard is establishing four program managers to lead each ac-
quisitions  area,  including  (1)  surface  assets;  (2)  air  assets;  (3)  command,  control, 
communications,  computers,  intelligence,  surveillance,  and  reconnaissance;  and  (4) 
small  boats  and  shore-based  infrastructure,  such  as  command  centers  and  boat-
houses.  The  Coast  Guard  plans  to  begin  implementing  this  reorganization  in  July 
2007.  It  is  too  early  to  tell  if  the  Coast  Guard’s  reorganization  will  enable  it  to 
achieve  its  goals—notably,  better  balance  of  acquisitions  support  between  Deep-
water and the Coast Guard’s other acquisitions programs. 
Acquisition Challenges Continue as Several Programs Make Progress 

While  some  Coast  Guard  major  acquisition  projects  continue  to  face  challenges, 
especially  the  Deepwater  program,  several  of  these  projects  are  making  progress. 
The  record  for  Deepwater  has  been  mixed,  with  7  of  10  asset  classes  on  or  ahead 
of  schedule.  Three  classes,  however,  are  behind  schedule  for  various  reasons  and 
several factors add to the uncertainty about the delivery of other Deepwater assets. 
Contract  management  issues  that  we  have  reported  on  previously  continue  to  be 
challenges  to  the  Coast  Guard.  Installation  of  equipment  for  the  initial  phase  of 
NAIS, an acquisition that is designed to allow the Coast Guard to monitor and track 
vessels as far as 2,000 nautical miles off the U.S. coast, is currently under way, but 
without  changes  to  existing  regulations,  some  vessels  will  be  able  to  avoid  taking 
part  in  the  system.  The  Coast  Guard’s  timeline  for  achieving  full  operating  capa-
bility for its search and rescue communications system, Rescue 21, was delayed from 
2006 to 2011, and the estimated total acquisition cost increased from 1999 to 2005, 
but according to Coast Guard officials, many of the issues that led to these problems 
are being addressed. Coast Guard acquisition officials said they are providing more 
oversight to the contractor after we reported on contract management shortcomings. 
Coast Guard Continues to Face Acquisition Challenges with Deepwater Program 

The  Coast  Guard  continues  to  face  challenges  in  managing  the  Deepwater  pro-
gram. The delivery record for assets is mixed and technology and funding uncertain-
ties,  recent  changes  to  Coast  Guard  plans  for  procuring  Deepwater  assets,  as  well 
as  the  25  year  timeframe  for  asset  delivery  add  to  uncertainties  about  the  delivery 
schedule  for  future  Deepwater  assets.  We  have  reported  concerns  about  manage-
ment of the Deepwater program for several years now and have made recommenda-
tions aimed at improving the program. The Coast Guard continues to address these 
recommendations  as  it  seeks  to  better  manage  the  Deepwater  program.  In  addition 
to  these  program  management  issues,  performance  and  design  problems  for  certain 
Deepwater  assets  have  created  additional  operational  challenges  for  the  Coast 
Guard.  The  Coast  Guard  is  taking  steps  to  mitigate  these  problems,  but  challenges 
remain. Below is a summary of our recent Deepwater work.8 
Deepwater Asset Delivery Schedule Is Mixed and Somewhat Uncertain 

The  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  program  is  a  25  year,  $24  billion  plan  to  replace 
or upgrade its fleet of vessels and aircraft. Upon completion, the Deepwater program 
is  to  consist  of  5  new  classes  of  vessels—the  National  Security  Cutter  (NSC),  Off-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

60 

shore  Patrol  Cutter  (OPC),  Fast  Response  Cutter  (FRC),  Short-Range  Prosecutor 
(SRP),  and  Long-Range  Interceptor  (LRI);  1  new  class  of  fixed-wing  aircraft—the 
Maritime  Patrol  Aircraft  (MPA);  1  new  class  of  unmanned  aerial  vehicles—the 
Vertical  Unmanned  Aerial  Vehicle  (VUAV);  2  classes  of  upgraded  helicopters—the 
Medium-Range Recovery Helicopter (MRR) and the Multi- Mission Cutter Helicopter 
(MCH);  and  1  class  of  upgraded  fixed-wing  aircraft—the  Long-Range  Surveillance 
Aircraft (LRS).9 Figure 5 illustrates the 10 classes of Deepwater assets. 

Our preliminary observations indicated that, as of January 2007, of the 10 classes 
of Deepwater assets to be acquired or upgraded, the delivery record for first-in-class 
assets (that is, the first of multiple aircraft or vessels to be delivered in each class) 
was  mixed.  Specifically,  7  of  the  10  asset  classes  were  on  or  ahead  of  schedule. 
Among these, 5 first-in-class assets had been delivered on or ahead of schedule; and 
2 others remained on schedule but their planned delivery dates were in 2009 or be-
yond.  In  contrast,  3  Deepwater  asset  classes  were  behind  schedule  due  to  various 
problems  related  to  designs,  technology,  or  funding.  Using  the  2005  Deepwater  Ac-
quisition  Program  Baseline  as  the  baseline,  figure  6  indicates,  for  each  asset  class, 
whether  delivery  of  the  first  in  class  asset  was  ahead  of  schedule,  on  schedule,  or 
behind schedule as of January 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

6
O
A
G
8
1
4

s
p
e

.
5
O
A
G
8
1
4

61 

As  part  of  our  ongoing  work,  we  are  analyzing  Coast  Guard  planning  documents 
to evaluate the current estimates of Deepwater asset delivery dates. Several factors 
add  to  the  uncertainty  about  the  delivery  schedule  of  Deepwater  assets.  First,  the 
Coast  Guard  is  still  in  the  early  phases  of  the  25  year  Deepwater  acquisition  pro-
gram  and  the  potential  for  changes  in  the  program  over  such  a  lengthy  period  of 
time  make  it  difficult  to  forecast  the  ability  of  the  Coast  Guard  to  acquire  future 
Deepwater  assets  according  to  its  published  schedule.  For  example,  technology 
changes  since  the  award  of  the  original  Deepwater  contract  in  2002  have  already, 
in  part,  delayed  delivery  of  the  VUAV,  and  the  Coast  Guard  is  currently  studying 
the  potential  use  of  an  alternative  unmanned  aerial  vehicle.  Second,  changes  to 
funding levels can impact the future delivery of Deepwater assets. For example, de-
spite earlier plans, the Fiscal Year 2008 Department of Homeland Security congres-
sional  budget  justification  indicates  that  the  Coast  Guard  does  not  plan  to  request 
funding  for  some  Deepwater  assets  in  FY  2008,  such  as  the  OPC  and  the  VUAV. 
Acquisition  of  these  two  Deepwater  assets  has  now  been  delayed  until  FY  2013,  at 
the earliest. Finally, the Coast Guard has recently made a number of program man-
agement  and  asset-specific  changes  that  could  impact  the  delivery  schedules  for  its 
Deepwater assets. For example, the Coast Guard has begun to bring all acquisition 
efforts under one organization. Further, the Coast Guard announced that it has ter-
minated  acquisition  of  the  FRC–B,  an  off-the-shelf  patrol  boat  that  is  intended  to 
serve as an interim replacement for the Coast Guard’s deteriorating fleet of 110′ pa-
trol  boats,  through  the  system  integrator  and  plans  to  assign  responsibility  for  the 
project  to  the  Coast  Guard’s  acquisition  directorate.  These  types  of  programmatic 
changes will take time to implement, and thus add to uncertainty about the specific 
delivery dates of certain Deepwater assets. 
Deepwater Program Management, Contractor Accountability, and Cost Control 

In  2001,  we  described  the  Deepwater  program  as  ‘‘risky’’  due  to  the  unique,  un-
tried  acquisition  strategy  for  a  project  of  this  magnitude  within  the  Coast  Guard.10 
The  Coast  Guard  used  a  system-of-systems  approach  to  replace  or  upgrade  assets 
with a single, integrated package of aircraft, vessels, and unmanned aerial vehicles, 
to be linked through systems that provide C4ISR and supporting logistics. In a sys-
tem  of  systems,  the  deliveries  of  Deepwater  assets  are  interdependent,  thus  sched-
ule slippages and uncertainties associated with potential changes in the design and 
capabilities  of  any  one  asset  increases  the  overall  risk  that  the  Coast  Guard  might 
not  meet  its  expanded  homeland  security  missions  within  given  budget  parameters 
and  milestone  dates.  The  Coast  Guard  also  used  a  systems  integrator—which  can 
give the contractor extensive involvement in requirements development, design, and 
source selection of major system and subsystem subcontractors. The Deepwater pro-
gram  is  also  a  performance-based  acquisition,  meaning  that  it  is  structured  around 
the results to be achieved rather than the manner in which the work is performed. 
If  performance-based  acquisitions  are  not  appropriately  planned  and  structured, 
there is an increased risk that the government may receive products or services that 
are over cost estimates, delivered late, and of unacceptable quality. 

In  2004  and  in  subsequent  assessments  in  2005  and  2006,  we  reported  concerns 
about  the  Deepwater  program  related  to  three  main  areas—program  management, 
contractor accountability, and cost control.11 The Coast Guard’s ability to effectively 
manage  the  program  has  been  challenged  by  staffing  shortfalls  and  poor  commu-
nication  and  collaboration  among  Deepwater  program  staff,  contractors,  and  field 
personnel  who  operate  and  maintain  the  assets.  Despite  documented  problems  in 
schedule, performance, cost control, and contract administration, measures for hold-
ing  the  contractor  accountable  resulted  in  an  award  fee  of  $4  million  (of  the  max-
imum  $4.6  million)  for  the  first  year.  Through  the  first  4  years  of  the  Deepwater 
contract,  the  systems  integrator  received  award  fees  that  ranged  from  87  percent 
to  92  percent  of  the  total  possible  award  fee  (scores  that  ranged  from  ‘‘very  good’’ 
to ‘‘excellent’’ based on Coast Guard criteria), for a total of over $16 million. Further, 
the  program’s  ability  to  control  Deepwater  costs  is  uncertain  given  the  Coast 
Guard’s lack of detailed information on the contractor’s competition decisions. While 
the Coast Guard has taken some actions to improve program outcomes, our assess-
ment of the program and its efforts to address our recommendations continues, and 
we plan to report on our findings later this year. 
Deepwater  Performance  and  Design  Problems  Creating  Operational  Challenges  for 

Coast Guard 

In  addition  to  the  program  management  issues  discussed  above,  there  have  been 
problems with the performance and design of Deepwater patrol boats that have cre-
ated operational challenges for the Coast Guard. The Deepwater program’s bridging 
strategy  to  convert  the  legacy  110′  patrol  boats  into  123′  patrol  boats  has  been  un-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

62 

successful. The Coast Guard had originally intended to convert all 49 of its 110′ pa-
trol  boats  into  123′  patrol  boats  in  order  to  increase  the  patrol  boats’  annual  oper-
ational hours and to provide additional capabilities, such as small boat stern launch 
and  recovery  and  enhanced  and  improved  C4ISR.  However,  the  converted  123′  pa-
trol  boats  began  to  display  deck  cracking  and  hull  buckling  and  developed  shaft 
alignment  problems,  and  the  Coast  Guard  elected  to  stop  the  conversion  process  at 
eight  hulls  upon  determining  that  the  converted  patrol  boats  would  not  meet  their 
expanded post-September 11 operational requirements. 
These  performance  problems  have  had  operational  consequences  for  the  Coast 
Guard.  The  hull  performance  problems  with  the  123′  patrol  boats  led  the  Coast 
Guard  to  remove  all  of  the  eight  converted  normal  123′  patrol  boats  from  service 
effective  November  30,  2006.  The  Commandant  of  the  Coast  Guard  has  stated  that 
having  reliable,  safe  cutters  is  ‘‘paramount’’  to  executing  the  Coast  Guard’s  mis-
sions.12 Thus, removing these patrol boats from service affects the Coast Guard’s op-
erations  in  its  missions,  such  as  search  and  rescue  and  alien  and  migrant  interdic-
tion.  The  Coast  Guard  is  taking  actions  to  mitigate  the  operational  impacts  result-
ing  from  the  removal  of  the  123′  patrol  boats  from  service.  Specifically,  in  recent 
testimony,  the  Commandant  of  the  Coast  Guard  stated  that  the  Coast  Guard  has 
taken the following actions: 

• multicrewing  eight  of  the  110′  patrol  boats  with  crews  from  the  123′  patrol 
boats that have been removed from service so that patrol hours for these vessels 
can be increased; 
• deploying  other  Coast  Guard  vessels  to  assist  in  missions  formerly  performed 
by the 123′ patrol boats; 
• securing permission from the U.S. Navy to continue using three 179′ cutters on 
loan  from  the  Navy  (these  were  originally  to  be  returned  to  the  Navy  in  2008) 
to supplement the Coast Guard’s patrol craft; and 
• compressing the maintenance and upgrades on the remaining 110′ patrol boats. 
The  FRC,  which  was  intended  as  a  long-term  replacement  for  the  legacy  patrol 
boats,  has  experienced  design  problems  that  have  operational  implications  as  well. 
As  we  reported  in  2006,  the  Coast  Guard  suspended  design  work  on  the  FRC  due 
to  design  risks  such  as  excessive  weight  and  horsepower  requirements.13 Coast 
Guard  engineers  raised  concerns  about  the  viability  of  the  FRC  design  (which  in-
volved  building  the  FRC’s  hull,  decks,  and  bulkheads  out  of  composite  materials 
rather  than  steel)  beginning  in  January  2005.  In  February  2006,  the  Coast  Guard 
suspended FRC design work after an independent design review by third party con-
sultants demonstrated, among other things, that the FRC would be far heavier and 
less  efficient  than  a  typical  patrol  boat  of  similar  length,  in  part,  because  it  would 
need four engines to meet Coast Guard speed requirements. 

One  operational  challenge  related  to  the  FRC  is  that  the  Coast  Guard  will  end 
up  with  two  classes  of  FRCs.  The  first  class  of  FRCs  to  be  built  would  be  based  on 
an  adapted  design  from  a  patrol  boat  already  on  the  market  to  expedite  delivery. 
The  Coast  Guard  would  then  pursue  development  of  a  follow-on  class  that  would 
be completely redesigned to address the problems in the original FRC design plans. 
Coast Guard officials recently estimated that the first FRC delivery will slip to Fis-
cal  Year  2009,  at  the  earliest,  rather  than  2007  as  outlined  in  the  2005  Revised 
Deepwater  Implementation  Plan.  Thus,  the  Coast  Guard  is  also  facing  longer-term 
operational gaps related to its patrol boats. 
Initial  Deployment  of  Nationwide  Automatic  Identification  System  Is  Under  Way, 

with Decisions Still to Come about Extending Coverage to Additional Vessels 

Outside Deepwater, one acquisition project included in the Fiscal Year 2008 budg-
et is the Nationwide Automatic Identification System, a system designed to of iden-
tify,  track,  and  communicate  with  vessels  bound  for  or  within  U.S.  waters  and  for-
warding that information for additional analysis. NAIS uses a maritime digital com-
munication system that transmits and receives vessel position and voyage data. The 
Coast  Guard  describes  NAIS  as  its  centerpiece  in  its  effort  to  build  Maritime  Do-
main Awareness, its ability to know what is happening on the water. 

NAIS is not expected to reach full capability until 2014, when the system will be 
able to track ships as far as 2,000 nautical miles away and communicate with them 
when  they  are  within  24  nautical  miles  of  the  U.S.  coast.  It  is  being  implemented 
in three phases, the first of which is scheduled to be fully operational in September 
2007.  At  that  time,  the  Coast  Guard  expects  to  have  the  ability  to  track—but  not 
communicate with—vessels in 55 ports and 9 coastal areas. The largest areas of the 
continental  U.S.  coastline  that  will  remain  without  coverage  after  this  first  phase 
are  the  Pacific  Northwest  and  Gulf  coasts.  The  second  phase  calls  for  being  able  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

63 

track  ships  out  to  50  nautical  miles  from  the  entire  U.S.  coast  and  communicate 
with them as far as 24 nautical miles out. This is the phase addressed in the Fiscal 
Year 2008 budget. 

The  $12  million  Fiscal  Year  2008  AC&I  request  for  NAIS  is  expected  to  pay  for 
implementing  the  initial  operating  capability  for  phase  two.  The  Coast  Guard  has 
received  approval  from  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  to  issue  solicitations 
and award contracts for this initial capability, and the agency has held information 
sessions to gauge industry interest in participating and to help refine its statement 
of  work  for  the  initial  solicitation.  The  initial  solicitation  will  provide  requirements 
for full receiving and transmitting capability for two sectors within one Coast Guard 
area  and  one  sector  in  another  area.  With  this  infrastructure  in  place  the  Coast 
Guard  expects  to  be  able  to  test  identification,  tracking,  and  communication  per-
formance,  including  such  features  as  the  ability  to  determine  if  the  vessel  trans-
missions are accurately reflecting the actual location of a vessel. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  considering  whether  to  require  additional  types  of  vessels  to 
install and use the equipment needed for the Coast Guard to track vessels and com-
municate  with  them.  Current  regulations  require  certain  vessels  (such  as  commer-
cial vessels over 65 feet in length) traveling on international voyages or within VTS 
areas to install and operate the transmission equipment.14 Vessels that are not sub-
ject to current regulations generally include noncommercial and fishing vessels and 
commercial  vessels  less  than  65  feet  long.  This  means  that  many  domestic  vessels 
are  not  required  to  transmit  the  vessel  and  voyage  information  and  therefore  will 
be invisible to the NAIS. The Coast Guard has indicated in the Federal Register that 
it is considering expanding the requirements to additional vessels.15 
Coast  Guard  Has  Taken  Actions  to  Improve  Oversight  of  Rescue  21  Contracts,  but 

System Coverage Has Been Reduced 

Another  non-Deepwater  project  covered  in  the  budget  request  is  Rescue  21,  the 
Coast  Guard’s  command,  control,  and  communication  infrastructure  used  primarily 
for  search  and  rescue.  The  Fiscal  Year  2008  AC&I  budget  includes  $81  million  for 
continued  development  of  Rescue  21.  In  May  2006  we  reported  that  shortcomings 
in Coast Guard’s contract management and oversight efforts contributed to program 
cost  increases  from  $250  million  in  1999  to  $710.5  million  in  2005  and  delays  in 
reaching  full  operating  capability  from  2006  to  2011.16 Our  recommendations  in-
cluded  better  oversight  of  the  project,  completion  of  an  integrated  baseline  review 
of  existing  contracts,  and  development  of  revised  cost  and  schedule  estimates.  Ac-
cording  to  the  Coast  Guard,  it  has  taken  a  series  of  actions  in  response,  including 
program  management  reviews  and  oversight  meetings,  conducting  integrated  base-
line reviews on existing contracts, and meeting regularly to assess project risks. 

According  to  the  Coast  Guard  officials  we  met  with,  the  contractor  is  currently 
on time and on budget for installing the full system in 11 Rescue 21 regions, includ-
ing  such  regions  as  New  Orleans,  Long  Island/New  York,  and  Miami.  The  last  of 
the 11 regions covered by current contracts is scheduled to be completed by October 
2008.  Contracts  for  the  25  regions  that  remain  have  not  been  signed.  To  keep  to 
current  project  cost  and  schedule  baselines,  however,  the  Coast  Guard  has  reduced 
the required performance of the system. Originally, Rescue 21 was supposed to limit 
coverage  gaps  to  2  percent,  meaning  that  the  system  had  to  be  able  to  capture  dis-
tress calls in 98 percent of the area within 20 nautical miles of the coast and within 
navigable  rivers  and  other  waterways.  The  current  contract  calls  for  coverage  gaps 
of less than 10 percent. Rescue 21 was also intended to have the capability to track 
Coast Guard vessels and aircraft and provide data communication with those assets. 
Neither  the  capability  to  track  the  Coast  Guard’s  own  assets  nor  data  communica-
tions is included in the current technology being installed. 
Coast  Guard  Faces  Additional  Challenges  Addressing  Traditional  Missions 
While  the  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  request  contains  funding  for  specifically  ad-
dressing  the  projects  discussed  above,  certain  other  projects  were  judged  by  Coast 
Guard officials to be lower in priority and were not included. We have examined two 
of  these  areas  in  recent  work—vessels  for  Aids-to-Navigation  and  domestic 
icebreaking activity, and vessels for icebreaking in polar areas. 
Decline  in  Condition  of  Some  ATON  and  Domestic  Icebreaking  Assets  May  Require 

More Attention for Recapitalization or Outsourcing Options 

Last  September,  we  completed  work  for  this  committee  on  the  condition  of  Coast 
Guard Aids-to-Navigation (ATON) and icebreaking assets.17 More than half of these 
assets  have  reached  or  will  be  approaching  the  end  of  their  designed  service  lives. 
In  2002,  the  Coast  Guard  proposed  options  for  systematically  rehabilitating  or  re-
placing  164  cutters  and  boats  in  these  fleets  after  determining  that  the  age,  condi-
tion,  and  cost  of  operating  these  assets  would  diminish  the  capability  of  the  Coast 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

64 

Guard  to  carry  out  ATON  and  domestic  icebreaking  missions.  We  noted  that  no 
funds  had  been  allocated  to  pursue  these  options,  apparently  due  to  competing 
needs  for  replacing  or  rehabilitating  other  Coast  Guard  assets.  These  competing 
needs, reflected largely in the Coast Guard’s expensive and lengthy Deepwater asset 
replacement  program,  will  continue  for  some  time,  as  will  other  pressures  on  the 
Federal  budget.  The  Coast  Guard  is  requesting  no  additional  spending  for  ATON 
assets or infrastructure in Fiscal Year 2008. 

Without  specific  funding  to  move  forward,  the  Coast  Guard  has  attempted  to 
break the project into smaller components and pursue potential funding from within 
the  Coast  Guard’s  budget,  focusing  on  the  assets  most  in  need  of  maintenance  or 
replacement. In February 2006, the Coast Guard began a project to replace its fleet 
of 80 trailerable Aids-to-Navigation boats with new boats that have enhanced capa-
bilities  to  do  ATON  work  as  well  as  other  missions.18 According  to  a  Coast  Guard 
official,  this  acquisition  would  cost  approximately  $14.4  million  if  all  80  boats  are 
purchased  and  would  bring  on  new  boats  over  a  5-year  period  as  funds  allow.  The 
Coast  Guard  official  responsible  for  the  project  said  the  Coast  Guard  intends  to 
make  the  purchases  using  a  funding  stream  appropriated  for  the  maintenance  of 
nonstandard boats that can be allocated to the boats with the most pressing mainte-
nance or recapitalization needs. Availability of these funds, however, depends on the 
condition and maintenance needs of other nonstandard boats; if this funding has to 
be applied to meet other needs, such as unanticipated problems, it may not be avail-
able for purchasing these boats. 

In  addition  to  carrying  out  their  primary  missions  of  ATON  and  domestic 
icebreaking,  these  assets  have  also  been  used  in  recent  years  for  other  missions 
such as homeland security. The Coast Guard’s ATON and domestic icebreakers saw 
a  sharp  increase  in  use  for  homeland  security  missions  after  the  attacks  of  Sep-
tember  11,  and  while  this  trend  has  moderated  somewhat,  the  use  of  some  assets 
in  these  missions  continues  well  above  pre-September  11  levels.  This  increase  is 
most prominent for domestic icebreakers, which are being operated more extensively 
for  other  purposes  at  times  of  year  when  no  icebreaking  needs  to  be  done.  Newer 
ATON vessels, which have greater multimission capabilities than older vessels, tend 
to be the ATON assets used the most for other missions. 

In addition to considering options for replacing or rehabilitating its ATON assets, 
the  Coast  Guard  also  has  examined  possibilities  for  outsourcing  missions.  In  2004 
and  2006,  the  Coast  Guard  completed  analyses  of  what  ATON  functions  could  be 
feasibly outsourced. Although possibilities for outsourcing were identified for further 
study,  Coast  Guard  officials  noted  that  outsourcing  also  carries  potential  disadvan-
tages. For example, they said it could lead to a loss of ‘‘surge’’ capacity—that is the 
capacity  to  respond  to  emergencies  or  unusual  situations.  Coast  Guard  officials 
noted  that  outsourcing  or  finding  a  contractor  to  do  work  after  an  event  such  as 
Katrina  is  difficult  due  to  the  increased  demand  for  their  services  as  well  as  the 
fact that the labor pool may have been displaced. When a contractor is found, it usu-
ally  takes  a  long  time  to  get  the  work  completed  due  to  the  backlog  of  work  and 
tends  to  be  very  expensive.  In  addition,  this  surge  capability  may  be  needed  for 
other missions, such as those that occur when ATON assets can be used to support 
search and rescue efforts. In the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina, for example, some 
ATON assets provided logistical support for first responders or transported stranded 
individuals. Coast Guard officials stated that after Hurricane Katrina, its own crews 
were able to begin work immediately to repair damaged aids and get the waterways 
open to maritime traffic again. Coast Guard officials also indicated that outsourcing 
may  adversely  affect  the  Coast  Guard’s  personnel  structure  by  reducing  opportuni-
ties to provide important experience for personnel to advance in their careers. 
Coast Guard Faces Decision on Future of Polar Icebreakers 

The  Coast  Guard  confronts  ongoing  maintenance  challenges  that  have  left  its 
polar  icebreaking  capability  diminished.  The  Coast  Guard  has  two  Polar-class  ice-
breakers for breaking channels in the Antarctic.19 Both are reaching the end of their 
design  service  lives,  and  given  the  funding  challenges  associated  with  maintaining 
them,  the  Coast  Guard  decided  to  deactivate  one  of  the  two,  the  POLAR  STAR,  in 
2006.  This  reduced  icebreaking  capability  since  only  one  Polar-class  icebreaker,  the 
POLAR  SEA,  was  available,  and  for  the  POLAR  SEA  it  increased  maintenance 
needs while reducing time available to conduct maintenance.20 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

65 

Coast Guard officials and others have reported that failure to address these chal-
lenges  could  leave  the  Nation  without  heavy  icebreaking  capability  and  could  jeop-
ardize the investment made in the Nation’s Antarctic Program.21 According to Coast 
Guard officials, the remaining Polar-class icebreaker’s age and increased operational 
tempo  have  left  it  unable  to  continue  the  mission  in  the  long  term  without  a  sub-
stantial  investment  in  maintenance  and  equipment  renewal.  One  option,  refur-
bishing the two existing Polar-class icebreakers for an additional 25 years of service, 
is estimated to cost between $552 million and $859 million. Another option, building 
new  assets,  would  cost  an  estimated  $600  million  per  vessel,  according  to  Coast 
Guard officials.22 

Coast  Guard  officials  have  begun  planning  a  transition  strategy  to  help  keep  the 
sole operating Polar-class icebreaker mission-capable until new or refurbished assets 
enter service, which would take an estimated 8 to 10 years.23 According to officials, 
this  10  year  recapitalization  plan  will  identify  current  and  projected  maintenance 
service  needs  and  equipment  renewal  projects  and  associated  costs,  alternatives  to 
address these needs, and timelines for completing these projects. 

Madam Chair and members of the subcommittee, this completes my statement for 

the record. 

Appendix I: Performance Results by Program from Fiscal Year 2002 through Fiscal Year 2006 

[Appendix I provides a detailed list of Coast Guard performance results for the Coast Guard’s 11 programs from Fiscal Year 2002 through 2006.] 

Program 

Program performance measure 

2002 

2003 

2004 

2005 

2006 

Performance 
target for 2006 

Programs meeting 2006 targets: 

U.S. Exclusive 
Economic Zone 
Enforcement 

Number of detected Exclu-
sive Economic Zone (EEZ) 
incursions by foreign fish-
ing vessels.

Ice Operations 
(domestic 
icebreaking) 

Number of waterway clo-
sure days.

250 

152 

247 

174 

164 

7 

7 

4 

0 

0 

≤199 

≤2a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.
7
O
A
G
8
1
4

Appendix I: Performance Results by Program from Fiscal Year 2002 through Fiscal Year 2006—Continued 

[Appendix I provides a detailed list of Coast Guard performance results for the Coast Guard’s 11 programs from Fiscal Year 2002 through 2006.] 

66 

Program 

Program performance measure 

2002 

2003 

2004 

2005 

2006 

Marine 
Environmental 
Protection 

Average of oil and chem-
ical spills greater than 
100 gallons per 100 mil-
lion tons shipped.

Ports, 
Waterways, 
and Coastal 
Security 

Percent reduction in mari-
time terrorism risk over 
which the Coast Guard 
has influence.

Undocumented 
migrant 
interdiction 

Percentage of interdicted 
illegal migrants entering 
the United States through 
illegal means.

Program expected to meet 2006 target: 

Illegal Drug 
Interdiction 

Percentage of cocaine re-
moved out of total esti-
mated cocaine entering 
the United States through 
maritime means b.

Programs that did not meet their 2005 targets: 

Aids to 
Navigation 

Defense 
Readiness 

Number of collisions, 
allisions, and grounding.

Percentage of time that 
units meet combat readi-
ness level.

Living Marine 
Resources 

Percentage of fisherman 
found in compliance with 
Federal regulations.

Marine Safety 

5-year average annual 
mariner, passenger, and 
boating deaths and inju-
ries.

35.1 

29.4 

22.1 

18.5 

16.3 

n/a 

n/a 

n/a 

14% 

17% 

88.3% 

85.3% 

87.1% 

85.5 

89.1 

Performance 
target for 2006 
≤19 

≥14% 

≥89% 

Not 
reported 

Not 
reported 

30.7% 

27.3% 

TBD c 

≥22% 

2,098 

2,000 

1,876 

1,825 

1,765 

≤1,748 

70% 

78% 

76% 

67% 

62% 

100% 

97.3% 

97.1% 

96.3% 

96.4% 

96.6% 

5,766 

5,561 

5,387 

5,169 

5,036 

≥97% 

≤4721 

87.7% 

84.4% 

Search and 
Rescue 

Percentage of distressed 
mariners’ lives saved.
Source:  GAO  analysis  of  Coast  Guard  data. 
Note:  TBD,  to  be  determined;  n/a,  not  available.  Italic  numbers  indicate  that  performance  targets  were  met  previously. 
a The  target  for  ice  operations  noted  here  is  for  domestic  icebreaking  only,  and  the  target  level  varies  according  to  the  index  for  an 
entire  winter.  Thus,  for  those  winters  designated  as  severe,  the  target  is  8  or  fewer  closure  days.  For  winters  designated  as  average, 
the  target  is  2  or  fewer  closure  days.  Because  2002  and  2004  were  designated  as  average  winters,  the  7  and  4  days  did  not  meet 
the  target. 

b The  performance  measure  for  the  illegal  drug  interdiction  program,  the  percentage  of  cocaine  removed,  was  revised  in  Fiscal 
Year  2004  from  the  percentage  of  cocaine  seized  in  order  to  more  accurately  report  the  impact  Coast  Guard  counterdrug  activities 
have  on  the  illicit  drug  trade.  As  a  result,  the  cocaine  removal  rates  for  Fiscal  Year  2002–2003  are  not  available. 

c Complete  data  are  not  yet  available  for  the  illegal  drug  interdiction  program.  However,  the  Coast  Guard  anticipates  meeting  the 

≥86% 

86.8% 

86.1% 

85.3% 

performance  target  for  this  program  based  on  past  performance. 
Related GAO Products 

Coast  Guard:  Status  of  Efforts  to  Improve  Deepwater  Program  Management  and 
Address  Operational  Challenges.  GAO–07–575T.  Washington,  D.C.:  March  8,  2007. 
Coast  Guard:  Preliminary  Observations  on  Deepwater  Program  Assets  and  Man-

agement Challenges. GAO–07–446T. Washington, D.C.: Feb. 15, 2007. 

Coast  Guard:  Coast  Guard  Efforts  to  Improve  Management  and  Address  Oper-
ational  Challenges  in  the  Deepwater  Program.  GAO–07–460T.  Washington,  D.C.: 
Feb. 14, 2007. 

Homeland  Security:  Observations  on  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  Ac-
quisition  Organization  and  on  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  Program.  GAO–07– 
453T. Washington, D.C.: Feb. 8, 2007. 

Coast  Guard:  Condition  of  Some  Aids-to-Navigation  and  Domestic  Icebreaking 
Vessels  Has  Declined;  Effect  on  Mission  Performance  Appears  Mixed.  GAO–06–979. 
Washington, D.C.: Sept. 22, 2006. 

Coast  Guard:  Non-Homeland  Security  Performance  Measures  Are  Generally 
Sound,  but  Opportunities  for  Improvement  Exist.  GAO–06–816.  Washington,  D.C.: 
Aug. 16, 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

67 

Coast  Guard:  Observations  on  the  Preparation,  Response,  and  Recovery  Missions 

Related to Hurricane Katrina. GAO–06–903. Washington, D.C.: July 31, 2006. 

Maritime  Security:  Information-Sharing  Efforts  Are  Improving.  GAO–06–933T. 

Washington, D.C.: July 10, 2006. 

764. Washington, D.C.: June 23, 2006. 

Coast Guard: Status of Deepwater Fast Response Cutter Design Efforts. GAO–06– 

United  States  Coast  Guard:  Improvements  Needed  in  Management  and  Oversight 

of Rescue System Acquisition. GAO–06–623. Washington, D.C.: May 31, 2006. 

Coast Guard: Changes in Deepwater Acquisition Plan Appear Sound, and Program 
Management  Has  Improved,  but  Continued  Monitoring  Is  Warranted.  GAO–06–546. 
Washington, D.C.: April 28, 2006. 

Coast Guard: Progress Being Made on Addressing Deepwater Legacy Asset Condi-
tion  Issues  and  Program  Management,  but  Acquisition  Challenges  Remain.  GAO– 
05–757. Washington, D.C.: July 22, 2005. 

Coast Guard: Preliminary Observations on the Condition of Deepwater Legacy As-
sets  and  Acquisition  Management  Challenges.  GAO–05–651T.  Washington,  D.C.: 
June 21, 2005. 

Maritime  Security:  Enhancements  Made,  but  Implementation  and  Sustainability 

Remain Key Challenges. GAO–05–448T. Washington, D.C.: May 17, 2005. 

Coast Guard: Preliminary Observations on the Condition of Deepwater Legacy As-
sets  and  Acquisition  Management  Challenges.  GAO–05–307T.  Washington,  D.C.: 
April 20, 2005. 

Coast  Guard:  Observations  on  Agency  Priorities  in  Fiscal  Year  2006  Budget  Re-

quest. GAO–05–364T. Washington, D.C.: March 17, 2005. 

Coast Guard: Station Readiness Improving, but Resource Challenges and Manage-

ment Concerns Remain. GAO–05–161. Washington, D.C.: January 31, 2005. 

Maritime Security: Better Planning Needed to Help Ensure an Effective Port Secu-

rity Assessment Program. GAO–04–1062. Washington, D.C.: September 30, 2004. 

Maritime  Security:  Partnering  Could  Reduce  Federal  Costs  and  Facilitate  Imple-
mentation  of  Automatic  Vessel  Identification  System.  GAO–04–868.  Washington, 
D.C.: July 23, 2004. 

Maritime Security: Substantial Work Remains to Translate New Planning Require-
ments  into  Effective  Port  Security.  GAO–04–838.  Washington,  D.C.:  June  30,  2004. 
Coast Guard: Deepwater Program Acquisition Schedule Update Needed. GAO–04– 

695. Washington, D.C.: June 14, 2004. 

Coast Guard: Station Spending Requirements Met, but Better Processes Needed to 

Track Designated Funds. GAO–04–704. Washington, D.C.: May 28, 2004. 

Coast  Guard:  Key  Management  and  Budget  Challenges  for  Fiscal  Year  2005  and 

Beyond. GAO–04–636T. Washington, D.C.: April 7, 2004. 

Coast Guard: Relationship between Resources Used and Results Achieved Needs to 

Be Clearer. GAO–04–432. Washington, D.C.: March 22, 2004. 

Contract  Management:  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  Program  Needs  Increased  Atten-
tion  to  Management  and  Contractor  Oversight.  GAO–04–380.  Washington,  D.C.: 
March 9, 2004. 

Coast  Guard:  New  Communication  System  to  Support  Search  and  Rescue  Faces 

Challenges. GAO–03–1111. Washington, D.C.: September 30, 2003. 

Maritime Security: Progress Made in Implementing Maritime Transportation Secu-
rity  Act,  but  Concerns  Remain.  GAO–03–1155T.  Washington,  D.C.:  September  9, 
2003. 

Coast Guard: Actions Needed to Mitigate Deepwater Project Risks. GAO–01–659T. 

Washington, D.C.: May 3, 2001. 

Coast  Guard:  Progress  Being  Made  on  Deepwater  Project,  but  Risks  Remain. 

GAO–01–564. Washington, D.C.: May 2, 2001. 

Coast  Guard:  Strategies  for  Procuring  New  Ships,  Aircraft,  and  Other  Assets. 

GAO/T–HEHS–99–116. Washington, D.C.: Mar. 16, 1999. 

Coast  Guard’s  Acquisition  Management:  Deepwater  Project’s  Justification  and  Af-
fordability  Need  to  Be  Addressed  More  Thoroughly.  GAO/RCED–99–6.  Washington, 
D.C.: October 26, 1998. 
Endnotes 

1 GAO’s  analysis  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  request  is  pre-
sented  in  nominal  terms.  Supplemental  funding  received  for  Operation  Iraqi  Free-
dom  and  Hurricane  Katrina  are  not  included  in  the  analysis,  except  where  noted. 
2 Beginning  with  the  Fiscal  Year  2007  budget,  the  Office  of  Management  and 
Budget  designated  the  Coast  Guard’s  drug  interdiction  and  other  law  enforcement 
programs  as  non-homeland  security  missions  for  budgetary  purposes.  If  these  two 
programs  are  included  as  homeland  security  missions,  overall  homeland  security 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

68 

funding  in  the  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  request  is  approximately  52  percent  of  the 
total budget. 

3 GAO, Coast Guard: Non-Homeland Security Performance Measures Are Generally 
Sound,  but  Opportunities  for  Improvement  Exist,  GAO–06–816  (Washington,  D.C.: 
August 2006). 

4 For more details on the Coast Guard’s efforts to match resources to performance 

results, see Appendix III in GAO–06–816. 

5 Pub. L. No. 109–347, 120 Stat. 1884 (2006). 
6 Although  the  deployable  forces  will  be  reorganized  under  a  single  command  au-
thority,  officials  told  us  the  units  would  remain  based  in  their  current  locations. 
However, personnel on these teams may be rotated or cross-deployed with other spe-
cialized  teams.  For  example,  an  MSST  located  at  Seattle  will  remain  based  in  that 
location,  but  the  personnel  attached  to  that  MSST  may  be  rotated  or  mixed  with 
other MSST units to meet ongoing needs. 

7 Defense  Acquisition  University,  Quick  Look  Study:  United  States  Coast  Guard 

Deepwater Program, (Fort Belvoir, Virginia, 2007). 

8 For  a  more  complete  description  of  our  reviews  of  the  Deepwater  program,  see 
GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Preliminary  Observations  on  Deepwater  Program  Assets  and 
Management Challenges, GAO–07–446T (Washington, D.C.: Feb. 15, 2007). 

9 In addition to these asset classes, the Deepwater program includes other projects 
such  as  Command,  Control,  Communications,  Computers,  Intelligence,  Surveillance 
and  Reconnaissance  (C4ISR)  systems.  For  example,  the  Coast  Guard  plans  to  pro-
cure  surveillance  data  from  another  unmanned  aerial  vehicle,  the  RQ–4A.  Because 
this  is  not  to  be  acquired  as  a  capital  investment,  we  do  not  include  it  among  the 
assets to be acquired or upgraded. 

10 GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Progress  Being  Made  on  Deepwater  Project,  but  Risks  Re-

main, GAO–01–564 (Washington, D.C.: May 2, 2001). 

11 GAO,  Contract  Management:  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  Program  Needs  In-
creased  Attention  to  Management  and  Contractor  Oversight,  GAO–04–380  (Wash-
ington, D.C.: Mar. 9, 2004); Coast Guard: Progress Being Made on Addressing Deep-
water  Legacy  Asset  Condition  Issues  and  Program  Management,  but  Acquisition 
Challenges  Remain,  GAO–05–757  (Washington,  D.C.:  Jul.  22,  2005);  and  Coast 
Guard:  Changes  in  Deepwater  Plan  Appear  Sound,  and  Program  Management  Has 
Improved, but Continued Monitoring is Warranted, GAO–06–546 (Washington, D.C.: 
Apr. 28, 2006). 

12 U.S. Coast Guard, Office of Public Affairs, Coast Guard Suspends Converted Pa-

trol Boat Operations, (Washington, D.C., 2006). 

13 GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Status  of  Deepwater  Fast  Response  Cutter  Design  Efforts, 

GAO–06–764 (Washington, D.C.: June 23, 2006). 

14 Vessel traffic services areas are locations where the Coast Guard monitors and 
communicates with vessels using AIS, radar, and other technologies to prevent colli-
sions and other accidents. 

15 In  our  previous  report  we  recommended  that  the  Coast  Guard  should  pursue 
opportunities  to  cost-share  with  private  entities  that  were  interested  in  receiving 
vessel  and  voyage  information  transmissions.  According  to  Coast  Guard  officials, 
subsequent to the publication of the report they have partnered with private entities 
in Tampa, Florida, and Alaska. 

16 GAO,  United  States  Coast  Guard:  Improvements  Needed  in  Management  and 
Oversight of Rescue System Acquisition, GAO–06–623 (Washington, D.C.: May 2006). 
17 GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Condition  of  Some  Aids-to-Navigation  and  Domestic 
Icebreaking  Vessels  Has  Declined;  Effect  on  Mission  Performance  Appears  Mixed, 
GAO–06–979 (Washington, D.C.: Sept. 22, 2006). 

18 These boats can be placed on trailers and transported on land by truck. 
19 In addition to the Polar-class icebreakers, the Coast Guard acquired a third ice-
breaker,  the  HEALY,  in  2000.  Unlike  the  Polar-class  icebreakers,  the  HEALY  was 
designed  to  be  an  Arctic  scientific  platform  and  does  not  have  the  capabilities  to 
break ice in the Antarctic under most conditions. According to Coast Guard officials, 
although the HEALY also has maintenance issues, the condition and extent of main-
tenance needed for the Polar-class icebreakers is more severe. 

20 Coast Guard officials estimated it would require $40 million to $50 million and 
2  to  3  years  of  service  to  refurbish  the  deactivated  Polar-class  icebreaker—the 
POLAR  STAR—to  a  capability  level  commensurate  with  its  other  Polar-class  ice-
breaker. Coast Guard officials noted that this funding would cover upgrades to sys-
tems and to replace vessel infrastructure and parts that Coast Guard had cannibal-
ized over the past years to replace parts on the POLAR SEA. 

21 In  the  Antarctic,  the  United  States  maintains  3  year-round  scientific  stations. 
Coast Guard Polar-class icebreakers provide heavy icebreaking support necessary to 
open  a  shipping  channel  and  allow  maritime  resupply  of  fuel,  food,  and  cargo  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

69 

these  scientific  stations.  Polar  icebreakers  deploy  to  support  primary  missions  such 
as the U.S. Antarctic Program, but while present in the polar region, they often sup-
port secondary missions such as search and rescue or respond to maritime environ-
mental response situations as situations arise. 

22 According  to  the  Coast  Guard,  this  estimate  this  is  based  on  HEALY  construc-

tion costs, making adjustments for increased structural and power requirements. 

23 In  2007,  the  National  Research  Council  of  the  National  Academies  issued  a 
final  report  on  the  condition  of  the  U.S.  polar  icebreaking  fleet  (Polar  Icebreakers 
in a Changing World: An Assessment of U.S. Needs). This report corroborated Coast 
Guard’s  assessment  of  the  increased  risks  faced  by  the  deteriorating  condition  of 
these  vessels  and  recommended  that  Congress  immediately  take  action  to  design, 
plan,  and  build  two  replacement  polar  icebreaking  vessels  to  replace  the  aging 
Polar-class  vessels.  Moreover,  because  these  new  vessels  would  not  be  available  for 
another  8  to  10  years,  the  report  recommends  that  Congress  provide  the  Coast 
Guard with a sufficient operations and maintenance budget to address maintenance 
backlogs  on  the  two  operating  polar  icebreakers  to  ensure  a  minimum  level  of 
icebreaking  capability  during  this  period.  The  report  also  recommends  leaving  the 
POLAR STAR in caretaker status until the new vessels enter service. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE RESERVE OFFICERS ASSOCIATION 

OF THE UNITED STATES 

The  Reserve  Officers  Association  of  the  United  States  (ROA)  is  a  professional  as-
sociation  of  commissioned  and  warrant  officers  of  our  Nation’s  seven  uniformed 
services  and  their  spouses.  ROA  was  founded  in  1922  during  the  drawdown  years 
following  the  end  of  World  War  I.  It  was  formed  as  a  permanent  institution  dedi-
cated  to  national  defense,  with  a  goal  to  teach  Americans  about  the  dangers  of  un-
preparedness. When chartered by Congress in 1950, the act established the objective 
of  ROA  to:  ‘‘. . .  support  and  promote  the  development  and  execution  of  a  military 
policy for the United States that will provide adequate National Security.’’ The mis-
sion  of  ROA  is  to  advocate  strong  Reserve  Components  and  national  security,  and 
to support Reserve officers in their military and civilian lives. 

The  Association’s  70,000  members  include  Reserve  and  Guard  Soldiers,  Sailors, 
Marines,  Airmen,  and  Coast  Guardsmen  who  frequently  serve  on  Active  Duty  to 
meet critical needs of the uniformed services and their families. ROA’s membership 
also includes officers from the U.S. Public Health Service and the National Oceanic 
and Atmospheric Administration who often are first responders during national dis-
asters  and  help  prepare  for  homeland  security.  ROA  is  represented  in  each  state 
with  55  departments  plus  departments  in  Latin  America,  the  District  of  Columbia, 
Europe,  the  Far  East,  and  Puerto  Rico.  Each  department  has  several  chapters 
throughout the state. ROA has more than 450 chapters worldwide. 

ROA is a member of The Military Coalition where it co-chairs the Tax and Social 
Security  Committee.  ROA  is  also  a  member  of  the  National  Military  Veterans  Alli-
ance.  Overall,  ROA  works  with  75  military,  veterans,  and  family  support  organiza-
tions. 
Disclosure of Federal Grants or Contracts 

The  Reserve  Officers  Association  is  a  private,  member-supported,  congressionally 
chartered  organization.  Neither  ROA  nor  its  staff  receive  or  have  received  grants, 
sub-grants,  contracts,  or  subcontracts  from  the  Federal  Government  for  the  past 
three  fiscal  years.  All  other  activities  and  services  of  the  Association  are  accom-
plished free of any direct Federal funding. 
Introduction 

Mr.  Chairman  and  distinguished  members  of  the  Senate  Subcommittee  on 
Oceans,  Atmosphere,  Fisheries,  and  Coast  Guard,  on  behalf  of  ROA’s  70,000  mem-
bers,  the  Reserve  Officers  Association  thanks  the  Committee  for  the  honor,  privi-
lege,  and  opportunity  to  submit  testimony  on  issues  relating  to  the  Coast  Guard 
budget. 

The  U.S.  Coast  Guard  and  its  Selected  Reserve  are  a  valuable,  unique  and  in-
creasingly  visible  service  within  the  armed  forces  structure  of  this  Nation.  ROA 
would like to thank the Subcommittee for its on-going stewardship that it has dem-
onstrated  on  issues  of  homeland  security  as  the  Coast  Guard  is  a  non-DOD  uni-
formed  service.  The  USCG  structure  needs  and  capabilities  do  not  always  receive 
the  public  attention  ROA  believes  they  should.  Since  Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita, 
the  Nation  has  come  to  expect  even  more  from  this  proud  service  and  has  levied 
additional  consequence  management  missions  upon  it,  while  retaining  the  mission 
as lead Federal agency for maritime homeland security. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

Executive Summary 

70 

Our  Coast  Guard’s  plate  is  overflowing  with  workload  demands  for  homeland  se-
curity. That our men and women in the Coast Guard and its Selected Reserve have 
kept  their  heads  above  water  is  a  testimony  to  exemplary  leadership  and  selfless 
personnel motivation and dedication. 

ROA asks the Committee to respond to the unselfish service of U.S. Coast Guard’s 
men  and  women  and  recognize  the  need  for  funding  assistance  in  order  for  the 
Coast Guard and its Reserve to continue this outstanding work. 

This  high  level  of  performance  can  only  be  sustained  by  supporting  the  Total 
Force.  The  USCG  Reserve  component  is  cost  effective  and  provides  flexibility  in  re-
sponding to changing demands and threats. The Selected Reserve augments the ac-
tive  Coast  Guard  and  reinforces  all  eleven  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  missions.  Yet  like 
the active Coast Guard, its Reserve has more missions than people to perform them. 
While  the  CG  Reserve  is  authorized  at  10,000  serving  members,  it  has  only  been 
funded at a level of 8,100 Reservists. 

ROA’s testimony recommends an increase in funding to an interim end-strength 
level of 9,300 for FY 2008, which will create a more robust Coast Guard Selected 
Reserve by enhancing its capabilities toward mission accomplishment. 

Issues 
1. Resetting the Force 

In  1995  the  Coast  Guard  Selected  Reserve  was  fully  integrated  into  the  Active 
duty  Coast  Guard  to  be  trained  and  employed  as  a  part-time  workforce  doing  the 
same  jobs  as  Active  duty  members.  The  Congress  indicated,  in  1995,  that  the  min-
imum  size  of  the  CG  Reserve  be  8,000  serving  members.  Over  the  past  several 
years, the Active duty Coast Guard budget and mission scope has expanded to meet 
the service’s increased responsibilities for maritime homeland security. 

A 2004 GAO report noted that resource hours for many of the Coast Guard’s tra-
ditional  missions  have  decreased  as  demands  for  its  critical  port  security  mission 
have increased. Coast Guard legacy vessels are experiencing increased unscheduled 
maintenance  and  personnel  stress  issues  are  arising  as  a  result  of  higher  oper-
ational demands across its eleven missions. 

ROA  believes  insufficient  oversight  has  been  given  to  the  personnel  resources  re-
quired to meet these new missions which are in addition to the Coast Guard’s tradi-
tional  missions.  This  mission  burden  has  clearly  had  an  effect  on  the  overall  readi-
ness  of  the  Coast  Guard.  In  FY  2006  the  Coast  Guard  was  able  to  satisfactorily 
meet  only  8  of  its  present  11  mission  goals.  Of  particular  note  was  the  failure  to 
meet its Defense Readiness combat rating standard (69 percent achieved versus 100 
percent target). 

Sources within the Coast Guard have indicated to ROA that they have recruiting 
and  training  resources  that  would  permit  them  to  expand  beyond  an  end-strength 
level of 8,100 to 9,300 in FY 2008. 

ROA urges Congress to increase the funded size of the Coast Guard Selected Re-
serve from the Fiscal Year 2007 level of 8,100 to 9,300 in FY 2008. 

ROA  Resolution  Number  04–12  recommends  increasing  the  authorized  end- 
strength  of  the  Coast  Guard  Selected  Reserve  to  at  least  15,000.  The  USCG  has 
come up with similar results. In a recent study, the Coast Guard identified through 
its Contingency Personnel Requirements List (CPRL) an end-strength of 14,000 offi-
cers and enlisted by FY 2011. 

The Coast Guard has the ability and infrastructure to immediately begin recruit-
ing  to,  and  training  of,  a  Selected  Reserve  funded  to  a  level  of  9,300  serving  mem-
bers.  As  for  the  future,  the  Coast  Guard  can  ramp  up  to  attain  an  authorized  end- 
strength of 14,000 Selected Reservists by FY 2012. 

ROA suggests increasing authorization and funding of the Coast Guard Selected 
Reserve to 10,475 in FY 2009, with further sequential end-strength authorization 
increases  and  funding  of  1,175  personnel  each  Fiscal  Year  from  FY  2010  to  FY 
2012. 

This  increased  end-strength  will  permit  a  highly  cost  effective  way  for  the  Coast 
Guard  to  match  the  Contingency  Personnel  Requirements  List  (CPRL)  developed 
from the eleven mission performance goals presently assigned to the service. 

ROA  recommends  hearings  by  the  U.S.  Senate  to  determine  FY  2008  authoriza-
tion  and  funding  levels  for  the  USCGR  and  the  development  of  annual  incre-
mental increases to obtain an end-strength level of 14,000 by FY 2012. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

71 

2. Not fulfilling Mission Areas 

The  Commandant’s  recent  USCG  Reserve  policy  prioritizes  the  CG  Reserve  mis-
sions  as  follows:  (1)  Maritime  Homeland  Security  (MHS),  (2)  Domestic  and  Expedi-
tionary National Defense, (3) Disaster Response and Recovery. These mission areas 
are designed to support our Homeland Security. In looking at how the USCG is ac-
complishing these missions the following are illustrative examples. 
1. Maritime Homeland Security (MHS) 

Maritime Homeland Security is considered by many the most important issue fac-
ing  the  United  States  today.  Maritime  Transportation  Security  is  a  major  element 
of this mission area. The 2002 Maritime Transportation Security Act (MTSA) levied 
requirements that included Port Security Vulnerability Assessments in 55 strategic 
ports  and  the  development  and  implementation  of  Area  Maritime  Security  Plans. 
These are time and manpower intensive tasks. In an attempt to address these mis-
sion  assignments  the  Coast  Guard  has  identified  the  need  to  set  up  13  Maritime 
Safety  and  Security  Teams  (MSST).  A  significant  slice  of  the  team’s  100  members 
are  programmed  to  come  from  the  Selected  Reserve.  Insufficient  Selected  Reserve 
end-strength has allowed only the partial staffing of just four teams for this strategi-
cally and operationally important mission. 

Additionally,  the  National  Guard  Bureau  has  asked  the  Coast  Guard  to  assume 
the state-level MTSA port and waterway responsibilities which requires the assign-
ment  of  senior  Coast  Guard  Reserve  officers  to  each  State  Guard  Headquarters  as 
liaison  officers.  To  date  insufficient  Selected  Reserve  end-strength  has  allowed  only 
three officers to be assigned to this important Homeland Security duty. 
2. Domestic and Expeditionary Support to National Defense 

Port  Security  units  (PSUs)  are  identified  in  Coast  Guard  and  Combatant  Com-
mander contingency plans that call for 11 Port Security Units. PSUs perform mari-
time  interception  operations  (MIO),  coastal  security  patrols,  and  port  security  mis-
sions for military and humanitarian missions worldwide, including the protection of 
national assets. Presently only 8 of the 11 PSUs, with a staffing of 115 Reserve and 
5 Active duty billets are operational. 

PSUs  are  units  that  are  being  frequently  deployed.  As  a  result,  the  USCGR  is 
having a difficult time recruiting to these units from other billets within the CG Re-
serve.  As  a  result,  this  is  the  program  with  the  highest  frequency  of  individual  re-
peat mobilization for CG Reservists, which has resulted in retention problems. 
3. Disaster Response and Recovery 

Since the 2005 hurricane season, Coast Guard Reserve liaison officers to Federal, 
state  and  local  disaster  response  agencies  are  in  high  demand  but  short  supply.  Of 
more  than  80  required  positions,  only  6  emergency  preparedness  liaison  officers 
(EPLOs) can be filled from the Coast Guard Reserve as requested. 

These examples illustrate that some of the most vital missions required to support 
Homeland  Security  and  prevent  or  respond  to  another  terrorist  incident  are  not 
being  achieved  due  to  inadequate  reserve  end-strength.  The  country  can  ill-afford 
to ignore these requirements any longer and risks not preventing the next terrorist 
incident. 

ROA strongly recommends funding at a higher end-strength level in order to ac-
complish all mission areas vital to Homeland Security. 

Conclusion 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Subcommittee, since 9/11 the Coast Guard has 
added  7,000  Active  personnel  and  5,000  civilian  members,  a  very  expensive  ap-
proach  in  a  resource  constrained  environment  that  has  not  yielded  sufficient  risk 
mitigation in the Homeland Defense and Maritime Security mission areas. 

With  only  8,100  funded  billets,  the  USCG  is  playing  musical  chairs  with  its  Re-
serve  personnel.  Insufficient  Reserve  end-strength  requires  the  Coast  Guard  Se-
lected  Reserve  to  transfer  personnel  from  other  vital  Reserve  missions  to  another 
in  an  attempt  that  only  partially  addresses  these  legislated  national  security  re-
quirements. Adding to Active structure is an expensive solution and hiring civilians 
cannot  realistically  solve  these  operational  shortfalls.  With  the  present  size  of  the 
CG  Reserve,  these  missions  have  no  realistic  chance  of  being  fully  accomplished. 
Neither  can  technology,  in  the  near-term,  address  these  constraints  on  the  Coast 
Guard’s operational capabilities and reach within the maritime domain. 

Using  FY  2007  Coast  Guard  budget  data,  the  Coast  Guard  Reserve,  as  presently 
structured only comprises about 2.25 percent of the Coast Guard’s budget. The tasks 
that the Congress has mandated in current homeland defense legislation could actu-
ally be accomplished by the CG Reserve at a cost of about one-fifth of what an active 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

72 

duty personnel solution would cost. An increase in funded end-strength of the Coast 
Guard  Selected  Reserve  to  9,300  billets  is  a  cost  effective  solution  to  attain  higher 
and more sustainable levels of mission performance and accomplishment. 

An  under-strength  Coast  Guard  Reserve  was  able  to  perform  in  a  true  national 
disaster,  but  how  long  can  this  performance  be  sustained?  The  right  for  increased 
funding  has  been  earned.  ROA  does  not  wish  to  take  funds  away  from  the  active 
Coast Guard and its projects; we feel that the CG Reserve is a good investment for 
additional funding. 

The  Reserve  Officers  Association  respectfully  asks  the  Committee  to  support  this 
requested  funding  in  FY  2008  and  review  a  programmatic  and  sequenced  increase 
in the authorized and fully funded end-strength for the Selected Reserve of the U.S. 
Coast Guard. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

ADMIRAL THAD W. ALLEN 

Question  1.  Adequacy  of  Coast  Guard  Assets  in  District  14—Hawaii.  Does  the 
Coast  Guard  have  enough  assets  and  personnel  to  fully  implement  all  of  its  in-
tended  missions  in  the  Northwestern  Hawaiian  Islands  Marine  National  Monu-
ment? 

Answer.  Yes.  The  Coast  Guard  will  be  able  to  enforce  its  missions  in  the  Pacific 
by leveraging the multi-mission character of our assets to increase efficiency and ef-
fectiveness. Additionally, our budget provides sufficient funding to support the man-
power and asset requirements needed for the Coast Guard to effectively execute its 
statutorily mandated eleven mission-programs. 

Question  1a.  Does  the  Coast  Guard  have  plans  to  increase  the  number  of  assets 

and personnel in District 14 in the future? 

Answer. The Coast Guard distributes available assets and personnel according to 
the overall risks and goals across all of our mission-programs. Adjustments to assets 
and  personnel  are  made  as  necessary  through  real-time  asset  tracking  and  annual 
budget requests. All Coast Guard Operational Commanders carefully and judiciously 
balance  available  resources  against  mission  demands  to  apply  resources  to  best 
meet  statutory  requirements,  particularly  concentrating  on  those  missions  and  geo-
graphic  areas  that  present  the  greatest  risk.  While  addressing  capacity,  capability, 
and operational tempo challenges, the Coast Guard continues to ensure coverage of 
all mission areas based on the assessment of risk and the careful allocation of avail-
able resources. 

Question 1b. Given these limited assets, and the designation of the Northwest Ha-
waiian  Islands  Marine  National  Monument  by  President  Bush  in  June  2006,  how 
does  the  Coast  Guard  plan  to  properly  and  efficiently  enforce  the  prohibitions  on 
passage, fishing and other activities in the National Monument? 

Answer. The Coast Guard does not anticipate increasing deployments in this area 
at  this  time.  However,  the  Coast  Guard  will  continue  to  provide  law  enforcement 
presence with aircraft and cutter deployments in the Monument area commensurate 
with threat levels and competing demands. 

Question  1c.  Why  has  the  Coast  Guard  not  asked  for  more  funding  for  District 

14 in the FY 2008 budget? 

Answer. The President’s FY08 budget provides sufficient funding to maintain the 
manpower and asset requirements needed for the Coast Guard to effectively execute 
its statutorily mandated mission-programs. 

Question 1d. Admiral, are you familiar with the AIS Base Station Network or the 

proposal to provide global access of commercial vessels for tracking? 

Answer.  The  term  AIS  Base  Station  Network  is  generic  in  nature  and  can  refer 
to  a  number  of  different  systems  deployed  internationally  or  for  sale  by  a  number 
of different vendors. The Coast Guard is establishing a Nationwide Automatic Iden-
tification  System  (NAIS)  to  collect,  integrate,  and  analyze  information  from  vessels 
equipped with AIS systems that are subject to the jurisdiction of the United States 
using a combination of ground-based and space-based AIS receivers. 

Question  1e.  Is  this  a  system  that  could  be  beneficial  to  the  Coast  Guard  in  the 

tracking of vessels? 

Answer. No. They are not suited to monitoring of remote oceans areas. 
Question  1f.  Is  the  Coast  Guard  interested  in  engaging  in  a  private-public  part-

nership for vessel tracking systems? Why, or why not? 

Answer. Yes, the U.S. Coast Guard is partnering with local Automatic Identifica-
tion  System  (AIS)  providers  in  numerous  locations  as  part  of  the  NAIS  project  and 
installing  its  own  receive-only  capability  in  others.  Additionally,  the  Coast  Guard 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

73 

has  contracted  to  receive  AIS  information  from  a  satellite  that  is  scheduled  to  be 
launched this year to enable access to information from thousands of miles offshore. 
Question  1g.  Does  the  Coast  Guard  plan  to  include  a  budget  request  for  the  en-

closed air station hangar at Barbers Point, Hawaii in FY 2009’s budget? 

Answer.  No.  The  Coast  Guard  will  be  initiating  a  Planning  Proposal  to  examine 
alternatives  for  the  replacement  of  hangar  facilities  at  Air  Station  Barber’s  Point. 
Question  2.  Admiral,  we  have  discussed  on  numerous  occasions  the  Coast  Guard 
international inspection program for foreign ports. What do you think about the pos-
sibility of developing a third party verification system to better verify a foreign ports 
compliance with ISPS? 

Answer.  The  idea  of  third  party  verification  using  contractors  is  generally  unac-
ceptable to our trading partners. Many, if not most countries would likely be unwill-
ing  to  allow  a  third  party  entity  to  evaluate  ISPS  compliance  at  their  ports  due  to 
matters  of  sovereignty.  Early  on,  the  Coast  Guard  attempted  to  use  a  contractor  to 
gather  preliminary  information  for  a  country  visit  and  that  government  objected. 
Even  though  the  Maritime  Transportation  and  Security  Act  (MTSA)  requires  the 
Coast  Guard  to  assess  the  effectiveness  of  antiterrorism  measures  in  foreign  ports, 
we  cannot  do  so  unless  invited,  and  must  respect  the  sovereignty  of  our  trading 
partners. However, to overcome some of the resistance to this program, we have in-
vited some of our trading partners to the United States to share objectives. 

While  there  are  potential  problems  with  a  private  third  party  verification  system 
using  contractors,  the  International  Maritime  Organization  (IMO)  has  adopted  a 
member audit scheme that has member nations examine the compliance of other na-
tions  with  various  international  maritime  safety  instruments.  The  IMO  has  agreed 
to expand this member audit scheme to include maritime security at a future date. 
We  are  supportive  of  this  approach  and  believe  such  an  arrangement  would  serve 
to leverage Coast Guard competencies and improve ISPS compliance. 

Question 3. Why do we keep seeing a trend of the Coast Guard’s security missions 

taking the majority of resources over non-security missions? 

Answer. The Coast Guard distributes available assets and personnel according to 
the overall risks and goals across all of our mission-programs. Adjustments to assets 
and  personnel  are  made  as  necessary  through  real-time  asset  tracking  and  annual 
budget requests. Coast Guard operational commanders carefully and judiciously bal-
ance  available  resources  against  mission  demands  to  apply  resources  to  best  meet 
statutory requirements, particularly concentrating on those missions and geographic 
areas  that  present  the  greatest  risk.  This  use  of  risk  is  a  fundamental  aspect  of 
Coast Guard operations. While addressing capacity, capability, and operational pace 
challenges, the Coast Guard continues to ensure coverage of all mission areas based 
on  the  assessment  of  risk  and  the  careful  allocation  of  available  resources.  Oper-
ational  commanders  will  continue  to  allocate  multi-mission  assets  based  on  overall 
achievement  of  performance  goals,  given  current  intelligence  and  risk  assessments. 
Question 3a. What, if anything, are you doing to make sure the non-security mis-

sions are allocated as many resources if not more than the security missions? 

Answer. The GAO has determined that despite congressional concern about an in-
creased focus on homeland security missions, overall non-homeland security mission 
performance  has  not  suffered  to  any  great  degree.  In  fact,  in  the  case  of  domestic 
fishery enforcement—the 96.6 percent actual observed compliance rate (only .4 per-
cent short of the goal of 97 percent) has been constant since 2004. The Coast Guard 
continues to strive to meet the demands of its traditional missions while embracing 
its  expanded  homeland  security  duties.  Coast  Guard  assets  are  inherently  multi- 
mission  in  character—this  provides  the  Service  the  flexibility  to  rapidly  transition 
resources  between  mission-programs  as  needed  to  support  multiple  priorities.  We 
firmly believe that this multi-mission capability, coupled with a risk-based approach 
to  resource  allocation,  has  allowed  our  Service  to  improve  efficiency  and  effective-
ness in both our homeland and non-homeland security roles. 

Question 3b. Can you explain why the Coast Guard was unable to meet its target 

goals in all of its mission areas? 

Answer.  During  Fiscal  Year  2006,  the  Coast  Guard  met  the  performance  targets 
for  many  of  its  core  missions,  including  marine  environmental  protection,  foreign 
fishery  enforcement,  and  domestic  ice  breaking.  However,  we  missed  performance 
targets  by  less  than  1  percent  for  search  and  rescue  and  domestic  fishery  enforce-
ment.  Over  the  past  3  years,  only  the  Defense  Readiness  and  Living  Marine  Re-
source mission areas have trended away from targeted performance. 

Although the overall SAR caseload continues to slowly decline, the number of ‘‘dif-
ficult’’  cases  where  mariners  are  in  danger  continues  at  a  steady  rate.  Delays  in 
fielding  Rescue  21  is  the  major  limiting  factor  in  achieving  the  2006  SAR  perform-
ance target of 86 percent of mariners in imminent danger being saved. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

74 

Marine  Safety  performance  improvement  hinges  on  addressing  the  remaining 
risks  associated  with  recreational  and  towing  vessels  as  these  account  for  the  pre-
ponderance of current maritime accidents. Coast Guard improvements to regulatory 
regimes and partnerships have not led to as rapid a decrease in mariner, passenger, 
and  boating  deaths  and  injuries  as  models  suggested  when  the  2006  targets  were 
established.  Additionally,  the  normalization  of  recreational  vessel  injuries  into  the 
marine safety performance metric has increased the variability of reported perform-
ance. The Coast Guard has adjusted its performance targets for 2009–2013 to reflect 
this variability, and will refine performance data to improve the accuracy of mission 
performance  reports  while  continuing  to  implement  regulatory  changes  needed  to 
address the root causes of mariner, passenger, and boater deaths and injuries. 

Waterways Management/Aids to Navigation performance is likewise driven large-
ly  by  the  uninspected  towing  vessel  industry,  to  which  60  percent  of  the  collisions, 
allisions,  and  groundings  can  be  attributed.  As  with  Marine  Safety,  regulatory  re-
gime  and  partnership  improvement  initiatives  have  not  resulted  in  as  rapid  a  de-
cline in collisions, allisions, and groundings as had been anticipated when the 2006 
target  was  established.  As  a  result,  the  Coast  Guard  has  adjusted  its  performance 
targets  for  2009–2013.  The  Coast  Guard  is  currently  undergoing  an  independent 
program  evaluation  through  the  Center  for  Naval  Analyses  with  an  aim  to  improv-
ing the performance metrics of this mission. 

Living  Marine  Resource  performance  is  driven  by  excessive  violations  in  three 
major fisheries: Atlantic Sea Scallop, Northeast Groundfish, and the Gulf of Mexico/ 
Southeast  Atlantic  shrimp  fisheries.  Three-fourths  of  all  significant  violations  are 
from  these  three  fisheries.  Days  at  sea  restrictions,  complex  and  continuously 
changing  regulations,  and  poor  economic  conditions  have  continued  to  create  a 
strong  incentive  for  illegal  fishing.  Coast  Guard  boarding  efforts  are  back  to  near 
historical  levels,  and  improvements  in  fishing  vessel  monitoring  technology,  intel-
ligence, and partnerships with enforcement partners should slowly improve the com-
pliance rate from 96.6 percent to the targeted 97 percent. 

Defense  Readiness  performance  targets  were  not  achieved  primarily  due  to  Port 
Security Unit (PSU) readiness and declining High Endurance Cutter material condi-
tion.  PSU  readiness  shortfalls  were  primarily  in  the  area  of  training;  and  remedi-
ation  of  these  shortfalls  is  subject  to  reservists  being  available  to  attend  training. 
Question  3c.  Protecting  living  marine  resources  is  of  particular  importance  to  my 
home state of Hawaii. Why are we seeing a trend of decreasing resources requested 
for this mission? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  does  not  budget  by  or  allocate  funding  by  mission-pro-
gram;  however,  to  project  how  funding  will  be  distributed  across  mission-programs 
the  Coast  Guard  uses  a  tool  called  the  Mission  Cost  Model  (MCM).  The  MCM’s  de-
piction  of  how  funding  is  allocated  and  expended  across  the  Coast  Guard’s  11  mis-
sion-programs have caused concern over the past few years, particularly when mis-
sion costs appear to ‘‘go down.’’ Funding distribution using the MCM, in most cases, 
does not have a direct correlation to ‘‘doing less’’ to support one mission or another. 
For  example,  in  the  case  of  Search  and  Rescue,  each  year  we  answer  every  call  for 
assistance;  however,  severe  winter  conditions  may  cause  more  resources  to  be  used 
in  1  year  than  another.  In  addition,  extraordinary  occurrences,  such  as  a  mass  mi-
gration or a Hurricane Katrina-like event contribute to large spikes in mission exe-
cution during the year the event occurs. 

The  primary  attributes  to  keep  in  mind  when  discussing  the  MCM  in  general 

terms: 

er by Congressionally-established appropriations and PPAs. 

• The Coast Guard does not budget for, nor allocate, funding by mission, but rath-
• The  MCM  represents  a  two-year  rolling  average  of  how  funding  was  spent  by 
mission,  primarily  according  to  hours  captured  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  Abstract 
of Operations (AOPS). 
• Forcing  the  Coast  Guard  to  increase  funding  to  support  a  given  mission  will 
jeopardize  the  agency’s  multi-mission  nature  and  ability  to  respond  effectively 
to evolving threats. 

Decreasing resources requested for LMR 

As  stated  in  the  recent  GAO  report  for  OAF&CG,  despite  congressional  concern 
about  an  increased  focus  on  homeland  security  missions,  non-homeland  security 
mission performance has not suffered. In the case of domestic fisheries enforcement 
the  96.6  percent  actual  observed  compliance  rate  (only  .4  percent  short  of  the  goal 
of 97 percent) has been constant since 2004. We are also realizing efficiencies in exe-
cuting  this  mission  through  leveraging  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Ad-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

ministration’s (NOAA) National Vessel Monitoring System (NVMS), as well as intel-
ligence and interagency cooperation. 

75 

Question 3d. What do you plan to do over the next year to ensure that the Coast 
Guard’s  overall  performance  increases,  so  that  it  meets  its  target  goals  in  each  of 
its 11 mission areas? 

Answer.  The  Commandant  has  launched  a  number  of  initiatives  to  ensure  that 
the  Coast  Guard’s  overall  performance  increases  and  that  we  meet  our  annual  per-
formance  targets  in  each  mission  area.  We  have  developed  a  Coast  Guard  Strategy 
for  Maritime  Safety,  Security  and  Stewardship,  which  lays  out  the  necessary 
changes  required  to  strengthen  maritime  regimes,  achieve  domain  awareness,  and 
enhance operational capabilities. We are also reorganizing our command and control 
structure around one commander in the field responsible for Mission Execution and 
reorganizing our support systems around one commander in the field responsible for 
Mission  Support.  Our  strategic  focus  for  the  next  year  will  be  to  improve  our  oper-
ational  capability,  improve  awareness  within  the  maritime  domain,  and  improve 
maritime regimes both domestically and internationally. 

Within  each  mission  area,  program  managers  continually  assess  performance  to-
ward our long term and annual outcomes to ensure continuous improvement. Annu-
ally we develop specific targets and milestones for each of our 11 mission programs 
and  communicate  priorities  to  our  field  commanders  through  detailed  operational 
planning guidance. 

Through  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  and  other  acquisition  programs,  we  will 
continue  to  improve  operational  efficiency  and  capability  across  all  mission-pro-
grams. HH–65 helicopters, recently re-engined through the Deepwater program, will 
enhance  mission  performance  in  such  areas  as  search  and  rescue,  environmental 
protection  and  ports,  waterways  and  coastal  security.  Current  acquisition  projects 
such  as  the  Deepwater  National  Security  Cutter,  Response  Boat-Medium  and  Res-
cue  21  will  further  enhance  Coast  Guard  capabilities  to  perform  both  homeland  se-
curity  and  traditional  missions,  including  Living  Marine  Resources,  illegal  drug 
interdiction, undocumented migrant interdiction, and search and rescue. 

Question  3e.  If  the  Coast  guard  failed  to  meet  its  targets  in  6  mission  areas  last 
year, should we expect significantly improved performance this year, when a similar 
proportion of assets is devoted to these non-security missions? 

Answer. Efforts are underway to ensure performance improves in each of our mis-
sion areas. Program managers have conducted assessments of current performance, 
examined the external maritime trends, conducted analysis of the key drivers of per-
formance in mission areas, and developed new performance targets and milestones. 
Detailed  operational  planning  guidance  highlighting  the  priorities  for  FY08  will  be 
communicated  to  our  field  commanders  for  to  use  in  developing  tactical  level  plans 
for  conducting  operations.  Performance  in  each  mission  area  will  be  assessed  quar-
terly to determine progress and to identify the need for changes in tactical direction 
and/or resource allocation. 

Question 4. I see the cost of the Rescue 21 project has increased to $730.2 million 
from  original  estimates  of  $210  million  in  1999.  I  know  that  a  portion  of  the  in-
creased  cost  is  due  to  necessary  changes  because  of  9/11,  but  can  you  tell  me  what 
else  went  wrong  that  required  such  a  significant  increase  in  the  cost  of  Rescue  21? 
Answer.  Adjustments  to  the  Rescue  21  total  acquisition  cost  estimate  from  1999 
to  present  have  been  driven  by  a  combination  of  factors,  including  refinement  of 
operational  requirements,  incorporation  of  technical  analysis  performed  during  the 
Concept  and  Technology  Development  Phase  (Phase  1)  of  the  project,  and  cost  and 
schedule  variances  during  initial  Capability  Development  and  Demonstration/Pro-
duction  and  Deployment  (Phase  2)  of  the  project.  A  chronological  summary  of  ad-
justments to the Rescue 21 total acquisition cost estimate follows: 

• The  original  Rescue  21  Acquisition  Program  Baseline  (APB),  dated  April  16, 
1999  estimated  a  total  acquisition  cost  threshold  of  $250  million.  This  initial 
planning-level estimate was developed in preparation for Phase 1 of the project 
and  was  based  on  preliminary  assumptions  prior  to  development  of  the  Rescue 
21 Operational Requirements Document (ORD). 
• In  preparation  for  Phase  2  of  the  Rescue  21  project,  and  based  on  Phase  1  les-
sons  learned,  the  Coast  Guard  revised  the  Rescue  21  APB  (APB  Revision  2, 
dated March 11, 2002) total acquisition cost threshold to $580 million. This rep-
resented the first Rescue 21 acquisition cost estimate that incorporated fully re-
fined  operational  requirements,  technical  feasibility  analysis,  and  industry  life 
cycle cost estimate input. 
• During  the  Initial  Operating  Capability  (IOC)  and  Low  Rate  Initial  Production 
(LRIP)  segments  of  Phase  2,  the  Rescue  21  project  experienced  cost  overruns 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

time and at no higher cost to the American taxpayers than already required? 

Answer.  Major  actions  taken  by  the  Coast  Guard  over  the  past  year  to  control 

Rescue 21 project cost and schedule include: 

76 

and  schedule  delays  due  to  Rescue  21  Ground  Subsystem  (GSS)  infrastructure 
preparation,  construction  and  permitting  activities,  and  software  development, 
integration, and testing efforts. Additionally, the initial Vessel Subsystem (VSS) 
prototype  and  testing  efforts  experienced  significant  cost  escalation  and  sched-
ule  delays.  On  May  25,  2005  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  ap-
proved  Rescue  21  APB  Revision  3,  which  adjusted  the  estimated  total  acquisi-
tion  cost  threshold  to  $720  million  to  account  for  the  cost  and  schedule 
variances experienced during IOC and LRIP. 
• Rescue  21  APB  Revision  4,  dated  April  10,  2006,  set  the  total  acquisition 
threshold  at  $730.2  million,  which  incorporated  the  $10.2  million  in  hurricane 
supplemental funding appropriated (P.L. 109–148) to the Coast Guard to repair 
storm damaged legacy communications infrastructure along the Gulf Coast sub-
sequent to Rescue 21 APB Revision 3. 

Question  4a.  What  steps  are  you  taking  to  ensure  that  Rescue  21  is  delivered  on 

• Through APB Revision 4, the Coast Guard down-scoped the VSS asset tracking 
and  data  communications  components.  This  approach  is  more  affordable  and 
will result in a non-proprietary, Automatic Identification System (AIS)-based so-
lution  that  is  more  compatible  with  other  current  or  planned  Coast  Guard  ves-
sel tracking/data communications systems. 
• Additionally, through APB Revision 4, the Coast Guard committed to recapital-
izing the legacy system, vice full R21 installation, in the Western Rivers regions 
(Ohio  River  Valley,  Upper  Mississippi,  and  Lower  Mississippi)  to  reduce  total 
Rescue 21 program acquisition costs while meeting Coast Guard operational re-
quirements within these geographic areas. 
• Chartered  a  team  of  executive-level  Defense  Acquisition  University  specialists 
to  conduct  a  comprehensive  review  of  the  Rescue  21  project,  identify  areas  of 
concern,  and  formulate  an  execution  strategy  for  the  remainder  of  the  produc-
tion phase. 
• Implemented project management actions in response to recommendations con-
tained  in  Government  Accountability  Office  audit  GAO–06–623  (‘‘U.S.  Coast 
Guard: Improvements Needed in Management and Oversight of Rescue System 
Acquisition’’), including: 
» Conducted an Integrated Baseline Review (IBR) on the contracted deployment 
activities  for  the  first  11  FRP  regions  to  more  accurately  project  cost,  sched-
ule, and performance, enabling the Coast Guard to better identify future cost 
and schedule variances, and implement corrective actions as necessary. 

» Implemented  quarterly  executive  governance  meetings  between  the  Coast 
Guard’s  Assistant  Commandant  for  Acquisition  and  contractor’s  Executive 
Vice President to monitor project performance and risk. 

» Established  an  executive  oversight  committee,  consisting  of  senior  Coast 
Guard and DHS officials, to help monitor the project’s cost and schedule risks. 
The  committee  first  met  in  June  2006  and  continues  to  meet  on  a  quarterly 
basis. 

The Rescue 21 PM has initiated an independent government cost estimate (IGCE) 

to validate current program costs. 

Question 5. Admiral, do you think the creation of a Deployable Operations Group 
(DOG) within the Coast Guard will make it easier for resources to be allocated away 
from  non-security  missions?  What  possible  problems  do  you  see,  if  any,  in  regards 
to this reorganization? 

Answer. No. The missions of all the units consolidated under the command of the 
Deployable  Operations  Group  will  not  change.  The  focus  of  these  units  will  remain 
maritime  safety,  security  and  environmental  response.  The  Deployable  Operations 
Group  will  provide  unified  command  and  an  enhanced  ability  to  develop  adaptive 
force  packages  for  executing  more  efficient  and  effective  responses  to  a  threat  or 
event.  There  are  no  such  challenges  anticipated  with  this  internal  reorganization. 
Question 6. Admiral, I see that your budget proposes cutting positions within the 
Civil Engineering Units of the Coast Guard. As you know, some of the positions that 
would  be  cut  would  be  from  my  state.  Can  you  tell  me  what  benefit  would  actually 
be received from cutting 57 Federal positions nationwide? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard’s  Civil  Engineering  High  Performing  Organization 
(HPO)  initiative  provides  more  effective  processes  and  services.  Promulgated  from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

77 

OMB  Circular  A–76,  the  proposal  includes  a  bi-level  maintenance  system  that 
standardizes  procedures  and  provides  centrally-managed  depot-level  maintenance 
activities.  We  use  a  similar  model  for  aviation  engineering  that  minimizes  costs 
while maximizing service quality. 

Question  7.  Could  you  please  explain  how  the  Coast  Guard  plans  to  operate  and 
maintain  the  three  Coast  Guard  polar  icebreakers,  without  relying  on  funds  from 
other Federal agencies? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  operates  within  the  framework  of  the  2005  MOU  with 
NSF and has not developed any alternative plan for polar icebreaker operations and 
maintenance. 

Question 7a. Considering the age and deteriorating condition of the current polar 
icebreaker  fleet,  and  the  amount  of  time  and  money  it  will  require  recapitalizing 
these  assets,  could  you  please  explain  why  the  Coast  Guard  has  not  come  up  with 
any long-term plans on how to deal with this looming problem? 

Answer. The HEALY, commissioned in 2000, has an anticipated service life of XX 
years. The need for any new icebreaking capability in the polar regions is currently 
under review by the Coast Guard in conjunction with interagency review of the cur-
rent U.S. polar policy. 

Question  7b.  Why  did  you  not  provide  a  plan  that  would  fund  the  Coast  Guard’s 
polar  icebreakers  without  relying  on  an  agency,  such  as  the  NSF,  as  was  required 
by the Coast Guard and Maritime Transportation Act of 2006? 

Answer. In January 2007, DHS provided a report to Congress outlining the oper-
ational intentions and fiscal requirements to operate and maintain POLAR SEA and 
HEALY in Fiscal Year 2007 and the fiscal maintenance plans for Fiscal Years 2008 
and 2009. 

Question  7c.  Admiral  Allen,  is  it  true  that  the  Memorandum  of  Agreement  be-
tween  the  Coast  Guard  and  the  National  Science  Foundation  has  not  been  signed 
as of today for FY 2007? 

Answer.  The  USCG–NSF  Memorandum  of  Agreement  (MOA)  was  signed  in  Au-
gust  2005  and  serves  as  the  guiding  document  for  transfer  of  funds  from  NSF  to 
the  USCG  each  year  to  support  polar  icebreaker  personnel,  maintenance  and  oper-
ations  under  the  current  budget  authority.  For  Fiscal  Year  2007,  the  NSF  received 
supplemental  Continuing  Resolution  funding  of  $60  million  to  fund  International 
Polar  Year  initiatives  and  polar  icebreaker  costs.  To  date,  NSF  has  indicated  it 
would  provide  $48  million  through  the  third  quarter  of  Fiscal  Year  2007  but  has 
not provided a definitive funding total. 

Question  7d.  How  will  this  affect  the  operations  and  maintenance  of  the  Coast 

Guard’s polar icebreaker fleet for this year and beyond? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  and  NSF  will  work  within  the  framework  of  the  MOU 

to administer the icebreaking program plan. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

ADMIRAL THAD W. ALLEN 

Question  1.  Do  we  know  how  much  money  NSF  will  be  providing  to  the  Coast 

Guard for Polar Icebreaker operations for Fiscal Year 2008? 

Answer. No. In accordance with the Memorandum of Agreement (MOA), NSF will 
provide  the  Coast  Guard  with  a  list  of  operational  requirements  for  FY08,  and  the 
Coast  Guard  will  build  a  program  plan  to  meet  them.  We  are  currently  gathering 
requirements from NSF and plan to have the proposed program plan, and estimated 
cost, ready for NSF’s consideration by July 1st. 

Question  1a.  What  steps  is  the  Coast  Guard  currently  taking  to  plan  for  the 

longer term replacement or recapitalization of these unique assets? 

Answer.  The  need  for  any  new  icebreaking  capability  in  the  polar  regions  is  cur-
rently  under  review  by  the  Coast  Guard  in  conjunction  with  interagency  review  of 
the current U.S. polar policy. 

Question  1b.  As  you  know,  language  was  included  in  the  Fiscal  Year  2007  Con-
tinuing  Resolution  requiring  the  National  Science  Foundation  to  reimburse  the 
Coast  Guard  for  polar  icebreaker  maintenance  and  operations.  But  I  understand 
that NSF never signed an official agreement with the Coast Guard to provide these 
funds. Is this the case? 

Answer.  The  USCG–NSF  Memorandum  of  Agreement  (MOA)  was  signed  in  Au-
gust 2005. Under this MOA, NSF annually sets the tasking for the vessels, informed 
by coordination meetings hosted by NSF and attended by the USCG and other agen-
cies  with  a  need  for  icebreaking  services.  The  USCG  submits  a  program  plan  (a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

78 

budget  with  operating  and  maintenance  information,  as  well  as  supporting  docu-
mentation) to NSF that addresses the tasking. The agencies then negotiate the pro-
gram  plan,  agree  upon  a  budget  that  meets  the  plan  requirements,  and  NSF  reim-
burses USCG for agreed-upon expenses. NSF’s Congressionally-approved FY07 oper-
ating  plan  allocates  $57  million  for  polar  icebreaking.  To  date,  NSF  has  approved 
$48 million through the third quarter of FY07 in reimbursements to the USCG. The 
Coast Guard is finalizing its fourth quarter request and will submit it to NSF short-
ly. 

Question 1c. If so, How can the Coast Guard assure that NSF will reimburse the 
full  $57  million  slated  for  the  polar  icebreaker  fleet  under  this  year’s  Continuing 
Resolution? 

Answer. Coast Guard senior leadership is engaged with NSF senior leadership on 

polar icebreaker funding issues. 

Question  2.  Do  you  agree  that  the  Coast  Guard  should  provide  reporting  to  Con-
gress similar to what DOD provides? Specifically, what are your thoughts on requir-
ing  Coast  Guard  reporting  similar  to  the  DOD’s  Selected  Acquisition  Reports  and 
Unit Cost Reports, as was mentioned during the hearing? 

Answer.  Most  Coast  Guard  acquisition  projects,  with  the  exception  of  the  NSC, 
are  not  at  the  stage  or  investment  level  that  would  require  a  Selected  Acquisition 
Report  or  Unit  Cost  Report  under  DOD  standards  ($2.7B).  The  Coast  Guard  is  a 
mid-sized  Federal  acquisition  agency  and  it  would  be  unduly  burdensome  to  hold 
an agency of its size to DOD reporting standards. 

Question 3. There have been concerns raised to my staff about the safety and cost 
of the CASA Maritime Patrol Aircraft. I understand that out of the 220 CASA–CN– 
235  aircraft  operating  around  the  world  in  24  countries,  there  have  been  9  crashes 
resulting in 92 fatalities. As you promised during the hearing, could you please pro-
vide a side-by-side comparison between the CASA CN–235 and other, similar planes 
considered by the Coast Guard such as the Dash 8? 

Answer. A side-by-side comparison between the CASA CN–235 and other, similar 

planes is provided in the table below. 

Aircraft Type 

Number of Aircraft 
Loss Occurrences 

Years Since First 

Flight 

Ae´rospatiale/Aeritalia ATR–42 

Beechcraft 1900 

CASA CN–235 

De Havilland DHC–8 (Dash 8) 

Dornier Do-228 

Embraer 120 Brasilia 

Saab 340 

Shorts 360 

17 

22 

9 

19 

30 

14 

19 

11 

23 

22 

24 

24 

26 

24 

24 

26 

These  facts  can  be  checked  on  the  Aviation  Safety  Network  site  (http://aviation- 

safety.net). 

Question  3a.  I  understand  the  Inspector  General  of  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security  is  doing  an  analysis  of  whether  the  costs  of  making  these  airframes  oper-
ational are too high. Is it your opinion that continuing with the CASA is in the best 
interest of the Coast Guard and the American taxpayer? 

Answer. Yes, continuing with the CASA is in the best interest of the Coast Guard 
and the U.S. Government. The CASA CN–235 was designed and built to meet strict 
performance  specifications  in  order  to  execute  Coast  Guard  missions.  Operational 
testing for the CASA will begin in November 2007. 

Question  4.  It  is  my  understanding  that  flight  training  facilities  are  limited  for 
the  CASA  aircraft  and  located  in  Spain,  and  parts  and  qualified  service  personnel 
are  also  limited  because  of  the  relatively  small  number  of  these  aircraft  in  service. 
What  are  the  additional  operating  costs  that  will  be  incurred  with  the  CASA  be-
cause of this limitation on training, parts, and qualified service personnel? 

Answer.  The  CASA  procurement  contract  includes  training  for  Coast  Guard  per-
sonnel.  Currently,  6  Coast  Guard  pilots  have  been  trained  in  Spain  at  the  facility 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

79 

of the Original Equipment Manufacture (OEM). Maintenance and loadmaster train-
ing have also been provided to enlisted personnel. The OEM will provide instructor 
pilot  training  at  a  future  date  so  that  pilot  training  can  be  conducted  at  Aviation 
Training Center (ATC) Mobile, AL. ATC Mobile is also developing course curriculum 
for mechanic maintainer and loadmaster training for the enlisted personnel. 

To  date,  approximately  $15M  has  been  allocated  for  aircraft  spare  parts  and 

$2.5M for Mission System Pallet spare parts. 

Question  4a.  Will  pilots  have  to  be  trained  in  Spain  and  will  the  aircraft  have  to 
be serviced in Spain as well? If not, has the Coast Guard invested additional funds 
in  the  CASA  program  to  develop  training  and  service  capabilities  in  the  United 
States? 

Answer.  Aircraft  Repair  &  Supply  Center  (AR&SC)  Elizabeth  City,  NC  is  cur-
rently  working  to  establish  contracts  with  CASA  and  Lockheed  Martin  Eagan  for 
field service representative access until the Coast Guard program is self sustaining. 
The current procurement contract has provisions for training two pilots for each air-
craft  procured  and  additional  maintenance  and  loadmaster  training  for  enlisted 
crew members. Pilot training, maintenance training and loadmaster training will be 
provided at ATC Mobile, AL on future procurements. 

The aircraft will not have to be serviced in Spain. They are currently being serv-

iced at AR&SC Elizabeth City, NC. 

Question  4b.  Were  these  kinds  of  extra  costs  factored  into  the  original  estimated 

costs of the CASA when it was compared to (and chosen over) other aircraft? 

Answer.  We  do  not  see  additional  costs  related  to  the  CASA  procurement  that 
would be significantly different than those incurred with other aircraft. Any aircraft 
procured would require spare parts, pilot training, instructor pilot training, mainte-
nance training, loadmaster training, course curriculum and other training and infra-
structure. 

Question  5.  As  you  know,  the  original  Deepwater  contract  called  for  a  composite 
FRC.  We  were  told  that  the  reasons  for  going  with  composites,  rather  than  steel, 
were  that  composites  have  lower  maintenance  and  life-cycle  costs,  a  longer  service 
life,  and  are  lighter  weight.  Admiral,  I’m  wondering  what  changed  in  this  analysis 
to justify moving away from composites to steel? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  identified  high  technical  risks  with  the  Integrated 
Coast  Guard  Systems’  (ICGS)  proposed  composite  design  leading  to  suspension  of 
the  composite  Fast  Response  Cutter  (FRC)  design  efforts  in  February  2006.  These 
risks  were  validated  by  an  independent  third  party  design  review  conducted  by 
Alion—John  J.  McMullen  &  Associates  (JJMA)  that  was  completed  in  April  2006, 
and  by  a  panel  of  independent  composite  technology  experts  from  the  U.S.  Navy, 
private  industry,  academia,  and  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  who  participated  in  a  Tech-
nology Readiness Assessment in December 2006. These technical risks would impact 
manufacture  of  the  composite  hull  and  had  the  potential  to  impact  cost  and  sched-
ule. 

An  FRC–A  Class  Business  Case  Analysis  (BCA),  which  included  a  Technology 
Readiness  Assessment  (TRA),  was  also  conducted.  The  FRC–A  BCA,  completed  by 
Designers  and  Planners,  Inc.  (D&P),  an  independent  third  party,  was  reviewed  by 
ICGS and comments were received in March 2007. The Coast Guard in concert with 
D&P  reviewed  the  ICGS  comments  and  determined  they  do  not  materially  change 
the results of the BCA. The BCA and TRA results indicated there is no clear benefit 
to  pursuing  a  composite-hulled  patrol  boat.  The  TRA  indicated  a  score  between  4 
and  5  for  the  composite  FRC–A,  while  a  score  of  7  or  higher  is  preferred  to  keep 
technical risk acceptable. The BCA indicated the ‘‘break-even’’ point of TOC for steel 
versus  composite  patrol  boat  hulls  occurs  whenever  the  composite  can  be  shown  to 
last 15–17 years longer than the steel. The Coast Guard believes that the life span 
gap between composite and steel hulls would be less. 

Question  6.  You  recently  announced  that  the  Coast  Guard  will  be  taking  on  full 
responsibility  as  the  lead  systems  integrator  for  Deepwater,  rather  than  using 
ICGS. But you also stated that ‘‘ICGS will have an enduring role’’. Could you please 
explain  specifically  how  the  relationship  with  ICGS  is  changing,  and  specifically 
what  role  you  envision  ICGS  playing  in  the  future?  Also,  will  ICGS  continue  in  its 
current  role  for  all  8  National  Security  Cutters  and  all  36  CASA  aircraft?  As  the 
Coast Guard takes on these new responsibilities as lead systems integrator, will you 
require additional funds, and how will this be reflected in the Coast Guard’s budget 
requests? 

Answer.  As  the  Deepwater  program  has  matured,  the  Coast  Guard  has  assumed 
a  greater  role  both  in  management  and  oversight  to  the  point  that  the  next  logical 
and prudent step is to assume the lead role as the systems integrator. This change 
will involve transition over a period of time as the Coast Guard acquires additional 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

80 

expertise. Specifically, the Coast Guard has taken over responsibility and control in 
the following areas: 

tives 

mix of Deepwater Program assets 

• Development of the System Concept of Operations or Asset Statements of Objec-
• Responsibility for Technical Authority 
• Development  of  Business  Case  Analysis  decisions  to  validate  the  selection  and 
• Leadership of Integrated Product Teams 
• Management of the Risk Management Plan 
• Greater  oversight  of  ICGS’s  application  of  accepted  System  Engineering  prin-
• Greater oversight and control of Integrated Logistics Support 
In  terms  of  what  is  different  contractually,  the  work  performed  by  the  systems 
integrator  was  accomplished  under  the  System  Engineering  and  Program  Manage-
ment  Delivery  Task  Orders  (DTOs).  Future  DTOs  will  be  modified  to  de-scope  or 
reduce those tasks accomplished by the systems integrator since it will now be done 
increasingly by the Coast Guard. 

ciples and practices at the Deepwater System design level 

ICGS  has  the  potential  to  continue  to  provide  the  goods  and  services  already 
under  contract,  such  as  the  MPA  and  the  NSC;  however,  the  Coast  Guard  remains 
open  to  recompeting  these  assets  if  it  is  in  the  best  interest  of  the  government  to 
do  so.  ICGS  may  also  participate  in  future  work;  however,  all  future  assets  will  be 
competitively awarded. 

It will most likely be necessary to shift additional funding to government program 
management  as  the  Coast  Guard  assumes  more  system  integration  and  oversight 
responsibilities. 

Question  7.  Do  you  currently  have  the  authority  and  funding  that  you  need  to 

fully staff your Deepwater acquisition team? 

Answer. The Coast Guard is in a transition period as it assumes greater oversight 
and assumes additional system integration responsibilities. We have adequate fund-
ing for FY07 and we have requested additional funding in FY08 as part of the Presi-
dent’s Budget Request. 

Question 8. Recent reports have indicated that the Coast Guard’s Deepwater pro-
gram is experiencing a massive cash backlog, carrying over $700 million in unspent 
funds. It seems that we, the Congress, are funding the program at a rate faster than 
you can spend it. Please explain why such vast amounts of taxpayer dollars sit idle 
and remain unspent. 

Answer. The Deepwater Program is administrating an aggressive but prudent ob-
ligation  plan  that  will  address  some  of  the  outstanding  unspent  or  unobligated 
funds. Based on this plan, the Coast Guard expects to carryover approximately $350 
million  into  FY2008.  The  table  below  outlines  our  obligation  plan.  Unobligated 
funds are primarily for 3 assets: 

• FRC B-Class (Replacement Patrol Boat) which will be awarded in FY 2008; 
• VUAV which will not be restarting until 2012 or later; and 
• FRC A-Class which will not be restarting until 2012 or later. 

Deepwater Financial Status Prepared 9 May 2007 

[FY 2007 Carryover into FY 2008] 

3 May 2007 
Unobligated 

Balance 

Obligations 

Planned 

Between 3 May 2007 

and 

31 July 2007 

Total Projected 

Balance as 
Obligations 

Completed through 

31 July 2007 

Total Projected 

Balance on 

30 Sept. 2007 
(Carryover into 

FY08) 

Armed Helicopter Equipment 

$41,997,062 

$39,257,062 

$1,236,276,826 

$2,740,000 

C–130H Conversion/ 

Sustainment 

$56,611,596 

$46,328,596 

$1,189,948,230 

$10,283,000 

C–130J Fleet Introduction 

$4,845,000 

$4,845,000 

$1,185,103,230 

Covert Surveillance Aircraft 

$263,386 

$263,386 

$1,184,839,844 

$0 

$0 

HH–60 Conversion Projects 

$46,624,602 

$34,713,602 

$1,150,126,242 

$11,911,000 

HH–65 Conversion/ 

Sustainment 

$20,412,346 

$0 

$1,150,126,242 

$20,112,316 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

81 

Deepwater Financial Status Prepared 9 May 2007—Continued 

[FY 2007 Carryover into FY 2008] 

Maritime Patrol Aircraft (MPA) 

Unmanned Aerial Vehicle 

C4ISR 

Logistics 

Government Program 

Management 

Fast Response Cutter (FRC)— 

A Class 

Fast Response Cutter (FRC)— 
B Class/Replacement Patrol 
Boat 

FY 2006 Congressional 

Reprogramming (123 WPB 
Close, OPC, NSC)* 

IDS Small Boats 

Medium Endurance Cutter 

Sustainment 

3 May 2007 
Unobligated 

Balance 

$37,915,023 

$38,608,977 

$41,139,992 

$16,152,346 

Obligations 

Planned 

Between 3 May 2007 

and 

31 July 2007 

Total Projected 

Balance as 
Obligations 

Completed through 

31 July 2007 

Total Projected 

Balance on 

30 Sept. 2007 
(Carryover into 

FY08) 

$37,915,023 

$1,112,211,219 

$0 

$3,608,977 

$1,108,602,242 

$35,000,000 

$41,139,992 

$1,067,462,250 

$16,152,346 

$1,051,309,904 

$0 

$0 

$0 

$32,144,850 

$32,114,850 

$1,019,195,054 

$41,580,181 

$0 

$1,019,195,054 

$41,580,181 

$116,160,369 

$0 

$1,019,195,054 

$116,160,369 

$8,247,000 

$1,804,137 

$0 

$0 

$1,019,195,054 

$1,019,195,054 

$8,247,000 

$1,804,137 

$9,751,620 

$8,460,620 

$1,010,734,434 

$1,291,000 

National Security Cutter (NSC) 

$643,587,106 

$643,587,106 

$367,147,328 

$0 

Offshore Patrol Cutter (OPC) 

$105,142,331 

$6,355,331 

$360,791,997 

$98,787,000 

Surface Ships Other 

System Engineering and 

Integration 

$0 

$0 

$360,791,997 

$12,875,994 

$12,875,994 

$347,916,003 

$0 

$0 

Total 

$347,916,003 
*Note:  This  reprogramming  is  not  a  stand  alone  CIP  line  item.  It  is  accounted  for  in  previous  CIP  summaries  and  unobligated 

$1,275,533,888 

$927,617,885 

balance  questions  in  the  ‘‘110′  Patrol  Boat  SLEP/Fast  Response  Cutter—B  Class’’  category. 

It  is  important  to  have  funds  available  and  ready  to  obligate.  Such  availability 
helps to garner more bids and greater competition, as could be important in the up-
coming FRC B-class (replacement patrol boat) and other projects. 

Question 9. Will industry continue to self-certify any design or performance speci-

fications for NSCs 1 and 2? 

Answer.  The  Deepwater  contract  with  Integrated  Coast  Guard  Systems,  LLP 
(ICGS)  currently  uses  tailored  Cutter  Specific  Certification  Matrices  (CSCM)  to  de-
fine the standards that are to be used for the design and construction of each class 
of surface assets. This set of standards was proposed by ICGS for each surface asset 
based on a generic set compiled by the Coast Guard and American Bureau of Ship-
ping  (ABS).  Under  the  terms  of  the  Cutter  Certification  Program,  ICGS  must  use 
ABS  to  certify  compliance  with  all  ABS  standards  (e.g.,  rules,  guidelines)  cited  in 
the  CSCM.  On  the  National  Security  Cutter  (NSC),  fewer  than  100  of  the  almost 
1,000  standards  of  the  CSCM  involve  ABS;  Federal  agencies  are  the  certification 
agent  for  six  standards.  The  contract  permits  ICGS  to  certify  the  remainder  of  the 
CSCM, and ICGS has chosen that option. 

Though the contractor ‘‘certifies’’ a line item in the CSCM, the government retains 
the  means  to  protect  its  interest.  First,  the  Coast  Guard  can  challenge  the  certifi-
cation,  which  is  exactly  what  the  Coast  Guard  did  in  the  Integrated  Product  Team 
process.  Second,  the  contractor  is  required  to  meet  the  terms  of  the  contract;  Coast 
Guard  members  and  representatives  from  ABS,  the  Navy,  and  qualified  support 
contractors conduct random inspections/tests as well as scheduled inspection/tests to 
ensure this. 

The  Coast  Guard  intends  to  expand  the  role  of  ABS  in  the  Deepwater  Program 
to  increase  the  assurance  that  Deepwater  surface  assets  are  properly  designed  and 
constructed to an integrated and comprehensive set of standards. 

The Coast Guard is also looking to ABS to strengthen the cutter certification pro-
gram  and  to  augment  Coast  Guard  resources  for  design  review  and  construction 
oversight.  ABS  is  recognized  in  statute  as  the  classification  agent  for  U.S.  Govern-
ment ship owners. 46 U.S.C. 3316(a) states in part that ‘‘Each department, agency, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

82 

and  instrumentality  of  the  U.S.  Government  shall  recognize  the  American  Bureau 
of Shipping as its agent in classifying vessels owned by the Government and in mat-
ters  related  to  classification.’’  ABS  has  been  participating  in  the  design  of  the  NSC 
and  the  Fast  Response  Cutter  (FRC).  They  are  a  sound  choice  for  supporting  the 
Deepwater Program. 

The  Coast  Guard  and  ABS  are  actively  engaged  in  defining  revised  certification 
and/or  classification  plans  for  the  NSC,  Offshore  Patrol  Cutter  (OPC)  and  FRC. 
Even  with  an  expanded  role  for  ABS,  there  are  systems  and  equipment,  (mostly  in 
the area of C4ISR and combat systems), where ABS does not have the required ex-
pertise.  For  these,  the  Coast  Guard  will  continue  to  practice  its  overall  program  of 
quality  management,  consisting  of  onsite  Coast  Guard  personnel  or  representatives 
conducting random inspections, in addition to the use of independent tests and eval-
uations. 

Question  10.  What  Deepwater  assets  is  the  Coast  Guard  planning  on  putting 
under  contract  in  the  next  6  months?  In  the  Coast  Guard  budget  hearing,  Admiral 
Allen, you stated to me that for all contracts moving forward the Coast Guard would 
take  on  the  responsibilities  of  the  lead  systems  integrator,  implement  the  Coast 
Guard’s  Systems  Acquisition  Manual,  end  self-certification,  conduct  independent 
business  case  analysis,  expand  the  role  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  engineering  and  logis-
tics  center,  and  improve  reporting  to  Congress.  How  exactly  will  you  ensure  that 
you meet these standards for all future contracts moving forward? How will this im-
pact your management of the NSC and MPA program? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  plans  to  award  contract  modifications  for  NSC  #1,  #2, 
and  award  NSC  #3.  The  Coast  Guard  also  plans  to  put  contracts  in  place  for 
sustainment and conversion of legacy assets to include the HH–60J, HC–130H, Me-
dium  Endurance  Cutters  (for  270′  and  210′)  Mission  Effectiveness  Project  (MEP), 
and 110′ Patrol Boats MEP. Even though these are not for assets, contracts for Pro-
gram  Management,  Systems  Engineering/Integration,  C4ISR  and  Logistics  are  also 
planned for award. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  significantly  increased  contract  oversight  and  lead  systems 
integrator responsibilities. Specifically, the Coast Guard has made improvements in 
the following areas: 

tives 

mix of Deepwater Program assets 

• Development of the System Concept of Operations or Asset Statements of Objec-
• Definitive Role of Technical Authority 
• Development  of  Business  Case  Analysis  decisions  to  validate  the  selection  and 
• Leadership of Integrated Product Teams 
• Active management of the Risk Plan 
• Greater  oversight  of  ICGS’s  application  of  accepted  System  Engineering  prin-
• Greater oversight and control of Integrated Logistics Support 
To  implement  these  activities  and  assume  this  workload,  the  consolidation  of  the 
Deepwater  and  Acquisition  offices  will  leverage  the  combined  expertise  of  con-
tracting  and  program  management  personnel.  Together  with  the  deployment  of  the 
‘‘Blueprint  for  Acquisition  Reform’’,  we  expect  improvements  in  program  manage-
ment, contract execution, and obligation of appropriated funds. 

ciples and practices at the Deepwater System design level 

Both  the  NSC  and  MPA  projects  will  benefit  from  increased  direct  government 
oversight  and  management,  CG  technical  expertise,  and  use  of  Coast  Guard  prac-
tices in total logistics support. 

Question  11.  Coast  Guard  personnel  and  resources  have  increased  significantly 
since  9/11.  This  has  resulted  in  increased  maritime  domain  awareness,  increased 
presence  in  patrols,  increased  targeting  and  inspection  of  facilities  and  vessels—an 
overall  increase  in  field  presence.  The  multiple  mission  aspect  of  the  Coast  Guard 
has been a tremendous benefit to our citizens. Can you detail specific steps and ac-
tions that are you taking to leverage this multiple mission tradition, to ensure per-
sonnel are cross-trained and to ensure the focus and increased budget for homeland 
and port security missions is also improving Coast Guard performance in traditional 
missions  such  as  marine  safety,  environmental  protection,  search  and  rescue  and 
law enforcement? 

Answer.  Following  the  tragic  events  of  September  2001,  and  to  fulfill  an  oper-
ations strategy from the Coast Guard’s 1999 Strategic Plan, the Coast Guard shifted 
from  a  program-focused  approach  to  policy  development,  mission  planning  and  exe-
cution  to  an  integrated  cross-programmatic  approach.  The  traditional  program-fo-
cused  approach  led  to  single-mission  thinking  and  single-mission  focus.  The  events 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

83 

of  September  11,  2001  reinforced  the  importance  of  a  unified  command  construct 
that increased interactions between operational commands and interagency partners 
to improve performance across a full range of mission activities and systems. 

In  2004,  the  Coast  Guard  reorganized  operational  field  commands  across  the 
United  States  to  form  Sector  Commands.  The  creation  of  Sectors  transformed  a  di-
verse array of field structures into a standard organizational architecture, consisting 
of  Prevention,  Response  and  Logistics  components.  The  military,  maritime,  multi- 
mission  character  of  the  Coast  Guard  is  reinforced  and  strengthened  by  the  Sector 
structure.  Relationships  between  the  Sector’s  Prevention  and  Response  components 
have  improved  the  Coast  Guard’s  effectiveness  and  efficiency  across  all  mission 
areas.  Coast  Guard  Sectors  provide  a  unified  command  and  control  structure  re-
sponsible for assessing risks across all mission areas, developing priorities, training 
forces  to  conduct  operations  in  homeland  security  and  non-homeland  security  mis-
sion  areas,  and  allocating  resources  to  activities  in  support  of  all  Coast  Guard  mis-
sion areas. This current organization has proven to be an ideal alignment for coordi-
nating our many missions. 

At the beginning of each fiscal year, the Coast Guard issues Operational Planning 
Guidance  to  field  units  to  communicate  priorities  and  performance  targets  in  each 
mission  area.  This  guidance  also  includes  information  to  assist  Area  Commanders 
in making resource apportionment and allocation decisions in support of annual per-
formance targets across all missions. 

In  June  2005,  the  Commandant  issued  ten  Commandant  Intent  Action  Orders 
aimed at improving and sustaining mission execution across all mission areas. Each 
of the Action Orders represent a change to the way we do business to better prepare 
the Coast Guard for challenges in the future within an ‘‘all threats, all hazards’’ en-
vironment.  The  single  most  visible  adjustment  will  be  to  the  Coast  Guard’s  com-
mand and control structure. We will focus our entire organization on improving and 
sustaining Mission Execution. We will do this by structuring our service as a three- 
pronged  force:  shore-based  operations,  maritime  operations,  and  deployable  oper-
ations.  We  have  taken  bold  steps  forward  by  creating  Sectors  for  shore-based  oper-
ations.  And  we  have  created  truly  deployable  forces.  The  Coast  Guard  is  taking  a 
significant  step  toward  improving  the  Nation’s  ‘‘all  hazards  . . .  all  threats’’  re-
sponse  capability  by  establishing  the  Deployable  Operations  Group  (DOG).  Across 
all  of  our  forces,  we  will  partner  with  other  services  and  agencies  to  integrate  our 
efforts. 

We have taken similar steps by advancing the Deepwater acquisition for maritime 
presence, patrol, and response. Through the Coast Guard’s Deepwater and other ac-
quisition programs, we have and will continue to improve operational efficiency and 
capabilities  across  all  mission  areas.  HH–65  helicopters,  re-engined  through  the 
Coast Guard’s Deepwater program, have not only enhanced homeland security mis-
sions,  but  have  improved  the  Coast  Guard’s  capabilities  to  perform  non-Homeland 
Security missions such as search and rescue and environmental protection. Current 
acquisition projects such as the Deepwater National Security Cutter, Response Boat- 
Medium  and  Rescue  21  will  further  enhance  not  only  Homeland  Security  missions, 
but also the Coast Guard’s capabilities to perform its traditional missions including 
Living  Marine  Resources,  Illegal  Drug  Interdiction,  Undocumented  Migrant  Inter-
diction and Search and Rescue. 

Question  12.  The  Oil  Pollution  Act  of  1990  has  led  to  significant  reduction  in  oil 
spills  throughout  the  country.  There  are  still  provisions,  however,  that  need  to  be 
implemented—specifically provisions calling for Marine Firefighting and Salvage ca-
pabilities.  I  understand  these  are  complex  issues  but  the  implementation  of  these 
rules  has  been  delayed  several  times  and  now  here  we  are  in  2007  with  another 
announced  delay.  These  rules  are  not  only  important  to  my  home  state  of  Wash-
ington  where  the  entrance  from  sea  is  a  long  distance  from  our  major  ports  but  in 
many  other  areas  throughout  the  Nation.  Can  you  summarize  in  detail  what  the 
main issues are that are holding up implementation? What is being done to resolve 
these issues? When do you expect to enact these important rules? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  implemented  salvage  and  marine  firefighting  regula-
tions for all tank vessels carrying oil as cargo with the publication of the Final Rule 
for Vessel Response Plans in 1996. These regulations were mandated by the Oil Pol-
lution  Act  of  1990.  After  implementing  the  vessel  response  plan  regulations,  it  was 
determined that a more robust and detailed regulation was needed to determine the 
specific  equipment  and  response  times  for  required  salvage  and  marine  firefighting 
resources.  During  the  Coast  Guard’s  push  to  implement  the  Maritime  Transpor-
tation  Security  Act  of  2002,  we  put  the  majority  of  our  other  rulemaking  projects 
on  hold,  including  the  new  and  improved  regulations  for  salvage  and  marine  fire-
fighting. An unintended result of this delay, however, was that the underlying anal-
yses  that  were  relied  upon  in  the  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (environmental 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

84 

and  economic)  became  stale.  We  completed  the  public  comment  period  for  the  up-
dated  environmental  analysis  in  January  of  2006,  and  we  are  working  diligently  to 
finalize the rule. 

Question  13.  I  am  hearing  from  Merchant  Mariners  in  my  state  and  all  over  the 
country about the excessive time it takes to apply for and receive a Merchant Mar-
iner  document.  For  some  in  the  Gulf  region  and  in  the  inland  waterways  systems, 
it  is  taking  anywhere  from  six  to  8  weeks  if  not  longer.  Additionally,  when  TWIC 
is finally implemented, there is concern that wait times will only be further exacer-
bated. What steps is the Coast Guard taking to reduce this backlog of applications, 
their process time and the transparency of the application process? 

Answer. The Coast Guard Mariner Licensing and Documentation (MLD) program 
is diligently working to meet the increased demanded for Merchant Marine Creden-
tials (MMC’s) by: 

• The need to meet growing international credentialing requirements; 
• More rigorous evaluations to meet post-9/11 security concerns; 
• The  NTSB  recommendation,  from  Staten  Island  Ferry  allision,  for  more  strin-

gent medical fitness evaluations; and 

The  restructuring  and  centralization  plan  currently  being  implemented  will  in-
crease efficiencies and decrease response time. The end-state will be a more nimble 
program  that  provides  better  customer  service  and  is  poised  to  meet  emerging 
credentialing challenges. 

In an effort to reduce the backlog and decrease processing time, the following re-
cent enhancements to data collection procedures will help the Coast Guard to better 
compile,  process,  and  track  application  material  for  more  responsive  credentialing 
issuance, and will make the process more transparent to the customer: 

• Electronic fingerprinting; 
• Upgrades to our internal database; 
• Online user fee submission via www.pay.gov; 
• Online ability to view status of application; and 
• Information exchange and assistance available to customers via 1–888 Mariner 

Information Help Desk. 
Future initiatives include: 
• Developing a combined Credential (MMC); 
• Upgrading examination administration and grading; and 
• Implementing additional upgrades to our internal database. 
The  Coast  Guard  does  not  anticipate  an  increase  in  processing  time  of  MMCs 
when  TWIC  is  implemented.  We  are  working  with  TSA  to  establish  a  process  to 
share  security  check  information.  When  TWIC  is  implemented,  applicants  will  be 
able  to  provide  fingerprints,  citizenship,  and  identity  information  at  any  of  131 
TWIC enrollment centers nationwide and appearing in person at one of the 20 Coast 
Guard  Regional  Exam  Centers  (REC)  or  Monitoring  Units.  This  will  enhance  cus-
tomer service and program efficiency. 

Question  14.  There  are  over  5.7  million  residents  of  America’s  domestic  offshore 
communities  who  depend  on  waterborne  commerce  for  essential  supplies  of  energy 
and for virtually everything they eat, wear, and use. A security incident that closed 
our ports could devastate those communities. Can you tell me what steps the Coast 
Guard  is  taking  to  assure  that  the  highest  priority  is  assigned  to  restoring  these 
services in the event of a catastrophe? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  together  with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security 
(DHS)  Customs  and  Border  Protection  and  other  interagency  partners  are  devel-
oping national protocols for recovery and the resumption of trade following a signifi-
cant disruption to the Maritime Transportation System (MTS). These protocols pro-
vide for improved interagency coordination and enhanced collaboration with the pri-
vate sector to facilitate rapid recovery. Guidance for Coast Guard field units is also 
being  prepared  that  will  provide  local  Commanders  with  considerations  for 
prioritizing vessel and cargo movements upon reopening waterways. These consider-
ations include the need for fuels, foodstuffs and other locally important commodities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

85 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

ADMIRAL THAD W. ALLEN 

Question  1.  Last  year,  Congress  rejected  the  Coast  Guard’s  request  to  shut  down 
the LORAN system and directed the Departments of Homeland Security and Trans-
portation to develop a national LORAN policy. I understand that officials from those 
agencies  as  well  as  others  met  recently  as  part  of  a  committee  called  the  National 
Space-Based  Positioning,  Navigation  and  Timing  (PNT)  Executive  Committee  and 
have  reached  a  consensus  that  the  United  States  should  maintain  the  LORAN  sys-
tem. Why did the Coast Guard again request the termination of the LORAN system 
as  part  of  its  FY08  budget  at  the  same  time  this  committee  was  in  the  process  of 
determining what the policy should be? 

Answer. The submission of the Fiscal Year 2008 President’s Budget pre-dated the 
March 28, 2007 convening of the National Space-Based Positioning, Navigation and 
Timing  (PNT)  Executive  Committee.  Therefore,  the  Coast  Guard  continued  to  rec-
ommend termination pending a final decision on LORAN’s future. 

Question  1a.  Did  you  alert  leadership  in  DHS  and  DOT  of  your  request?  Is  there 
a  disconnect  between  the  Coast  Guard  and  the  policy  departments  within  those 
agencies? 

Answer.  There  is  no  disconnect  among  agencies.  All  appropriate  leadership  and 
policy departments within the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) and the De-
partment  of  Transportation  (DOT)  have  been  fully  involved  with  the  Coast  Guard 
in the process of developing the Administration’s position on LORAN. 

Question  1b.  Can  you  provide  a  copy  of  the  Committee  report,  along  with  any 
briefing materials that were used to inform DOT/DHS and other affected agency of-
ficials about the team’s work? 

Answer. The minutes of the March 28, 2007 National Space-Based PNT Executive 
Committee are controlled by the National PNT Coordination Office The Coast Guard 
does  not  have  authority  to  release  this  document  or  any  of  the  briefing  materials 
used during deliberations. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

ADMIRAL THAD W. ALLEN 

Question  1.  How  does  the  Coast  Guard  intend  to  meet  the  mandate  of  the  2006 
SAFE  Port  Act  to  create  Interagency  Operations  Command  Centers  at  all  high  pri-
ority ports within 3 years of the date of enactment if you don’t request any funding 
for this in the 2008 budget? 

Answer.  Leveraging  prototype  Interagency  Operations  Command  Centers  in 
Charleston,  SC;  San  Diego,  CA;  and  Hampton  Roads,  VA,  the  Coast  Guard  devel-
oped  an  acquisition  project  called  Command  21.  Command  21  is  a  five-year  project 
that  will  meet  the  SAFE  Port  Act  requirements  for  interagency  operations  centers 
in  24  high-priority  Coast  Guard  Sectors.  The  Coast  Guard  is  currently  refining 
project  requirements  and  milestones;  construction  should  begin  in  2009  as  outlined 
in the Fiscal Year 2008 President’s Request Capital Investment Plan (CIP). 

Question  2.  What  are  your  plans  for  the  Port  of  New  York  and  New  Jersey,  the 
largest port on the East Coast, with some 40–50 public agencies coordinating in the 
region? 

Answer.  The  Port  of  New  York  and  New  Jersey  is  included  in  the  Command  21 
acquisition proposal for Coast Guard Sector New York. Command 21 is designed to 
field: 

1. A surveillance network of radars and cameras covering critical areas; 
2.  An  information  system  for  situational  awareness  and  collaboration  (concep-
tually called WatchKeeper); and 
3. Command center facility upgrades to host port partners. 

Question  3.  Has  the  Coast  Guard  made  available  its  Maritime  Security  Risk  As-
sessment Model to ports, so they can evaluate project risk scores on a level playing 
field? If not, when will it be made available? If so, has anybody used it? 

Answer.  MSRAM  is  used  by  the  Coast  Guard  Sector  Commander/Captain  of  the 
Port  (COTP)  and  the  Port  Security  Specialist  with  the  maritime  stakeholders 
through  the  Area  Maritime  Security  Committees  (AMSCs).  If  a  maritime  stake-
holder requests a risk analysis of their facility, the AMSC facilitates the request and 
Coast  Guard  Port  Security  Specialists  provide  the  analysis  using  the  MSRAM  tool. 
The  Coast  Guard  conducted  outreach  meetings  at  each  AMSC  in  early  2007.  These 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

86 

meetings provided briefs on MSRAM the FY 2007 Port Security Grant Program and 
port risk management. 

Coast  Guard  COTP  use  MSRAM  to  evaluate  port  security  grant  applications  to 
determine  their  potential  risk  reduction.  With  the  2007  round  of  grants  announced 
in  May,  the  Sector  Commanders  will  engage  grant  applicants  and  provide  feedback 
on how individual projects were scored. 

Question  4.  What  is  the  status  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  establishment  of  the  Dela-
ware  River  and  Bay  Oil  Spill  Advisory  Committee?  When  will  that  Committee  be 
formally established? 

Answer.  The  charter  to  establish  the  Delaware  River  and  Bay  Oil  Spill  Advisory 
Committee  is  under  review  at  Coast  Guard  Headquarters.  The  review  is  expected 
to be complete by the end of June 2007. After charter establishment, solicitation for 
committee  members  will  be  promulgated  via  the  Federal  Register,  which  is  esti-
mated to occur in June 2007. When solicitation is complete, committee members will 
be nominated and the Committee formally established. 

Question  5.  I  understand  the  Coast  Guard  has  made  certain  approvals  for  a  new 
liquid  natural  gas  facility  in  Logan  Township,  New  Jersey,  so  long  as  certain  secu-
rity  measures  are  taken,  including  armed  U.S.  Coast  Guard  escorts.  Is  there  fund-
ing in the proposed budget to manage the security escorts for this and other planned 
LNG  facilities?  If  not,  who  will  pay  for  these  operations,  and  how?  Is  the  Coast 
Guard meeting its current escort requirement for existing LNG facilities? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  has  not  issued  an  approval  for  the  LNG  terminal  pro-
posed for Logan Township, NJ. Coast Guard ‘‘approval’’ comes in the form of a Let-
ter  of  Recommendation  (LOR)  attesting  to  the  suitability  of  the  waterway  for  LNG 
vessel traffic. In December 2005, the local Coast Guard Captain of the Port (COTP) 
provided the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) with a Waterway Suit-
ability  Report  (WSR)  that  made  a  preliminary  determination  that  the  Delaware 
River was suitable for LNG vessel traffic provided certain security measures, includ-
ing armed USCG vessel escorts, are in place. 

In  June  2006,  FERC  approved  the  construction  of  the  proposed  Logan  Township, 
NJ, LNG facility, with certain conditions to be satisfied prior to the commencement 
of  facility  construction  and/or  operation.  These  conditions  include  issuance  of  the 
LOR from the COTP, and resolution of certain jurisdictional issues related to a 1905 
Interstate Compact between New Jersey and Delaware in a region of the Delaware 
River belonging to the State of Delaware. 

The LOR, and an accompanying LNG vessel transit management plan (TMP) that 
precisely establishes the amount of CG and other government agency resources nec-
essary to responsibly manage the safety and security risks of LNG vessel operations, 
is  not  expected  to  be  issued  until  the  interstate  jurisdictional  questions  are  ulti-
mately resolved by the Supreme Court. Pending completion of the TMP, it is unclear 
what  the  ultimate  costs  of  CG  security  resources  will  be  for  the  Logan  Township 
LNG facility. 

As  background  in  April  2007,  a  Special  Master  appointed  by  the  Supreme  Court 
to examine the jurisdictional issues determined that the state of Delaware has juris-
diction  over  the  proposed  LNG  vessel  pier.  Delaware  has  stated  that  construction 
of  the  LNG  pier  is  inconsistent  with  its  federally  approved  Coastal  Zone  Manage-
ment Plan, and will not issue the necessary permits for pier construction. New Jer-
sey  has  indicated  it  will  appeal  the  Special  Master’s  determination  to  the  Supreme 
Court. 

The  Coast  Guard  strives  to  meet  its  current  escort  requirements  for  all  Certain 
Dangerous Cargoes (of which LNG is one). Coast Guard Captains of the Port weigh 
these responsibilities, together with statutory responsibilities for other legislatively- 
mandated missions, to optimally balance resource allocation with risk mitigation. 

Question 6. Can you highlight some aspects of the Deepwater program which have 

been successful so far? 

Answer. Examples of the Integrated Deepwater System Acquisition include: 
Legacy C4ISR upgrades 
• Four shore-side command centers upgraded; significantly enhancing operational 

effectiveness and Maritime Domain Awareness. 

• Initial  upgrades  of  secure  Internet,  commercial  satellite  communications,  and 
automatic vessel identification equipment have been completed on all 39 legacy 
cutters (378′ HECs, 270′ and 210′ MECs). 

• Successfully  demonstrated  core  capabilities  Increment  1  at  the  Maritime  Do-

main Awareness Center. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

87 

• Two Communications Area Master Stations delivered and Sector San Juan and 
District  7  command  centers  completed  upgrades  that  are  being  certified  for  de-
livery. 

HH–65 Helicopter Re-Engining 
• 84 re-engined operational HH–65Cs delivered (as of May 2007). 
• All HH–65 equipped units are now operating the HH–65C. 
Medium-Range Surveillance Aircraft (CASA CN–235) 
• The first eight CASA CN–235s have been placed on contract along with the first 
three  mission  pallets.  (Aircraft  4  &  5  were  awarded  in  Jan.  2007.  Aircraft  6, 
7, and 8 were awarded in April 2007.) 

• The first aircraft arrived at the Coast Guard Aircraft Repair and Supply center 
(AR&SC) in Dec. 2006. The second aircraft arrived in Feb. 2007. Mission pallets 
will be integrated on the aircraft at AR&SC. 

• Official  readiness  status  at  the  first  air  station  (3  A/C)  is  projected  to  occur  by 

January 2009. 

Question  7.  I  am  aware  that  some  of  the  new  communications  equipment  devel-
oped  as  part  of  the  Deepwater  program  has  already  been  implemented.  Do  you  be-
lieve  that  the  Coast  Guard’s  mission  performance  has  improved  because  of  this 
equipment?  If  so,  how?  And  is  it  possible  to  accelerate  funding  for  this  part  of  the 
program? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard’s  mission  performance  has  improved  because  of  the 
communications  upgrades  on  legacy  cutters.  The  Deepwater  program  has  provided 
an  avenue  to  implement  critical  C4ISR  system  upgrades  much  earlier  than  origi-
nally planned within the Coast Guard’s organic planning and upgrade cycle. The up-
grades  have  significantly  improved  the  ability  to  exchange  mission  essential  infor-
mation  in  a  timely  manner  and  improved  interoperability  with  other  government 
agencies. 

Installation  of  a  classified  Local  Area  Network  and  access  to  the  Department  of 
Defense’s  classified  network  provides  access  to  near  real-time  intelligence  informa-
tion  during  operations  and  a  means  to  quickly  exchange  information  between  cut-
ters and shore units. Upgrades to the existing commercial satellite communications 
systems  double  the  data  throughput  and  now  allows  two  cutters  to  share  a  single 
satellite channel, thereby providing greater access to a limited number of channels. 
The addition of the Automatic Identification System (AIS) has improved situational 
awareness, maritime domain awareness, and navigational safety. 

The Coast Guard supports full funding of the President’s FY 2008 budget ($89.6M 

for C4ISR), which is necessary to keep the projects on track to meet objectives. 

Question  8.  How  are  you  encouraging  the  contractors  developing  the  communica-
tions equipment to expedite the delivery of these products? Have these efforts been 
successful? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  has  been  able  to  implement  a  number  of  communica-
tions  upgrades  on  legacy  cutters  through  the  Deepwater  program.  These  improve-
ments include: 

1. Installation of a classified Local Area Network and access to the Department 
of Defense’s classified network providing access to near real-time intelligence in-
formation  during  operations  and  a  means  to  quickly  exchange  information  be-
tween cutters, aircraft and shore units. 
2.  Upgrades  to  the  existing  commercial  satellite  communications  systems  dou-
bles the data throughput and now allows two cutters to share a single satellite 
channel, thereby providing greater access to a limited number of channels. 
3. The addition of the Automatic Identification System (AIS) has improved situ-
ational awareness, maritime domain awareness, and navigational safety. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  been  unable  to  provide  an  incentive  for  contractors  to  fur-
ther  expedite  delivery  of  communication  capabilities  due  to  limited  C4ISR  program 
funding. Moreover, a planned CG–C2 (Tactical and Communications Suite) Upgrade 
for  legacy  cutters  and  additional  SATCOM  technology  improvements  has  been  de-
ferred  due  to  funding  levels.  The  Coast  Guard  desires  to  restore  these  additional 
Command,  Control,  and  Communications  (C3)  improvements  in  order  to  improve 
mission performance and interoperability. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

88 

C4ISR Comparison between President’s Budget and Congressional Appropriation 

Fiscal Year ($M) 

2006 

2007 

Total 

President’s Budget Request 

Appropriated (Includes Rescissions through 2006) 

Difference (Requested vs. Enacted ) 

74.4 

44.0 

60.8 

50.0 

135.2 

94.0 

(30.4) 

(10.8) 

(41.2) 

Question 9. There appears to be a mixed record on some early problems combined 
with more recent successes in the aviation, communications, and logistics sectors of 
the Deepwater program. What lessons have both the Coast Guard and the involved 
contractors  learned  based  on  these  successes  and  failures,  and  how  will  you  use 
these lessons to improve the performance of the program going forward? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  has  engaged  in  a  collaborative  manner  with  ICGS  to 
review and change the terms and conditions of the contract for the upcoming award 
term.  As  an  example,  CG–4  will  lead  an  interim  logistics  support  plan  for  MPA  1– 
3.  This  effort  is  a  mix  of  organic  Coast  Guard  support,  use  of  other  government 
agencies  (NAVAIR),  and  ICGS  (through  operations  &  sustainment  CLINS).  The  in-
terim  support  plan  is  being  managed  from  the  MPA  Product  Line  at  the  Aircraft 
Repair and Service Center (AR&SC). An example of a lessons-learned was the Com-
mandant’s  decision  to  terminate  the  ICGS  FRC–B  proposal  and  designate  G–A  (of-
fice  symbol  for  the  ‘‘Coast  Guard  Acquisitions  Directorate’’)  as  the  lead  directorate 
to  acquire  the  FRC–B/Replacement  Patrol  Boat.  This  decision  ensures  increased 
government  management  and  oversight,  while  leveraging  CG–4  technical  expertise 
in  shipbuilding  &  design.  The  ‘‘parent  craft’’  approach  will  deliver  a  much  needed 
capability sooner as both design and production stages can be combined. 

Most  of  these  changes  reflect  lessons-learned  from  the  business  practices  that 
have developed during the first 4 years of the program. For instance, in the original 
concept,  ICGS  developed  the  asset  performance  specifications  and  the  Implementa-
tion Plan for how those assets would be fielded. For a variety of reasons, the Coast 
Guard  has  taken  ownership  of  the  performance  specifications  and  the  Implementa-
tion  Plan.  In  the  original  concept,  the  Coast  Guard  provided  performance  based 
Statements  of  Objectives;  in  this  award  term,  the  Coast  Guard  will  issue  State-
ments  of  Work  which  contain  specific  requirements.  Finally,  the  Coast  Guard  has 
mandated  the  use  of  Earned  Value  Management,  competition  at  the  Northrop 
Grumman  Ship  Systems  (NGSS)  and  Lockheed  Martin  (LM)  level  (via  the  award 
term  metrics)  and  use  of  a  ‘‘make-or-buy’’  analysis,  all  of  which  have  elements  that 
will improve cost control and performance. 

Since  the  specification  will  be  known  more  explicitly,  the  type  of  contract  action 
or  contract  order  will  also  be  shifting  from  ‘‘cost  plus’’  to  ‘‘fixed  priced’’  contracting. 
The  shift  to  fixed-price  will  depend  on  how  extensively  the  Statement  of  Work  is 
detailed  and  how  stable  the  specification  of  the  asset  or  component  is  in  terms  of 
requirements and production. This shift to more fixed-price contracts will be accom-
panied  with  clauses  for  inflation  adjustments,  known  as  Economic  Price  Adjust-
ments.  Overall,  the  more  detailed  Statements  of  Work  with  fixed-price  contracting 
will reduce the risk of cost increases that are not tied to inflation. 

ganization to increase efficiency and improve processes. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  also  implemented  improvements  to  Deepwater  program 
management.  The  major  improvements  to  help  the  program  move  forward  include: 
• Merge  Deepwater  with  the  Acquisition  Directorate  to  form  one  Acquisition  Or-
• Designate  the  Assistant  Commandant  for  Engineering  &  Logistics  Resources 
(CG–4) as the Coast Guard’s technical authority for all new ship acquisition de-
signs. 
• Add staff on the government side to the Deepwater Program to perform greater 
• Initiate  a  Business  Case  Analysis  for  all  new  acquisition  decisions  to  ensure 
that Deepwater is building and buying the right tools for our Coast Guard men 
and women for a fair and reasonable price. 

contractor oversight and assume some of the system integrator duties. 

• Increasing application of Independent Third Party Review and Analyses. 
• Coast Guard personnel will chair all Integrated Product Teams. 
Question  10.  How  will  the  Coast  Guard’s  experiences  with  Deepwater  contractors 
thus far affect the actions you will take during the next award term of the program? 
Answer. The Coast Guard has engaged in a collaborative manner with contractors 
to  review  and  modify  contract  terms  and  conditions  for  the  next  award  term.  Most 
of  these  changes  reflect  lessons  learned  from  the  business  practices  that  evolved 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

89 

during  the  first  4  years  of  the  Deepwater  Project.  For  instance,  in  the  original  con-
cept,  ICGS  developed  the  asset  performance  specifications  and  the  Implementation 
Plan  for  how  assets  would  be  fielded.  The  Coast  Guard  has  now  taken  full  owner-
ship of the performance specifications and the Implementation Plan. In the original 
concept,  the  Coast  Guard  provided  performance-based  Statement  of  Objectives.  In 
the  next  award  term,  the  Coast  Guard  will  issue  Statements  of  Work  that  contain 
specific  requirements  metrics.  Finally,  the  Coast  Guard  has  mandated  the  use  of 
Earned  Value  Management,  competition  at  the  Northrop  Grumman  Ship  Systems 
and Lockheed Martin level (via the award term metrics) and use of a ‘‘make-or-buy’’ 
analysis;  each  of  these  have  elements  that  will  improve  our  ability  to  control  costs. 
The  type  of  contract  action  or  contract  order  will  likely  shift  from  cost-plus  con-
tracting  to  fixed-priced  contracting.  The  shift  to  fixed-price  will  depend  on  how  de-
tailed  the  Statement  of  Work  is  as  well  as  how  stable  the  specification  of  the  asset 
or  component  is  in  terms  of  requirements  and  production.  This  shift  to  fixed-price 
contracts  would  be  accompanied  with  clauses  for  inflation  adjustments,  known  as 
Economic  Price  Adjustments.  Overall,  the  more  detailed  Statements  of  Work  com-
bined with fixed-price contracting will reduce risk of cost increases not tied to infla-
tion. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

ADMIRAL THAD W. ALLEN 

Question  1.  One  of  the  reasons  the  Coast  Guard  structured  the  Deepwater  con-
tract  using  a  lead  systems  integrator  was  the  shortage  of  trained  and  experienced 
acquisitions staff within the service. S. 924 includes language that would permit you 
to expand or contract your acquisitions staff as you see fit. How will this help allevi-
ate  the  problem  of  staff  shortage?  By  how  much  will  you  need  to  increase  your  ac-
quisitions staff in order to provide the vigorous oversight that Deepwater has lacked 
to date? 

Answer. The Deepwater Program has conducted a preliminary analysis and iden-
tified  a  need  for  an  additional  31  government  billets  for  FY  2008,  beyond  those  al-
ready  approved,  to  efficiently  obligate  Deepwater  Program  funding  and  ensure  suc-
cessful  delivery  of  new  assets  to  the  fleet.  However,  this  preliminary  analysis  has 
not  considered  the  Deepwater  Merger  with  the  Acquisition  Directorate  to  form  one 
Acquisition Organization. The staffing needs of the new organization will be identi-
fied and implemented as this initiative evolves. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  assumption  of  greater  oversight  and  more  system  integration 
responsibilities  is  in  the  transitional  stage,  and  therefore,  we  have  not  completed 
an  assessment  or  identification  of  all  necessary  staff  changes.  However,  the  in-
creased  funding  in  FY  2007  is  adequate  for  this  year  and  we  have  requested  addi-
tional funding in FY 2008. 

Question  2.  A  case  could  be  made  that  the  missteps  Deepwater  has  experienced 
since  its  inception  are  all  symptoms  of  a  larger  problem—the  reason  why  this  pro-
gram has gone so wrong. What is the heart of this issue? Please explain how it can 
come  to  pass  that  we  have  invested  so  much  in  this  program,  yet  we  have  to  little 
to show for it. 

Answer. Before addressing the question asking about a single reason for problems 
with Deepwater, it is prudent to address some of what Deepwater has accomplished 
for the Nation. A discussion of the accomplishments will set the stage appropriately 
to address the challenges. The Deepwater Program is the top capital priority for the 
Coast  Guard.  The  program,  only  in  its  fifth  year  of  execution,  is  the  modernization 
and  recapitalization  solution  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  aging  fleet  of  cutters,  aircraft 
and  mission  systems.  The  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  save  lives,  prevent  and  respond 
to terrorist attacks, interdict drugs and alien smugglers, and to protect the environ-
ment are completely dependent on the assets and capabilities provided by the Deep-
water program. Secretary Chertoff and I remain one hundred percent (100 percent) 
committed to the success of this crucial endeavor. 

The Deepwater aviation projects have been successful, delivering assets early and 
on  cost.  For  example,  all  eighty-four  of  95  HH–65  helicopters  have  been  re-engined 
and  modernized,  as  part  of  their  eventual  conversion  to  the  Multi-mission  Cutter 
Helicopter  (MCH)  configuration,  which  is  one  and  one-half  months  ahead  of  sched-
ule  and  within  the  projected  budget.  The  Multi-mission  Cutter  Helicopter  (MCH) 
configuration  starts  with  the  HH–65  Dolphin  helicopters  and  is  upgraded  to  the  C- 
model  aircraft,  which  features  new  Turbomeca  Arriel  2C2  engines  and  upgraded 
gearboxes. The aircraft have 40 percent more power than the B-models, and greater 
operational  reliability.  Already  the  HH–65C  has  proven  itself  in  challenging  mis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

90 

sions.  The  re-engined  HH–65Cs  with  their  improved  performance  characteristics 
have saved lives across the Nation, over 300 in Hurricane Katrina for example. 

The Coast Guard has accepted delivery of two new HC–144A medium-range Mari-
time  Patrol  Aircraft.  The  aircraft  are  undergoing  missionization  at  AR&SC  Eliza-
beth  City,  N.C.  Six  aircraft  are  under  contract.  Additionally,  the  first  of  six  new, 
more capable HC–130J long-range search aircraft has begun modifications for Coast 
Guard  missions,  with  delivery  expected  later  in  2007.  Meanwhile,  Deepwater  is 
modernizing the existing fleet of HC–130Hs. 

Since contract award in 2002, the IDS program has made significant progress to-
ward  improving  the  capabilities  of  the  legacy  force,  even  as  the  Coast  Guard  and 
industry  work  on  the  next  generation  of  assets.  For  example,  all  medium  and  high 
endurance cutters have received the Deepwater Command, Control, Communication, 
Computers, Intelligence, Surveillance and Reconnaissance (C4ISR) upgrades—which 
already are making a difference in operations. A recent success was in March 2007, 
when  the  cutters  SHERMAN  and  HAMILTON  and  a  Coast  Guard  C–130  aircrew 
executed  a  record  seizure  of  19.5  metric  tons  of  cocaine  aboard  the  motor  vessel 
GATUN, off Panama. 

The C4ISR upgrades installed on the SHERMAN through the Deepwater program 
contributed to mission success by improving communications and situational aware-
ness  among  the  cutters’  and  aircraft’s  crews.  The  Deepwater  C4ISR  upgrade  in-
cluded new equipment—such as digital radios—as well as additional computer proc-
essing  bandwidth  (which  allowed  the  cutter  crew  to  share  classified  information, 
and to monitor other activities in the operating space). 

The  SHERMAN  also  was  equipped  with  the  Nationwide  Automatic  Identification 
System,  enabling  the  crew  to  locate  the  GATUN  near  the  heavily-trafficked  ap-
proaches  to  the  Panama  Canal.  Additionally,  the  system  enabled  the  cutter’s  crew 
to  monitor  the  GATUN  while  maintaining  the  element  of  surprise,  until  the  crew 
received permission to halt and board the target. 

But  there  were  challenges  to  overcome,  highlighting  the  continued  need  for  new 
assets.  The  SHERMAN,  a  40-year-old  vessel,  operated  with  significant  mechanical 
casualties,  including  the  loss  of  one  main  engine—reducing  speed  and  maneuver-
ability.  The  SHERMAN  also  had  problems  with  its  evaporation  system  resulting  in 
the  inability  to  make  fresh  water.  Additionally  the  crew  overcame  a  problem  with 
a small boat that affected end-game capability. 

The crew’s success in spite of materiel adversity was a tribute to their competency 
and commitment. Yet the situation also underscored the urgent need to recapitalize 
and  to  modernize  the  Coast  Guard’s  fleet  assets,  which  the  Deepwater  program  is 
accomplishing today. 

There  are  two  National  Security  Cutters  (NSC)  under  construction  at  the  ship-
yard  in  Pascagoula,  MS.  The  NSC  is  designed  to  operate  away  from  homeport  for 
approximately  230  days  per  year,  contrasted  with  185  days  per  year  for  378′ 
WHECs. The NSC also is much more capable than legacy platforms, in terms of its 
aviation, C4ISR and other mission systems capabilities. 

As is the case with many Deepwater-provided assets, the NSC is a good example 
of  cooperative  development,  with  the  taxpayers  gaining  best  value  by  a  concerted 
effort  between  government  stakeholders  and  industry.  For  example,  based  upon  a 
standing  agreement  between  the  Deepwater  Program  Executive  Officer,  and  U.S. 
Navy and U.S. Marine Corps counterparts, Deepwater is able to share common sys-
tems,  technologies  and  processes  for  improved  interoperability  and  cost  avoidance. 
No  core  factor  has  been  identified  as  singularly  responsible  for  the  Deepwater 
problems  or  setbacks.  The  findings  and  information  presented  by  the  GAO,  DHS– 
OIG,  and  the  Coast  Guard  initiated  Defense  Acquisition  University  Study  are  ac-
knowledged  as  the  factors  responsible  for  the  problems  and  setbacks.  The  GAO  re-
ported in March 2004 that the CG’s Deepwater Program needed increased attention 
to management and contractor oversight. The CG has started implementing the rec-
ommendations that GAO suggested in order to improve program management. 

The  GAO  indicated  in  a  follow-on  report  issued  in  April  2006  that  these  changes 
to  Deepwater  appear  sound  and  that  program  management  has  improved  but  con-
tinued monitoring is warranted. The Coast Guard has taken the same approach and 
intensity to the DHS–OIG findings and recommendations. Overall, the results have 
been similar to the GAO results in that the DHS–OIG indicates that improvements 
have  been  made  while  others  require  more  information  or  longer-term  monitoring. 
Implementing these recommendations will improve Deepwater and the rest of the 
CG  acquisition  system  to  obtain  the  appropriate  cutters,  aircraft,  and  information 
systems for the service to the Nation. 

Question 3. In the Coast Guard’s FY08 authorization proposal, you outline a strat-
egy that proposes a considerable realignment of your operational forces to comprise 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

91 

what  you  refer  to  as  the  ‘‘strategic  trident.’’  However,  what  is  missing  is  a  descrip-
tion of what the final re-alignment will look like and how these pieces will integrate. 
Can you describe what these changes will mean to the Coast Guard once the oper-
ations  are  complete?  If  there  will  be  geographic  changes  to  individual  stations, 
please  explain,  to  the  extent  possible,  what  those  will  be.  Given  that  you  are  still 
finishing  up  your  establishment  of  Sectors  and  trying  to  get  a  handle  on  the  prob-
lems of Deepwater, how will this initiative further disrupt the day-to-day operations 
of your service? 

Answer. Background: 
The  ‘‘strategic  trident’’  is  a  management  concept  that  aligns  with  the  proposed 
transformation of the Coast Guard’s command and control structure, as well as, the 
enhanced emphasis on readiness and mission support to improve Coast Guard oper-
ational capabilities. 

Description of Realignment: 
Notional  plans  are  to  transform  the  Coast  Guard  command  and  control  structure 
so  that  it  will  ultimately  be  more  flexible,  nimble,  and  capable  of  operating  with 
multiple  partners  to  respond  to  incidents,  surge  operations,  and  increased  threat 
levels while continuing to sustain performance in traditional areas. 

Key  to  enhancing  these  operational  capabilities  is  the  development  of  a  clear,  co-
herent method to employ Coast Guard forces. This strategic trident provides the lay-
ered defense our Nation needs through: 

• Shore-based, multi-mission forces assigned to Sectors 
• Maritime Patrol and Interdiction Forces (High/Medium Endurance Cutters and 

Maritime Patrol Aircraft) 

• Deployable  specialized  forces  organized  into  a  single  unified  operational  struc-

ture, the Deployable Operations Group (DOG) 

Other than the establishment of the DOG, the realignment into the ‘‘strategic tri-
dent’’  does  not  create  or  move  any  new  operational  field  commands.  Rather,  it  re-
aligns  the  management  of  existing  forces  to  better  prepare  the  Service  to  meet 
emerging  threats  and  challenges  through  an  adaptable  packaging  system  of  capa-
bilities, established competencies, authorities, and strong partnerships. 

This  planned  organizational  structure  will  transform  the  Service’s  Atlantic  and 
Pacific  Area  Commands,  aligning  operational  mission  execution  command  functions 
into  a  single  command  entitled  Coast  Guard  Operations  Command  (CG  OPCOM), 
and mission readiness functions into a single command entitled Coast Guard Forces 
Readiness Command (CG FORCECOM). 

There  will  be  one  commander  responsible  for  Coast  Guard  operational  mission 
execution.  This  same  commander  will  also  coordinate  and  optimize  mission  execu-
tion  and  unity  of  effort  with  external  partners  at  the  operational  level  i.e.,  DOD, 
DHS  agency  partners,  EPA,  etc.  CG  OPCOM  will  serve  as  the  Service’s  one  single 
point of accountability, completely focused on planning and executing operations. 

CG  FORCECOM  will  be  responsible  for  the  current  and  future  readiness  of  the 
Coast  Guard’s  workforce,  platforms,  and  infrastructure,  and  ensuring  the  Service 
maintains the capabilities to execute its missions. This one single command will di-
rect and manage the overall Coast Guard readiness posture, doctrine and force allo-
cation; including equipping the Service’s work force. Unifying readiness in this man-
ner will eliminate geographical variances that exist in current practices and provide 
a single point of accountability for Coast Guard readiness, just like CG OPCOM will 
do for all Coast Guard operations. 

Re-aligning our command and control structure in this manner will do away with 
current  east  coast/west  coast  organizational  boundaries  that  are  irrelevant  to  drug 
trafficking organizations, and other transnational threats, and are not aligned with 
the  other  armed  services.  It  will  streamline  the  Service’s  operational  decision-
making, and better facilitate the timely and accurate flow of information and direc-
tion between the strategic, operational, and tactical levels of mission execution. 

Conclusion: 
While the proposed reorganization constitutes a substantial change in the way the 
Coast  Guard  manages  operations,  readiness,  and  support  functions,  it  will  have  no 
disruption  to  the  day-to-day  execution  of  our  missions.  Districts  and  units  at  the 
Sector level and below will continue operations without any disruption of service to 
the  public.  Similarly,  major  cutters  will  face  a  change  in  reporting  and  support 
structure,  but  will  continue  to  conduct  operations  in  support  of  District  Com-
manders, Joint Interagency Task Forces and DOD Combatant Commanders. 

Overall  the  proposed  reorganization  will  improve  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to 

serve the public, and provide appropriate support to the Service’s workforce. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

92 

Question 4. Your FY08 request includes the creation of a command cell to manage 
your deployable assets. You have mentioned that there is a potential to wrap other 
Department  of  Homeland  Security  assets  into  this  concept.  Which  particular  assets 
do you have in mind, and what is the rationale for transferring those assets? 

Answer.  To  clarify,  the  command  cell  referred  to  in  the  question  will  be  a 
deployable  command  and  control  (C2)  element  that  provides  tactical  commanders 
expertise  regarding  the  capabilities  of  deployable  forces  under  their  control.  Addi-
tionally,  the  C2  element  would  be  immediately  available  to  assist  operational  and 
tactical commanders in managing during an attack, disaster, or other contingencies. 
There are no specific assets identified at this time. However, the Deployable Oper-
ations Group (DOG) staff is conducting outreach to agencies within the Department 
of  Homeland  Security  (DHS),  interagency  and  Department  of  Defense  (DOD).  The 
primary  purpose  of  this  outreach  is  to  familiarize  other  agencies  with  the  capabili-
ties  of  the  DOG  and  to  lay  the  foundation  for  future  partnerships  where  possible. 
Question  5.  Your  FY08  Authorization  proposal  seeks  to  close  gaps  in  Nation’s 
Maritime Alien Smuggling law to close gaps in law enforcement activities. Why, spe-
cifically,  is  current  law  insufficient  and  what  tangible  benefits  will  the  provision 
bring to enforcement of immigration laws and border security? 

Answer.  Each  year,  maritime  smugglers  transport  thousands  of  aliens  to  the 
United  States  with  virtual  impunity  because  the  existing  law  does  not  sufficiently 
punish  or  deter  such  conduct.  Only  a  small  fraction  (less  than  3  percent)  of  inter-
dicted maritime alien smugglers are referred for prosecution because the smugglers 
successfully circumvent the elements necessary for the Government to prevail on ex-
isting felony offenses. 

Professional maritime smugglers often charge large fees and use high-speed craft 
and  increasingly  sophisticated  deception  techniques  to  avoid  detection  and  appre-
hension, rapidly modifying their methods to counter changes in law enforcement tac-
tics. Smuggling routes primarily involve transit from the Dominican Republic, Cuba, 
Haiti  and  the  Bahamas,  but  routes  include  travel  from  Canada,  Ecuador,  Guate-
mala, Mexico and other countries as well. 

Smugglers  use  various  deceptions  to  conceal  from  law  enforcement  that  the  ven-
ture is for-profit, including ‘‘coaching’’ smuggled aliens in how to respond to law en-
forcement interviews and feigning rescues at sea. Employing these and other meth-
ods  and  routes,  maritime  smugglers,  including  organized  crime  syndicates,  often 
evade  criminal  prosecution  while  realizing  annual  revenues  possibly  ranging  up  to 
billions of dollars from these activities. 

Presently,  8  U.S.C.  § 1324  is  the  principal  Federal  criminal  statute  under  which 
alien  smugglers,  including  maritime  smugglers,  are  prosecuted.  That  law  was  not 
designed for prosecuting the unique evidentiary and jurisdictional issues associated 
with  maritime  smuggling  cases.  Many  of  the  difficulties  encountered  by  the  Coast 
Guard  in  maritime  smuggling  enforcement  stem  from  a  statutory  framework  that 
fails to consider the unique aspects of extraterritorial maritime law enforcement op-
erations. Further, under § 1324, alien smuggling is only a felony if the Government 
can prove beyond a reasonable doubt that an alien smuggler sought commercial ad-
vantage or private financial gain, caused serious bodily injury, or placed in jeopardy 
the life of any person. 

Maritime  smuggling  is  inherently  dangerous.  Smugglers  treat  the  migrants  like 
cargo; typically packing migrants into overcrowded, un-seaworthy vessels, with little 
or  no  life  saving  equipment  available,  no  provisions  for  sanitation  and  little  or  no 
food or other basic necessities. Moreover, smugglers often engage in efforts to evade 
maritime  law  enforcement  at  high  speeds,  further  subjecting  migrants  to  serious 
risks.  Given  the  inherent  dangers  of  this  illegal  trade  of  human  trafficking,  felony 
prosecution should not be predicated on additional proof of injury or risk. Likewise, 
maritime  smugglers  have  exploited  the  ‘‘profit’’  requirement  for  felony  prosecution 
by  offering  incentives  to  the  aliens  to  lie  and  coaching  the  aliens  to  tell  criminal 
investigators that the smuggler was a ‘‘good Samaritan’’ who ‘‘rescued’’ them. 

Thus,  in  the  majority  of  cases,  the  Coast  Guard  is  able  to  rescue  and  interdict 
the smuggled aliens, but the Government is not able to prosecute the crew or others 
involved in the smuggling operation. Such actions have little deterrent effect on the 
crews  or  the  trafficking  organizations.  In  the  highly  lucrative  human  smuggling 
trade, smugglers consider such occasional seizures as a cost of doing business. 

In  1980,  Congress  recognized  and  cured  similar  shortcomings  in  the  Comprehen-
sive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 by enacting the Maritime Drug 
Law  Enforcement  Act.  The  Administration’s  proposal,  as  well  as  several  other  bills 
now pending before the House and the Senate, would provide the Government with 
the  ability  to  enhance  our  national  security  and  ensure  the  safety  of  lives  at  sea 
by providing maritime law enforcement and prosecutors the tools necessary to bring 
meaningful consequences to human smugglers interdicted at sea. In pertinent part, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

93 

the Administration’s proposal, as well as the other pending bills, would: (1) remove 
the  requirement  to  prove  ‘‘profit’’  ‘‘inducement’’  or  subjecting  migrants  to  specific 
risks of serious bodily injury to reach a felony level prosecution; (2) establish reason-
able  mandatory  minimum  penalties  that  would  provide  a  genuine  deterrent  to 
human  smugglers  and  appropriately  reflect  the  criminality  of  the  conduct;  and  (3) 
eliminate  the  possibility  of  smugglers  using  a  fabricated  ‘‘Good  Samaritan’’  defense 
while  preserving  such  a  defense  for  legitimate  rescues  by  requiring  Good  Samari-
tans  to  provide  notice  to  appropriate  authorities  of  any  rescue.  The  Coast  Guard 
considers these elements essential to any bill that Congress may enact. 

Question  6.  In  the  FY08  budget,  the  inland  river  tenders  emergency  sustainment 
project  is  not  funded  nor  is  there  recapitalization  funding  for  these  rapidly  aging 
vessels  which,  among  their  many  duties,  provide  critical  ice-breaking  services  on 
Maine’s  rivers  each  spring.  What  is  your  plan  to  address  the  needs  of  your  aging 
inland river buoy tender fleet, 140′ ice breakers, and utility tugs? 

Answer. The Coast Guard intends to continue to use maintenance funding to cor-

rect casualties aboard individual cutters of all classes when they arise. 

Additionally,  the  Coast  Guard  will  use  maintenance  funding  for  subsystem  re-

newal on all cutter classes in order to contain maintenance costs. 

The Coast Guard is evaluating a range of options for accomplishing the AtoN mis-
sion  throughout  the  inland  river  system  that  may  or  may  not  necessarily  require 
replacement of inland assets. 

The first groups of cutters to be addressed in this evaluation are the Inland River 
Tenders  and  Construction  Tenders.  After  completion  of  this  mission  analysis,  the 
Coast  Guard  expects  to  plan  for  a  replacement  vessel  that  may  approach  AtoN  in 
a different manner from existing River Tenders, and will likely have increased capa-
bilities to address a wider mission set. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. TRENT LOTT TO 

ADMIRAL THAD W. ALLEN 

Question 1. Both the FY07 supplemental appropriations bill and S. 924 would pro-
hibit  the  Coast  Guard  from  executing  certain  Deepwater  contracting  actions  until 
the Coast Guard completed certain reports, studies or consultations. Do you believe 
such  legislative  contingencies  are  necessary  in  order  to  compel  the  Coast  Guard  to 
take those required actions? Would the Coast Guard be responsive to legislation im-
posing  reasonable  deadlines  for  completing  such  reports,  studies,  or  consultations 
without the Deepwater contracting contingencies? 

Answer. No, legislative contingencies are neither necessary nor preferred. The po-

tential for unintended consequences is high. 

Yes.  The  Coast  Guard  would  prefer  reasonable  deadlines  that  did  not  preclude 

timely contract actions that were in the best interest of the Government. 

The  Coast  Guard  Acquisition  Program  has  utilized  the  GAO  Framework  for  Ac-
quisition  Management  (GAO–05–218G  ‘‘Framework  for  Assessing  the  Acquisition 
Function at Federal Agencies’’) as a tool to assess and improve Coast Guard acquisi-
tion in the four areas of Organizational Alignment and Leadership, Policy and Proc-
ess, Human Capital, and Knowledge and Information Management. As a result, the 
Coast Guard has aggressively implemented a series of improvements in contract and 
program management to ensure effective management oversight, sound stewardship 
of  taxpayer  dollars  and  timely  delivery  of  much-needed  assets.  The  improvements 
already underway include: 

• Consolidation of Coast Guard acquisition activities (Deepwater, Office of Acqui-
sition,  acquisition  policy,  Research  and  Development  Center)  into  one  direc-
torate to increase efficiency; 

• Designation  of  the  Assistant  Commandant  for  Engineering  and  Logistics  Re-

sources as the Technical Authority for Deepwater; 

• Extensive  progress  in  the  implementation  of  the  GAO  recommendations  result-

ing from the 2004 Deepwater Contract Management audit; 

• Development  of  new  evaluation  criteria  for  follow-on  Deepwater  contract  term; 
• A  commitment  to  seek  independent,  third  party  evaluations  of  new  asset  de-

signs in Deepwater; 

• Increasing funds for Government Program Management for Deepwater; 
• Increasing  Government  staffing  at  Deepwater  manufacturing  facilities  focusing 

on contract/quality management; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

94 

• Contracted for Defense Acquisition University sponsored panel of experts to as-
sess  current  state  and  propose  strategic  planning  elements  to  improve  Rescue 
21 and Deepwater contract executions; 
• Leadership  focus  on  Human  Capital  to  include  Workforce  Training  and  Certifi-
cation, Pay Incentives, Direct Hire Authority and Recruitment and Retention of 
qualified contracting and program management personnel; 
• Lessons Learned Exchange between Coast Guard and the Department of Home-
• Adoption of a DOD 5000 based revision to Coast Guard’s Major System Acquisi-
• Extensive  consulting  with  Defense  Acquisition  University  experts  regarding 

land Security staff; 

tion policies; 

training and program management competency development. 

Question 2. You testified that you plan to use the current Deepwater contract with 
Integrated Coast Guard Systems to continue ordering additional assets and systems 
of  the  types  that  are  already  under  production  through  that  contract.  Please  de-
scribe  these  plans  in  greater  detail  and  describe  the  impact  on  the  Cost  Guard’s 
plans to replace legacy assets if the Congress prohibited the Coast Guard from con-
tinuing to use the current Deepwater contract for that purpose. 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  is  assuming  a  greater  role  both  in  management  and 
oversight and will assume the lead role as systems integrator Specifically, the Coast 
Guard has taken over responsibility and control in the following areas: 

tives 

mix of Deepwater Program assets 

ciples and practices at the Deepwater System design level 

• Development of the System Concept of Operations or Asset Statements of Objec-
• Definitive Role of Technical Authority 
• Development  of  Business  Case  Analysis  decisions  to  validate  the  selection  and 
• Leadership of Integrated Product Teams 
• Active Management of the Risk Plan 
• Greater  oversight  of  ICGS’s  application  of  accepted  System  Engineering  prin-
• Greater oversight and control of Integrated Logistics Support 
In terms of what is different contractually, the System Integrator work performed 
by Integrated Coast Guard System (ICGS) was accomplished under the System En-
gineering  and  Program  Management  Delivery  Task  Orders  (DTOs).  Future  DTOs 
will be modified to de-scope or reduce those tasks accomplished by the systems inte-
grator  since  it  will  now  be  done  by  the  Coast  Guard,  which  is  moving  as  rapidly 
as possible to assume lead systems integrator responsibilities. A combination of time 
and funding is required to develop the necessary staff competencies and capabilities 
for  the  Coast  Guard  to  assume  all  of  the  systems  integrator  responsibilities.  The 
Coast  Guard  will  accomplish  this  gradually  over  the  next  few  years  in  conjunction 
with  the  consolidation  of  the  Deepwater  and  Acquisition  Directorates  to  form  one 
Directorate for all Coast Guard acquisitions. The staffing required for the new orga-
nization to accomplish the system integrator role will be identified and implemented 
as this initiative evolves. 

ICGS  has  the  potential  to  continue  to  provide  the  goods  and  services  already 
under  contract,  primarily  the  MPA  and  the  NSC.  However,  the  Coast  Guard  re-
mains  open  to  re-competing  these  assets,  if  it  is  in  the  best  interest  of  the  govern-
ment  to  do  so.  ICGS  also  has  the  potential  for  future  work,  but  all  future  assets 
will be competitively awarded. If the Coast Guard is prohibited from using the cur-
rent Deepwater contract, the best case scenario will take another five plus years to 
get a NSC or MPA. A delay of 5 years in delivering assets will have a serious oper-
ational  impact  on  the  Coast  Guard  and  the  service  provided  to  the  American  tax-
payers. 

Question  3.  Please  describe:  (1)  the  condition  of  the  legacy  cutters  and  aircraft 
that  would  be  replaced  by  the  NSC  and  MPA;  (2)  how  the  maintenance  expenses 
and  operational  availability  of  these  legacy  assets  have  changed  over  the  past  sev-
eral years; and (3) how you expect the maintenance expenses and operational avail-
ability of these legacy assets to change until they are completely taken out of service 
upon replacement. 

Answer. 

NSC 
1. The 378′ WHEC will be replaced by the NSC with the first NSC scheduled for 
operations  in  2010.  The  378′  WHEC  fleet  is  aging  and  equipment  obsolescence 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

95 

issues  are  degrading  overall  performance.  In  1999,  a  ship  structure  and  machinery 
evaluation  board  (SSMEB)  was  convened  on  two  WHEC  378′  cutters  to  determine 
the  condition  and  estimate  the  remaining  service  life  of  the  cutter  class.  In  August 
2003,  a  fleet  sustainment  conference  was  held  to  re-evaluate  the  condition  and  re-
maining  service  life  and  identify  all  systems  and  components  that  were  difficult  or 
becoming too expensive to reliably maintain. The conference estimated the fleet’s re-
maining  service  life  at  11  years  using  four  criteria—safety,  readiness,  payback  and 
probability.  To  assure  the  capability  and  reliability  of  these  cutters  until  their  de-
commissioning,  the  Coast  Guard  is  dedicating  OE  funding  to  address  specific  sub- 
system issues, (see table 1 below). 
2.  The  378′  WHEC  has  consistently  exceeded  its  Standard  Support  Level  (SSL) 
maintenance  funding  due  to  old  and  obsolete  systems  and  sub-systems.  The  chart 
below  depicts  fiscal  year  SSL  funding  per  cutter,  the  actual  maintenance  expense 
per cutter and maintenance expenses plus re-capitalization project expenses per cut-
ter.  The  SSL  is  the  budgeted  amount  for  depot  level  maintenance  and  is  increased 
each  year  by  Cost  of  Living  Adjustments  (COLA).  COLA  increases  have  been  inad-
equate  to  meet  the  actual  maintenance  expenses  fleet  wide.  Due  to  the  high  cost 
of  a  WHEC  Mission  Effectiveness  Project  (MEP)  sustainment  initiative,  the  Coast 
Guard  has  decided  to  target  specific  replacement  of  sub-systems  identified  as  the 
most troublesome through ongoing engineering and technological assessments. 

Table 1.—WHEC 378—SSL vs. Actual Expenses (FY03–FY06) 

Standard Support Level 

(SSL) 

Actual Maintenance Ex-

pense 

Actual Maintenance & 

Re-cap Projects Expenses 

FY03 

FY04 

FY05 

FY06 

FY07 

$1,137,577 

$1,126,394 

$1,104,150 

$1,104,409 

$1,142,953 

$1,937,812 

$1,967,451 

$2,055,975 

$1,725,885 

$2,604,789 

$2,758,164 

$2,879,913 

$2,623,121 

The  operational  availability  of  the  378′  WHECs  as  determined  from  the  Coast 

Guard Business Intelligence Data Base is depicted below. 

MEASURES as values 

WHEC (entire fleet) 

Percent Time Fully Mission 

Capable (PTFMC)* 

2004 

2005 

2006 

26.4% 

48.2% 

41.0% 

*PTFMC  is  defined  as  the  percent  of  time  the  cutter  has  no  category  3  or  4  equipment  casualties  during  operational  days.  Major 
equipment  casualties  are  category  3  or  4,  which  are  defined  as  ‘‘deficiency  in  mission  critical  equipment  which  caused  a  major  deg-
radation  or  loss  of  a  primary  mission.’’  The  Coast  Guard’s  PTFMC  goal  for  WHEC’s  is  86  percent,  with  lower  percentages  indicating 
a  decrease  in  operational  readiness. 
3.  The  worst  conditioned  WHEC  378′  are  to  be  decommissioned  starting  in  2009. 
Maintenance and re-cap projects are expected to remain above SSLs until the entire 
class  is  decommissioned.  The  operational  availability  is  expected  to  remain  fairly 
constant as the worst conditioned WHECs will continue to be assessed and targeted 
for removal from service. Maintenance expenses are expected to increase in real dol-
lars as inflationary pressures in this sector of the economy outpace normal inflation. 

Answer. 

MPA 

1. Under the current Integrated Deepwater System plan, the number of fully oper-
ational  HU–25’s  will  gradually  decline  until  all  are  decommissioned  in  2014.  The 
HU–25  airframe  is  aging  but  maintains  full  operating  capability  through  an  oper-
ating  expense  (OE)  funded  unit  and  depot  level  maintenance  and  repair  program. 
A recent Supplemental Structural Inspection Program (SSIP) study determined that 
critical airframe structural components are at less than half of their life limit. How-
ever,  the  engines,  many  sensors,  and  aircraft  systems  are  becoming  more  difficult 
to  maintain.  These  systems  will  continue  to  be  supported  through  the  OE  funded 
maintenance programs. 

2. The operational availability has remained relatively stable over the past several 
years,  but  falls  short  of  the  COMDT’s  goal  of  71  percent.  However,  as  the  HU–25 
ages,  it  becomes  more  maintenance  intensive  as  reflected  by  the  increasing  Labor 
Hour  Per  Flight  Hour  (LHPFH)  and  cost  per  flight  Hour  (CPFH)  The  CPFH  rep-
resents  the  variable  costs  of  spare  parts  and  depot-level  maintenance  associated 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

96 

with  operating  each  aircraft  type  per  flight  hour.  The  HU–25  product  line  is  able 
to  minimize  support  costs  by  cannibalizing  high  value,  hard  to  procure  components 
from  Coast  Guard  HU–25’s  stored  at  the  Aircraft  Maintenance  And  Regeneration 
Center (AMARC) in Tucson, AZ. 

2002 

2003 

2004 

2005 

2006 

AVAILABILITY 

64.0% 

67.2% 

66.2% 

68.7% 

68.1% 

LHPFH 

CPFH 

12.9 

12.8 

13.5 

13.3 

14.5 

$1,807 

$1,780 

$1,896 

$2,081 

$2,178 

3.  Operational  availability  has  stabilized  and  is  expected  to  remain  constant  as 
long  as  the  Coast  Guard  can  afford  rising  maintenance  expenses.  Maintenance  ex-
penses will continue to increase as parts become obsolete or difficult to procure. The 
Coast  Guard  will  maintain  the  current  60  month  OE  Program  Depot  Maintenance 
(PDM) cycle incorporating a PDM extension program during the last year of the air-
craft’s  service.  The  product  line  has  initiated  several  engineering  modifications  and 
reviewed  maintenance  procedures  to  decrease  maintenance  hours  and  reduce  costs. 
Additionally,  efforts  to  minimize  operational  impacts  are  underway,  including  a 
long-term  engine  overhaul  contract  with  the  Original  Equipment  Manufacturer 
(OEM). The ATF–3 engine reliability and overhaul expense continues to be the most 
significant HU–25 cost factor, and engineering modifications by the OEM are being 
negotiated as part of the new contract. The OE funded engine overhaul contract will 
provide  sufficient  replacements  until  2014  when  the  aircraft  is  completely  phased 
out.  The  annual  Non-pay  inflation  and  PPA  VI  industry  specific  inflation  funding 
increases are crucial for the Coast Guard to keep pace with escalating maintenance 
costs. 

Question 4. The failure of the 110-foot to 123-foot patrol boat conversion program 
has  left  the  Coast  Guard  with  a  significant  patrol  boat  gap.  To  date,  the  Coast 
Guard has mitigated the gap by extending the lease of three of the five Navy Patrol 
Craft and initiating the FRC–B program. Please provide timelines and expected re-
sults for these and any other planned actions to mitigate the patrol boat gap. 

Answer.  Approved  Mitigating  Initiatives:  The  Coast  Guard  has  approved  two  ini-
tiatives  to  assist  in  the  mitigation  of  the  patrol  boat  gap.  These  initiatives  will  re-
coup 18,700 operational hours. 

1.  Multicrewing:  The  Coast  Guard  is  utilizing  crews  from  the  non-operational 
123’ WPBs in a multi-crewing effort to help reduce both the overall Patrol Boat 
gap  and  the  hour  gap  specific  to  the  District  Seven  Area  of  Responsibility 
(AOR).  Specifically,  two  crews  are  attached  to  each  of  the  eight  D7  Florida 
multi-crewed  110′  WPBs  and  they  operate  at  a  pace  of  3,600  hours  per  year 
thereby  (recouping  11,200  hours)  annually.  Multi-crewing  began  in  February 
2007. 
2.  Extending  179′  WPC  Memorandum  of  Agreement  with  Navy:  After  Com-
mandant/CNO  discussions,  negotiations  with  the  Navy  to  modify  the  current 
179′ WPC MOA to extend use until 2011 has occurred. An Addendum to extend 
the use of three 179′ WPCs for a period of 3 years has been signed by both par-
ties.  Three  of  the  WPCs  will  remain  in  Pascagoula,  MS  until  the  end  of  Fiscal 
Year 2011. This will provide 7,500 programmed hours each year. 

Potential  Near-term  Mitigating  Options:  There  are  five  potential  options  that  the 
Coast  Guard  is  analyzing  to  mitigate  the  loss  of  hours  and  hulls  in  District  Seven: 
1. Adjust WPB MEP Timeline: A Coast Guard decision to shorten the WPB Mis-
sion  Effectiveness  Project  (MEP)  timeline  is  being  considered.  By  reducing  the 
number  of  110′  inducted  per  year  into  MEP  from  four  hulls  to  three  hulls  and 
decreasing  the  time  spent  undergoing  MEP  from  12  months  to  9  months,  the 
Coast Guard can reduce the need for 110′ WPBs in MEP by 21 months per year 
recouping approximately 3,000 hours per year. If approved, the schedule change 
would take effect in September 2007. 
2.  Procurement  of  Additional  87′  Coastal  Patrol  Boats:  The  GWOT  Supple-
mental  provided  funds  for  the  procurement  of  four  87′  Coastal  Patrol  Boats 
(CPBs)  which  are  now  under  contract.  The  additional  87′  CPBs  would  be 
homeported  in  District  Seven  to  allow  the  most  positive  impact  on  Southern 
Florida  AOR  and  would  add  7,200  programmed  hours  per  year  to  the  87′  CPB 
fleet.  One  87′  CPB  will  be  operational  by  the  end  of  Fiscal  Year  2008  with  the 
remaining three becoming operational in Fiscal Year 2009. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

97 

3.  Lease  of  Commercial  Vessels:  Lease  four  commercial  high-speed  boats  with 
similar  characteristics  of  a  Patrol  Boat  for  execution  of  Coast  Guard  missions 
in  the  District  Seven  Area  of  Responsibility  (AOR).  Each  leased  vessel  would 
be multi-crewed using the former 123′ WPB crews and operate 4,400 hours per 
year.  This  option  provides  17,600  hours  per  year  (6,400  more  hours  than  the 
current  multi-crewing  initiative)  and  would  replace  half  of  the  hull  and  surge 
capacity  lost  by  the  non-operational  123′  WPBs.  The  Coast  Guard  Office  of  Ac-
quisition is currently conducting a lease vs. buy analysis to determine the feasi-
bility of leasing commercial vessels. If approved, the lease vessels are projected 
to be available for Coast Guard operations by February or March 2008. 
4. Increase 87′ Coastal Patrol Boat Programmed Hours: The Coast Guard is as-
sessing the costs and impacts of increasing programmed operating hours for the 
entire fleet of sixty-five 87′ CPBs from 1,800 hours to 2,000 hours per year. This 
would  provide  an  additional  13,000  hours  per  year  to  assist  in  the  mitigation 
of the WPB Op Hour Gap. If approved, this initiative would take effect on Octo-
ber 1, 2008. 
5.  Increase  110′  Patrol  Boat  Programmed  Hours:  The  Coast  Guard  is  assessing 
the  cost  and  impacts  of  increase  programmed  operating  hours  for  all  non-Dis-
trict  Seven  110′  WPBs  by  400  hours  which  will  provide  5,400  hours  per  year 
to  assist  in  the  mitigation  of  the  WPB  Op  Hour  Gap,  a  timeline  when  this  op-
tion  could  begin  has  not  been  determined.  A  specific  funding  source  has  not 
been identified as these options arew still being studied and evaluated. 

Long-term  Mitigating  Options:  The  Coast  Guard’s  primary  long-term  mitigation 

strategy is procurement of the Fast Response Cutter. 

FRC–B:  The  Coast  Guard’s  Office  of  Acquisition  (G–A)  is  developing  the  Request 
for  Proposal  (RFP)  package  for  the  FRC–B.  Overall,  the  Coast  Guard  is  planning 
to  acquire  twelve  FRC–B  assets.  The  first  FRC–B  is  anticipated  to  be  delivered  in 
Fiscal Year 2010 with the final hull delivered by the end of Fiscal Year 2013. 

Question 5. The Deepwater contractor raised several questions concerning the va-
lidity  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  third  party  Business  Case  Analysis  for  a  composite  hull 
FRC–A  design.  The  Department  of  Homeland  Security  Science  and  Technology  Di-
rectorate  has  requested  FY08  funding  to  begin  construction  of  a  composite  demon-
strator vessel to reduce technical risk and construction cost risk for a composite hull 
FRC–A. I also understand that the Coast Guard has assigned a senior officer to as-
sist DHS S&T. Does the CG plan to request or reprogram Deepwater funds to accel-
erate  the  construction  of  this  demonstrator  vessel?  Will  the  Coast  Guard  provide 
DHS S&T with performance requirements for the demonstrator vessel? 

Answer.  The  DHS  S&T  Scalable  Composite  Vessel  Prototype  (SCVP)  program  is 
designed  to  mitigate  technical  and  manufacturing  risks  identified  in  the  FRC–A 
Business Case Analysis (BCA). The actual design, production, and repair costs could 
be  used  to  validate  the  calculated  values  used  in  the  BCA.  DHS  S&T  will  develop 
the  performance  specification  and  requirements  for  the  prototype  vessel  and  has 
asked for Coast Guard input. A decision to request or reprogram Coast Guard fund-
ing would be made if S&T and USCG develop a Memorandum of Agreement (MOA). 
No reprogramming is in development at present. 

Question  6.  More  than  $130  million  has  been  appropriate  for  Deepwater  vertical 
unmanned  aerial  vehicles  (VUAV)  since  the  program’s  inception.  I  understand  that 
the  development  of  the  Eagle  Eye  VUAV  is  behind  schedule  and  will  not  be  ready 
to deploy on the first NSC. Is the Coast Guard planning to evaluate alternative ex-
isting  VUAV  designs  for  shipboard  use?  If  so,  is  the  Coast  Guard  prepared  to  use 
Deepwater  funds  to  adapt  an  existing  VUAV  design  for  Coast  Guard  missions? 
Please provide a timeline for how the Coast Guard plans to proceed. 

Answer.  Last  Fall,  the  Deepwater  Program  Executive  Officer  commissioned  an 
independent  study  to  assess  the  viability  of  the  VUAV  program  and  to  address  the 
shortfalls  in  capability  if  the  VUAV  program  was  postponed  or  canceled.  The  study 
was  divided  into  three  phases.  Phase  1  of  the  study,  completed  in  February  2007, 
compared the Eagle Eye to the U.S. Navy’s Fire Scout Vertical Takeoff and Landing 
(VTOL)  program.  After  close  evaluation,  the  study  recommended  not  to  procure  ei-
ther the Eagle Eye or Fire Scout due technical risks and estimated costs beyond the 
Coast  Guard’s  VUAV  program  baseline.  A  stop-work  order  has  been  issued  to  dis-
continue  further  development  of  the  Eagle  Eye  VUAV.  The  Coast  Guard  will  not 
seek  further  funding  for  the  VUAV  until  cost,  schedule,  and  risks  associated  with 
development have been more thoroughly considered and addressed. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  continuing  with  Phase  2  of  the  independent  study  to  explore 
alternatives  to  the  VUAV  program,  including  cutter-based  and  land-based  Un-
manned Aerial Systems (UASs), as well as manned aviation assets. The Phase 2 re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

98 

port  is  due  August  2007.  The  Coast  Guard  is  considering  Phase  3  to  the  inde-
pendent  study,  which  would  be  a  2-year  effort  to  refine  alternative  solutions  to  the 
VUAV  through  UAS  proof  of  concept  demonstration  flights,  operational  simulation 
modeling, and UAS air safety analyses. 

Question  7.  Why  does  the  Coast  Guard  FY08  budget  request  include  funding  for 
four  MPAs?  What  is  the  impact  of  buying  these  aircraft  earlier  than  previously 
planned? Would similar benefits apply to buying NSCs faster as well? 

Answer.  The  original  Deepwater  Acquisition  Plan  of  2002  had  seven  (7)  MPA 
operational  by  CY–2007.  Since  these  were  not  funded  at  levels  necessary  to  meet 
that  original  plan,  an  ‘‘MPA  Flight  Hour  Gap’’  was  created  where  the  declining 
availability of the HU–25 fleet has not been offset by the expected arrival of CASA 
CN–235 300M aircraft. There is a compelling need to fill this gap, which is currently 
estimated at 44,000 flight hours annually. Continued production and delivery of the 
new MPA will increase the Coast Guard’s Maritime Domain Awareness capabilities. 
The  Coast  Guard  will  benefit  from  maintaining  steady  production  lines  at  the 
CASA  facility.  Continuous  production  ensures  experienced  engineering  and  manu-
facturing  teams  remain  intact,  and  maximizes  efficiencies  which  can  be  translated 
to faster production and higher quality deliveries. 

This  strategy  will  also  allow  the  Coast  Guard  to  maintain  its  phase-out  plan  of 
the  HU–25.  There  have  been  no  plans  to  invest  in  the  HU–25  to  extend  its  service 
life, and support contracts for major aircraft systems, such as the engine, will expire 
at  the  end  of  FY  2007.  There  will,  however,  be  sufficient  sparing  and  support  to 
maintain a reduced fleet until 2012. 

There  are  additional  benefits  to  maintaining  steady  production  on  the  NSC.  As 
the  sole  customer  of  the  NSC,  breaks  in  production  would  have  major  cost  and 
schedule  impacts  for  the  Coast  Guard.  Again,  no  investment  in  378′  High  Endur-
ance  Cutters  has  been  made  and  the  378′  decommissionings  start  in  FY  2009,  so 
keeping  the  NSC  production  steady  is  the  best  investment  given  limited  funding. 
Question  8.  Some  are  advocating  that  the  Coast  Guard  should  make  greater  use 
of the Naval Sea Systems Command in procuring Deepwater cutters. However, The 
Navy’s  handling  of  its  Littoral  Combat  Ship  program  has  shown  that  its  own  pro-
gram  management  capabilities  need  improvement,  and  that  its  requirements  for 
similar  sized  ships  are  significantly  different  from  the  Coast  Guard’s.  It  seems  to 
me  that,  while  the  Navy  has  expertise  that  could  benefit  the  Deepwater  Program, 
buying  cutters  to  meet  Coast  Guard  mission  requirements  require  Coast  Guard 
oversight. Please describe the Coast Guard’s previous and planned use of Navy ship-
building expertise with respect to the Deepwater Program? 

Answer.  There  has  been  extensive  collaboration  between  the  Navy  and  the  Coast 
Guard  Deepwater  Program,  and  the  Deepwater  Program  will  continue  to  consult 
with  the  Navy  as  vessel  acquisitions  move  forward.  In  particular,  the  Coast  Guard 
has  received  extensive  support  from  Superintendents  of  Shipbuilding,  Conversion, 
and  Repair  Management  Group  (Supships)  at  the  Naval  Sea  Systems  Command 
(NAVSEA) Gulf Coast for on-site management of the production of NSC 1 and NSC 
2.  The  attached  table  describes  recent  and  continuing  support  from  multiple  re-
sources within the U.S. Navy. As the FRC and the OPC move into production, there 
will  be  increased  consultation  with  the  Navy  to  provide  the  necessary  support  that 
the CG requires. 

Navy Organization 

ATG 
San Diego 
Afloat Training Group 

COMOPTEVFOR 
Commander, Operational 
Test & Evaluation Forces 

DOD International AIMS 
Program Office 
Robins Air Force Base 

INSURV 
Board of Inspection and 
Survey 

Crew Readiness for Sea Training. 

Description 

Supporting  CG–3  and  DPM  in  performance  of  Operational  Test-
ing. 

Will conduct IFF Platform Certification for WMSL Class. 

Manage Acceptance Trials. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

Navy Organization 

Magnetic Silencing Facility 
Naval Stations Norfolk & 
San Diego 

NAVAIR 
Naval Air Systems 
Command, 
Patuxent River, MD 

NAVAIR 
Norfolk Field Office 

99 

Description 

Degaussing and deperming. 

NSC aviation facilities certification and helicopter dynamic inter-
face testing (HDIT). 

Aviation System Inspection Representative (ASIR). 

NAVAIR PMA2133D 

ILS, AN/URN–25 TACAN. Funding provided by SPAWAR. 

NAVAIR PMA251 

NAVICP 

Navy  PARM  for  Visual  landing  Systems  being  procured  for  the 
WMSL  Class.  Provides  hardware,  logistics,  and  engineering  sup-
port. 

Navy  Supply  agent  for  all  spares  for  the  WMSL,  WPC,  and 
WMSM  Classes  for  Navy  equipment  being  provided  as  GFE  to 
these classes. 

NAVSEA SEA062 

Program guidance on NSC platform certification. 

NAVSEA PMS 317 

NAVSEA PMS501 

NAVSEA SEA04L 

Provides electronic database TSME, for documentation of discrep-
ancies,  trial  card  management  and  support  of  test,  trials  & 
DD250 development. 

Provides detailed data on LCS Freedom Class for feasibility stud-
ies for OPC. 

Navy  PARM  for  Radiological  Equipment  being  procured  for  the 
WMSL Class. 

NAVSEA SEA05T1 

Radar cross section technical assistance. 

NAVSEA SUPSHIP 
Gulf Coast 
Supervisor of Shipbuilding, 
Conversion & Repair 

Navy Interoperability 
Center 

Navy Supply Center 
Detachment 
Yorktown 

NAWC–AD 
Naval Air Warfare Center, 
Aircraft Division 

PMRO  support  covering  all  aspects  of  engineering,  ship  design, 
ship  construction,  QA,  program  &  production  management,  con-
tract admin. & financial management. 

Interoperability Certification. 

Navy  ISEA  and  depot  for  Radiological  Equipment  being  provided 
to the WMSL Class. Funded via SEA 04L. 

Navy  PARM  and  ISEA  for  the  UPX–36/UPX–29A  being  procured 
for  the  WMSL  Class.  Provides  systems,  logistcs,  and  engineering 
services  in  support  of  the  integration  and  installation  of  the  sys-
tem  on  the  WMSL  Class.  PARM  for  APX–118  being  installed  on 
the  WPC.  Developing  IFF  Certification  Stage  5  &  7  Test  Proce-
dures for WMSL Class. 

NAWC–AD 
Naval Air Warfare 
Center—Aircraft Division 
Lakehurst 

Navy ISEA for Visual Landing Aids, provides technical and logis-
tics support to the ICGS ship integration and installation efforts. 
Supports Aviation Certification on WMSL Class. VLA effort fund-
ed via PMA 251. 

NOSSA 
Naval Ordnance Safety and 
Security Office 

Weapons  System  Explosive  Safety  Review  Board  review  of  the 
NSC weapons system. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

Navy Organization 

NSWC Crane 

NSWC–CD 
Naval Surface Warfare 
Center, Carderock Division 

100 

Description 

Navy  PARM  and  ISEA  for  the  AN/SLQ–32  Electronic  Warfare 
System being procured for the WMSL Class. Provides systems, lo-
gistics, and engineering services in support of the integration and 
installation of the system on the WMSL Class. 

WPC  (FRC  original)  cost  estimations  from:  a  parametric  model; 
using ship yard actuals; and Total Ownership Cost (TOC), to sup-
port  the  IPT;  and  special  tradeoffs,  such  as  Steel  vs.  Composite 
[soon to be mod’ to add Combatant Craft Department (CCD) sup-
port on the FRC B efforts.] 
—WMSM (OPC) cost estimations from: a parametric model; using 
ship  yard  actuals  [NSC];  and  TOC,  to  support  the  IPT;  and  spe-
cial tradeoffs, such as number of engines; [additionally supported 
an assessment of NSC actuals and EAC for PM and REA input.] 
—NSC  Structures  to  determine  fatigue  life  and  special  detailed 
studies on issue areas, such as the hanger racking. 

NSWC–CD 

Degaussing system technical support. 

NSWC–CD 
Philadelphia Detachment 

Board of Inspection and Survey (INSURV)—Technical Assist Sup-
port. 

NSWC–DD 
Dahlgren Division 

NSWC–PHD 

NSWC–PHD 

Providing  System  Engineering  and  Integration  support  for  inte-
grating  the  Mk  48  Gun  Weapon  System  for  the  WMSL  Class. 
Funded  via  PEO  IWS  3C.  USCG  DW  funds  NSWC  DD  support 
for Gun Weapon System Cut-outs, WMSL–750 Principal for Safe-
ty,  EMC/RADHAZ  Surveys,  Gun  Structural  Firing  Tests.  Also 
supports WSESRB effort for WMSL Class. When funded will sup-
port CG–2 System Software IV&V and certification. 

Navy  ISEA  for  the  SPQ–9B,  provides  technical  support  to  the 
ICGS  ship  integration  and  installation  efforts.  Funded  via  PEO 
IWS 2.0. 

Supporting the USCG in the planning and execution of the Com-
bat Systems Ship Qualification Test (CSSQT) for WMSL–750. De-
velops  Combat  System  Alignment  Manual.  Funded  via  PEO  IWS 
1.0. 

NSWC–PHD 
Louisville Detachment 

Navy  ISEA  for  the  Mk  15  CIWS  BLK  1B  provides  technical  and 
logistics support to the ICGS ship integration and installation ef-
forts. Funded by PEO IWS 3B. 

NSWC–PHD 
Louisville Detachment 

Navy  ISEA  for  the  Mk  160  GCS,  Mk  38  Gun,  MK  110  Gun  and 
Mk  46  OSS  provides  technical  and  logistics  support  to  the  ICGS 
ship  integration  and  installation  efforts.  Funded  via  PEO  IWS 
3C. 

NSWC–PHD 
Louisville Detachment 

Navy ISEA for the Mk 53 Decoy Launching System provides tech-
nical  support  to  the  ICGS  ship  integration  and  installation  ef-
forts. Funded via PEO IWS 2E. 

NWDC 
Newport 
Naval Warfare 
Development Center 

ONR 
Office of Naval Research 

Supporting  the  USCG  in  development  of  the  Tactical  Manual  for 
the WMSL Class. 

Composite  hull  R&D/Risk  Mitigation  for  FRC  Program.  The  FRC 
also  utilized  the  MOU  between  CG  and  ONR  for  data  sharing, 
production  inspection  and  joint  design  reviews  during  the  CHSV 
project  and  FRC  composite  design.  Also  OPTEVFOR  participated 
during several FRC design reviews . . . 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

Navy Organization 

OPNAV N76 
Chief of Naval Operations 

PEO IWS 1.0 
Program Executive Officer, 
Integrated Warfare 
Systems 

PEO IWS 1A5 

PEO IWS 1B 

PEO IWS 2.0 

PEO IWS 2E 

PEO IWS 3B 

PEO IWS 3C 

PEO IWS3C 

SPAWAR 
Charleston 

SPAWAR 
San Diego 

SPAWAR 
San Diego 

SPAWAR C4I 
Philadelphia 

101 

Description 

Navy  Resource  Sponsor  for  Navy  Type/Navy  Owned  Equipment 
going  on  WMSL,  WPC,  and  WMSM  Classes.  Sponsors  USCG- 
Navy Permanent Joint Working Group and the Naval Operations 
Capabilities retirements for the DW Cutters. 

Navy  Program  Manager  for  CSSQT  activities  in  support  of  the 
WMSL Class. 

PEO  IWS  Program  Manger  for  USCG  NTNO  equipment  and  re-
source  allocation  of  Navy  WPN/WPN  funds.  Lead  POC  for  all 
NTNO  technical,  logistics,  and  financial  issues  and  requirements 
for WMSL, WPC, and WMSM Classes. 

Navy  PARM  for  BFTT  Electronic  Warfare  Trainer  (BEWT)  being 
procured for the WMSL Class. 

Navy PARM for Mk SPQ–9B Radar being procured for the WMSL 
Class. 

Navy  PARM  for  Mk  53  Decoy  Launching  System  being  procured 
for the WMSL Class. 

Navy  PARM  for  MK  15  CIWS  Blk  1B  being  procured  for  the 
WMSL Class. 

Navy PARM for MK 160 Gun Control System, and Mk 46 Optical 
Sight System, being procured for the WMSL Class. Procuring the 
Mk 38 Gun for the WPC class. Procuring the Mk 110 57 MM Gun 
for the WMSL 752 thru 757. 

56MM  Gun  Weapons  System—ammunition  &  system  develop-
ment, safety and integration. U.S. Navy Funded. 

ILS, AN/SYQ–26(V)4 Tactical Messaging System (NAVMACS II). 

Navy  PARM  for  TACAN  and  SRR–1  Communication  systems 
being procured for the WMSL Class. 

Navy  PARM  for  SCIF  systems  being  procured  for  the  WMSL 
Class.  Providing  systems  and  engineering  support  to  the  integra-
tion and installation of SCIF on the WMSL Class. 

CG–C2 Software. 

Question  9.  There  has  been  much  criticism  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  pro-

gram. Please describe the Deepwater Program’s success stories. 

Answer. Successes from the Integrated Deepwater System Acquisition include: 
HH–65 Helicopter Re-Engining: 
• 84 re-engined operational HH–65s delivered (as of 16 May 2007). 
• All HH–65 equipped units are now operating the HH–65C. 
• Cost, Schedule, and Performance requirements were met. 
Medium-Range Surveillance Aircraft (CASA CN–235): 
• The  first  8  CASA  CN–235s  have  been  placed  on  contract  along  with  the  first 
three  mission  pallets.  Aircraft  4  &  5  were  awarded  in  Jan.  2007.  Aircraft  6,  7, 
and 8 were awarded in April 2007. 
• The first aircraft arrived at the Coast Guard Aircraft Repair and Supply center 
(AR&SC) in Dec. 2006. The second aircraft arrived in Feb. 2007. Mission pallets 
will be integrated on the aircraft at AR&SC. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

102 

• The contract calls for delivery of the third aircraft no later than Aug. 2007 but 
a  May  2007  delivery  is  anticipated.  Aircraft  4  &  5  have  an  expected  delivery 
date in the second quarter of CY09. 
• Official readiness status at the first air station with CASA CN–235s is projected 

to occur in January 2009 or earlier. 

ment designs that existed in Deepwater. 

was over $300M with available funding being only $120M. 

HC–130J Missionization: 
• Program  originally  outside  of  Deepwater  and  the  estimate  for  Missionization 
• Project transferred to Deepwater. 
• Deepwater  developed  new  missionization  approach  using  architecture/equip-
• Now projected to be completed within the $120M baseline. 
National Security Cutter: 
• Delivery scheduled despite impacts of hurricanes and recent labor strike. 
• Post 9/11 additional capabilities. 
Legacy C4ISR Upgrades Afloat and Ashore: 
• Four shore-side command centers upgraded; significantly enhancing operational 
• Initial  Upgrades  of  secure  Internet,  commercial  satellite  communications,  and 
automatic vessel identification equipment have been completed on all 39 legacy 
cutters (378′ HECs, 270′ and 210′ MECs). 
• Successfully demonstrated core capabilities of Increment 1 at the Maritime Do-
• 2  Communications  Area  Master  Stations  delivered.  Sector  San  Juan  and  Dis-
trict  7  command  centers  completed  upgrades  and  are  being  certified  for  deliv-
ery. 

effectiveness and Maritime Domain Awareness. 

main Awareness Center. 

Shore Facilities Constructed to Support Assets: 
• Maritime  Patrol  Aircraft  (MPA)  Hangar  at  Aviation  Training  Center,  Mobile, 
Alabama  has  been  completed  and  will  be  used  for  the  MPAs  that  will  be  as-
signed there for training and operations. 
• Training Facility (referred to as Building 500) has been completed in Petaluma, 

California for National Security Cutter (NSC) electronic equipment training. 

Question  10.  Your  budget  request  asks  for  $130  million  for  the  Deployable  Oper-
ations  Group  (DOG).  What  problem  is  this  designed  to  fix  and  how  does  it  intend 
to  fix  it?  Will  the  establishment  of  the  DOG  lead  to  the  consolidation  or  relocation 
of any operational assets? 

Answer. The $132.7 million is a base re-allocation, not a request for new funding. 
The  Deployable  Operations  Group  (DOG)  will  resolve  challenges  within  the  Coast 
Guard’s  Deployable,  Specialized  Forces  (DSF)  pertaining  to  training,  equipment, 
interoperability,  and  coordination  by  unifying  under  a  single  command.  The  DOG 
will  oversee,  coordinate,  and  integrate  adaptive  deployable  force  packages  from  the 
following  Coast  Guard  specialized  teams:  Maritime  Security  Response  Team,  Mari-
time Safety and Security Teams, Port Security Units, National Strike Force, and the 
Tactical Law Enforcement Teams. 

The  coordination  and  integration  of  DSF’s  under  the  DOG  will  provide  increased 
standardization  of  training,  tactics,  and  equipment  providing  increased  opportuni-
ties for cross-training and more effective and efficient interoperability. Additionally, 
the DOG will focus on contingency planning and cooperation with interagency part-
ners to develop multi-agency force packages. The establishment of the DOG does not 
include the consolidation or relocation of any operational assets. 

Question 11. I understand that the Coast Guard plans to reorganize several major 

commands. What is the purpose and ultimate goal of this reorganization? 

Answer. The Coast Guard has embarked on an extensive transformation effort to 
shape  the  service  into  a  more  agile,  capable,  and  responsive  agency  in  the  areas  of 
mission  support  and  mission  execution.  Lessons-learned  from  Hurricane  Katrina, 
and  Deepwater  program  prompted  this  cause  for  action,  and  the  end  result  will  be 
an agency that is better prepared to meet the Nation’s maritime safety and security 
needs into the future. 

Question  12.  Why  does  the  Coast  Guard  want  authority  to  de-link  its  Vice  Admi-
rals  from  specific  assignments?  How  would  this  authority  compare  to  that  of  other 
armed forces? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

103 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard’s  vice  admiral  legislative  provision  will  proactively 
eliminate  the  redundancy  and  inefficiencies  inherent  in  its  legacy,  geographic-fo-
cused command structure. Currently, the Coast Guard’s Area Commands each have 
a  staff  for  command  and  control,  force  readiness  and  training  and  exercise  plan-
ning—creating redundancy. Similarly, the separate Maintenance and Logistics Com-
mand  staffs  for  vessel  maintenance  and  personnel  support  functions  result  in  addi-
tional redundancy and too many support systems that are not fully integrated. The 
legislative initiative will provide the necessary flexibility for the Coast Guard to re- 
organize  these  command  staffs  along  functional  lines  to  eliminate  redundancy  and 
improve  efficiency  and  mission  effectiveness.  The  proposed  vice  admiral  positions 
will  have  specific  functional  responsibilities,  which  will  be  described  in  detail  upon 
nomination of each officer. 

The  Coast  Guard  now  operates  in  an  evolving,  dynamic  multi-mission  environ-
ment that requires both increased alignment with the other armed forces and inter-
agency  partners  and  greater  organizational  flexibility  than  the  existing,  geocentric 
command  structure  provides.  The  geographically-driven  area  of  responsibility  lead-
ership model is out of alignment with that of our interagency partners and does not 
reflect  the  reality  of  current  Coast  Guard  missions  and  functions.  The  limitations 
of  the  existing  command  structure  became  apparent,  for  example,  as  the  Coast 
Guard  flowed  forces  from  each  Area  Command  during  the  response  to  Hurricanes 
Katrina and Rita in 2005. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  legislative  proposal  would  provide  for  temporary  appointment 
of  vice  admirals  to  ‘‘positions  of  importance  and  responsibility,’’  similar  to  like  ap-
pointments  in  the  other  armed  services,  to  provide  organizational  flexibility,  while 
preserving  executive  command  and  congressional  oversight.  This  proposal  would 
allow the Coast Guard to move toward a more functionally-driven leadership struc-
ture  and  provide  the  flexibility,  with  appropriate  congressional  oversight,  to  adapt 
the structure in the future as mission demands and circumstances may require. 

The  proposed  authority  would  align  the  Coast  Guard  leadership  structure  more 
closely  with  that  of  the  other  armed  forces.  Specifically,  the  amendments  to  14 
U.S.C.  § 47  would  fix  the  grade  of  the  Vice  Commandant  at  admiral,  aligning  with 
the  grade  of  the  deputy  service  chief  with  that  of  each  of  the  other  services.  See, 
e.g.,  10  U.S.C.  §§ 5035,  5044.  Further,  the  proposed  amendments  to  14  U.S.C.  § 50 
would  establish  a  leadership  structure  parallel  to  the  Deputy  Commandants  of  the 
Marine  Corps,  and  fixing  the  number  of  vice  admirals  at  no  more  than  four.  See 
10  U.S.C.  § 5045.  Each  position  will  be  held  by  officers  who,  like  the  existing  Chief 
of  Staff  and  Area  Commanders,  will  have  the  grade  of  vice  admiral,  while  so  serv-
ing, and perform such duties as the Commandant prescribes. See 14 U.S.C. §§ 50(a) 
and 50a(a). 

Background: 
10 U.S.C. § 601 provides, in pertinent part: 

§ 601.  Positions  of  importance  and  responsibility:  generals  and  lieutenant 

generals; admirals and vice admirals 

‘‘(a)  The  President  may  designate  positions  of  importance  and  responsibility  to 
carry  the  grade  of  general  or  admiral  or  lieutenant  general  or  vice  admiral. . . .’’ 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

10 U.S.C. § 5045 provides, in pertinent part: 

§ 5045. Deputy Commandants. 

‘‘There  are  in  the  Headquarters,  Marine  Corps,  not  more  than  six  Deputy  Com-
mandants, detailed by the Secretary of the Navy from officers on the active-duty list 
of the Marine Corps.’’ 
* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

Coast Guard proposed text, regarding vice admiral positions: 

§ 50. Vice admirals 

‘‘(a)(1)  The  President  may  designate  no  more  than  four  positions  of  importance 

and responsibility that shall be held by officers who—— 

(A) while so serving, shall have the grade of vice admiral, with the pay and al-
lowances of that grade; and 
(B) shall perform such duties as the Commandant may prescribe.’’ 

Question  13.  The  Coast  Guard  has  stated  that  its  FY08  budget  request  is  a  ‘‘cur-
rent services’’ budget. Please explain what that means and how that request would 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

104 

or  would  not  cover  the  cost  of  the  Coast  Guard  responding  to  a  major  operational 
requirement, such as a mass migration from Cuba or Haiti. 

Answer. A ‘‘current services’’ budget means that the Fiscal Year 2008 President’s 
budget request will ensure the Coast Guard is able to maintain current operational 
performance levels while continuing vital recapitalization projects and aligning stra-
tegically  for  enhanced  mission  effectiveness.  The  Coast  Guard  does  not  budget  for 
incidents of national significance since it is speculative when incidents might occur. 
The  Coast  Guard  requested  additional  funding  in  all  four  supplemental  appropria-
tions  following  Hurricane  Katrina,  of  which  the  Coast  Guard  received  funding  in 
Katrina Supplemental #3 (P.L. 109–148) and #4 (P.L. 109–234) 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:56 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\79550.TXT JACKIE

